The last year of my life has been a brutal one. At the age of 22, I am in the lowest of lows and I desperately need some help!
About a year ago, a couple months after an extremely strenuous relationship, I began noticing that I was tired all the time…and all around, I wasn’t really satisfied. Don’t get me wrong, I still enjoyed my friends, and activities…but life just wasn’t as bright and vibrant anymore after a month of noticing this ever-present fatigue, it got a bit stronger. I would wake up each morning completely zombie-mode…and that feeling would remain throughout the entirety of my day, until my head hit my pillow that evening.
Initially, I suspected some form of sleeping disorder. I set up a sleep study, got my thyroid checked, ferritin levels, all the basics. Sleep study revealed I sleep just fine and all my other blood tests came back negative.
The fatigue and the weight of the world slowly got worse over the next handful of months, UNTIL I woke up one morning and everything escalated greatly. I felt completely stoned. I couldn’t think right. I couldn’t concentrate. I felt inebriated. I felt totally disconnected and spacey. I felt as though I had no control over myself. I lost drive and motivation. I lost a lot of confidence. I always had an incredibly sharp memory. It was actually something well known about me to those in my family and friend circles. Yet, on this morning, almost all new information could not be retained. Things that happened earlier in the day, by evening, I felt they happened a day or two before. I could no longer recount the activities I took part in. This is possibly the worst of all the symptoms. The extreme short term memory. I have no context for time and I sort of feel like I’m just floating through life suffering.
For months I visited doctors getting tested by specialists. I visited a neurologist, infectious disease, I had an MRI, & I had about 20 different blood tests. NOTHING. My doctor literally said “I have no idea what this could be. I am beside myself” TOTES reassuring! I tried altering my diet entirely to organic and all natural. I continued my workouts and ran 15 miles a week. I tried sleeping even earlier. I tried all I could think of .
I’m not sure if depression is the culprit, but depression sure has found its nasty venom-coated fangs into my veins. Tired, depressed, failed memory, no drive, scared…it’s no way to live. I want my life back.
I'm 25 years old and After a night of drinking, I feel funny to this day. The alcohol affected me by making me believe I'm in a dream and I'm not myself. My vision is weird it's like I capture moments of what I see and when I speak, it's like im not speaking or somewhat like that. I feel all round funny, I look at my own body sometimes and think is this really me? It seems that during the day when the sun is out is when I'm at my worst but when it gets dark and almost bed time, I feel better. It's weird living like this, it's hard for me to process things. It's hard for me to put sentences together and hard to remember things I did throughout the day. I'm also forgetful. My eyes are sensitive to sunlight also. It's like I'm half awake and half asleep. I'm also going through a breakup with a girl whom I have a kid with and she's with someone else now but I don't really care now about who she's with. I'm more worried about myself. It's hard waking up every morning and feeling like this throughout the day, I just want to be normal.
I've read your symptoms and situation, and it seems very simular to my own experience during stage two lyme desease. I can't say that you have lyme but based on the sudden onset, the symptoms, the persistance of those symptoms and the fact that you have ruled out so many other possible causes I would say it is likely that you have some sort of brain/neurological infection.
Most lyme illiterate doctors will give up on finding the source of the problem and try treating symptoms with medications for sleep, anxiety, and depression. Unfortunatly, all anti-depression meds acutally make the condition worse. The only medication I found to provide short term releif was high strenth amphetamines, perscribed for fatigue symptoms, that supprisingly resolved many of the other symptoms temporarilly. I had to go through 6 months of IV antibiotic infussions to effectivly treat the condition.
I would love to know if anyone has experienced a full healing in this just to give hope to the rest of us. I have had similar symptoms myself for the past 7 years( i am 26 now) and still cant make heads or tails of them. I feel like I have seen every specialist known to man and now Im at the place of thinking this may be depression. However, taking medication seems daunting because from what Ive heard and read on these posts, it seems like meds do not really cure people completely. I may be making a false generalization, so if someone can say otherwise that would be great. When dealing with obscure health ailments such as chronic fatigue/brain fog that many people do not even believe are real it is important to support one another and give testimony when healing takes place. It will give hope to the rest of us.
Mine is not getting any better. Im only trying to eat healthy, no drugs now. Will se a Dr. this week. Anybody experienced any improvements?
im seeing some improvement on sertraline
How long are you suffering already. Is it sometimes getting any better? I have moments where I`m almost back to normal, they might last a day or a week sometimes less then a day. How is your memory, are you in a stressful environment?
some moments i feel ok when i think im getting better it comes back
Less than two years, memory is almost cero, thats my main concern. I reduced any type of stress to the minimum. Exersice, not on any suplements, have to try those. Going to try Kelp and see what happens. Not sleeping very well, I need to find a solution for that too...
You got any sensitivity to light, especially fluorescent lights? I had all the above mentioned symptoms several times over the last 16 years. Each time it got worse then the previous episode. The very first time Inhad something like this was in 1998. Then again in 2000, then 2007, 2010 ,2013 and now from December 2014 to the present day. Which does worry me though. Symptoms are much more pronounced then before. I don`t have any sleep problems but I feel very tired when waking up the next morning.
Yes, had that sens to light too, now not sure if improved or just got used to it. What about between those times, did you get complete remision of the symptoms?
Yes I had indeed complete remison. I had 4 years for example with no symptoms apart form getting tired easily. I still remember the first time I really noticed something not being right. I started getting easily sinus infections, followed by stomach probelms. Then I noticed one day while at work that I had vision problems on the right eye. Somehow there was a white spot in my field of vision. This got worse as I was on my way home riding my bike. That spot really disturbed my vision on my right side badly. Well of course this all cleare up fairly quickly, no one thought of it as anything important. And from thenb on I regulalry got wired stuff poping up. Now I get mainly on my right side of the body joint aches. First in my right shoulder which lasets a few weeks, then in my right knee, gone after a few days and now in my right elbow which makes it hard to pick up itmes, the pain is that strong. I make plenty of mistakes when writing an email. My short temr memory, and by that I mena my imidiate short temr memory like things I was just thinking about are sometimes gone and it takes me a few seconds to retrieve that info. That in return puts me in a state of panic which then makes things even worse.
yeah same for me i start panicking ;( hopefully the zoloft helps
Well I assume the Zoloft will help with your panic attacks but if all the other symptoms like brain fog etc are not related to anxiety or panick attacks I don`t think there will be much imporvment. I managed to get my panic attacks under control without medication as I really don`t want to fall into the trap of getting even worse anxiety when I stop taking things like Zoloft. I spoke to many people who had their anxiety/panoc attacjs come back alot worse after they discontinued the pills.
yeah i stopped taking citolopram thinking i was okay and bam depression anxiety hit hard. i can remember things its just feeling spacey brain fog im dealing with that sucks
It's bad at the moment, lots of pressure in the head, dizzy, swollen eyes, fatigued, can't think coherently. Had to cancel school and work today, which costs me a lot of money since I'm a freelancer, and I paid for a practice day at school.
Went to a neurologist few weeks ago and he told me it's 'silent migrain' I'm suffering from. He could well be right (don't trust him entirely, he's always in a hurry and takes very little time for a consultation, hardly asks any questions and doesn't listen to my answer). the symptoms match though. It's completely new to me, but from what I've read till now it's spot on. It's not headaches, but all that comes with migraine, which is quite a lot to my suprise.
I feel the same way
wow u descrobed me perfectly i also have weak limbs at the moment too
Now that I saw this feed I have a little more peace of mind. I share many of these symptoms and I'm going to see a therapist in a few weeks.
I keep disasociating badly. It's like I'm in a dream world and check out of reality I'm like a ghost. My feeling shut down too
yeah me too i freak out so bad i get panic attacks
thats good my dr said its normal since im depressed over losing my mom
well considering i got it from being depressed over missing my mom and gets worse with anxiety and my dr saying its normal to feel this way when u go through something traumatic . not trying to add more stress to my mind thinking its dementia is that what u have?
That's the best explained symptoms of what I've had forever since I was in a relationship and it went south and gave me depression and anxiety out of the blue. Even when I went to my doctor to explain what was going on with me it felt like when she told me depression that it couldn't be depression I'm not sad I'm going crazy in my brain my memory's out of whack
, my body feels different, I'm starting to forget who I am, I was unstable, and out of control, and I don't socialize like I used to I could talk and talk all day and make people laugh and now its just like I'm quiet and can't think at all like you said just going through the motions suffering that's how it feels.
But you know what the doctor was right with the diagnosis, I still wonder if it could be something else but I took antidepressants and it actually gave me the biggest boost I felt so damn good for like a year and a bit now I feel like I need anti depressants again like my brain just needs that extra boost again to get rid of the fog and give me my energy and happiness back. What's weird is I used to have ADHD and now its more like ADD and I have dementia, people tell me all the time things that we've done together in the past and anything well most things I've done since I've had this going on feels like a dream if I try to remember or I just can't remember its just all a blur. But if anyone has figured out the memory part of this bull can someone please msg asap because I'd really like to get this done with in my life its basically the only thing that bugs me I feel like if I could remember how I used to I would be so happy! So I can remember everything again but I'm going to go to my doctors today and get some anxiety and anti depressants and see if I can get my memory figured out thank you for reading and please message if you know anything I don't.
Hello. My daughter had anxiety with depression and panic attacks. She is on anti-dpressants (she's tried most of them and finally found the right combo). More importantly she goes to cognitive theraphy sessions with a licensed therapist which was the key to her being able to serve a year with Americorps after she graduated from college and move to Germany last January. She would never have been able to do either without the AD's and the therapy.
I'm 39 and have had the same symptoms for 2 years
The only difference is I was sent from work for a random drug testing that found leukemia
They've taken care of that and I've had a million tests to no avail if I push my self or excerpt myself it gets worse and lasts for days where I can't get out of bed (sometimes to go to the rest room)
It's not just depression or anxiety
I haven't found anything to help and there still working on a diagnosis of fibromyalgia
Taylor i have these exact same symptoms and it's amazing that i've finally found at least a few people who have the exact same thing. I know that you've posted this a while back but have things gotten any better? Brain fog is honestly the toughest enemy because it's one you can't see. No doctor can diagnose it and everyone thinks you're suffering from depressionalization, anxiety or chronic fatigue syndrome. I've described my symptoms literally the exact why you have. It is EXACTLY like being high without the good feelings. It's completely 24/7 and gives you almost this innability to think. You start to lose your ego in some senses. Look if anyone can relate to this and have gotten better over time or have found a cure for their brain fog please let me know. It's just great to know i'm not the only one with this. Also, Taylor, don't let people tell you you're depressed. I thought it was depression when my brain fog began to cloud my mind the first year but if your case is like mine, it isn't. Just keep pushing Thanks guys
I've been working towards it everyday but it hasn't left me yet
Taylor you described my symptoms down to a T! I'am currently a third year student at university and although I know the importance of this year, I don't seem to be able to find the motivation to do the work let alone care or contemplate what willl happen if I don't.
Hoping you have found some peace of mind, I had a similar stage after my husband(now ex) finally cut ties with me and took my child. Everything went downhill from there, I lost any want to do more then just work and be left alone. It had gotten worse for a while, the job I loved, i lost(because of the ex) and that depressed me more.
Did you ever receive any answers? I am experiencing the same symptoms. I currently take anti depressant/anxiety meds, but I feel like they are not fully helping. I do have generalized anxiety, accompanied by brain fog, inability to think clearly, and head pressure with slight lightheartedness and dizziness. It would be comforting to know if you were able to get some relief and how. Thanks!
I am going through the same thing. I'm in college and am in prenursing and my theory is that I've developed a bad appetite and I'm lacking in essential nutrients. I've found that omega 3's are Essential to brain function. So get some daily vitamins and eat better and I'm sure you will feel much better. Oh and don't forget to sweat at least once a week.
Hello- I know this post is over a year old so I am hoping you are still connected to this site. My story is the same as yours. Have you found any answers? Praying you get this message and that you have found answers
Taylor I do just exactly the same thing I have fit this for four years and I so know this is not deppersion I've had blood work MRIs eegs they told me it could be silent migrain there is no way it is I find myself doing something wondering why I'm doing it also I'm dizzy at times pressure in my head no pain all this could last all day it happens every single day of my life I no longer drive not to mention my speech gets slur and I just feel stoned out of my head
Any of you experiencing periods of remission, even if it is just for a day or a few hours? I have spells where I feel a lot better but never as good as I felt before this all started again 14 month ago. And even more important does any of you feel like your cognitive symptoms are getting worse over time, especially problems with focusing and short term memory.
I have exactly the same problems, had every test under the sun, all clear.
Hey Taylor,
Our stories are scary simular. Just wanted to say first off, hang in there....this goes for everybody!. If a couple good friends/family memebers don't know about your issue(fog) make sure you change that fast, you need the support and if you have a starnge feeling of guilt...get rid of it.
I'm currently 36 but back in college when I was 21, I woke up one day with this fog. Almost feels like a pressure or like somebody put a vaccum against your ear and sucked some air out and then sealed it quickly.
General feeling of uncomfotableness in my head
After visiting neoroigists, eye doctors, gereral practicians, MRI blood tests and coming up with nothing....eventually...somehow it went away...at least briefly.
My Doctor had me on Paxil as a "" well, why not..nothing else is working kind of thing"". So i originally attributed it going away maybe because of it but after years of trial and error, the Paxil just triples the memory nukage and while it it I can still get the fog.
#2 For some reason, it seems like I have a light tremor in my teeth...ever so slight when I put them together I can feel it
I've mainly been grinding for 15 years. I worry about losing my wife/job all the way to being on the streets because of this terrible condition that kno body seems to have any clue about.
For me at least I seemingly get breaks from it which is a lot more then some people reading these forums.
Everybody please continue to share any or all new information so we can help each other.
"Paj i also get the tremors ..did you find anything that helps ?
hey, i feel the exact same way where i just feel stoned. it usually happens in the mornings when people try talking to me and they get lound i start to feel dizzy and lethargic like nothing is real and it feels weird to move especially my arms and fingers. i also get this faint feeling too. this is honestly feaking me out and i hate it so much and it has pretty much taken over my life and i was wondering if you had any input on it, anything will help. Even if you also dont know whats going on and i have a feeling depression and anxiety might have a role in this but i just want you to know that your not alone and im happy i found this,
Nothing feels real ???? O yea iv been saying this for 16months since I hit server anxiety and depression (postnatal) it's like your walking through a dream? Watching life go by but your not really part of it now, u love in the nothing ?
Hey Taylor I ran a crossed ur post here about 2 half months ago I all the sudden started feeling exactly how u described just wondering if u ever got over it or figured out what was going on
You have described my symptoms exactly. My symptoms--brain fog, extreme fatigue, memory struggles, and the ever-present zombie-bubble-head sensation--are my reality three or more days a week. It seems to be getting worse. I also experience mouth (tongue and lip) tingling, low grade fevers during sleep, and occasional but persistent edema. (I've been taking hydrochlorothiazide for the edema for years, but now its not working as well...)
Another clue, in case anyone finds similarities...I relocated to the Chicago suburbs from the Southeastern US approximately one and a half years ago. (July 2014) After my first full night in the area--eating the food, drinking the water--I woke the next morning with a debilitating fatigue and a physiological-level depression that kept me in the hotel bed the entire next day. I was barely able to leave the room. The next day, I was exhausted but able to get up and out. I didn't connect it to my relocation until a year later when I noticed my symptoms were graduatlly worse over the next year.
Now, my brain fog / fatigue symptoms are worse and more \"regular\" every other day and for days at a time.
Thank you so very much for posting this Taylor. You've helped me more than you can know. It helps me just knowing I'm not the only one this is / has happened to. I have an appointment tomorrow to discuss testing. I'm going to bring what I've learned here about silent migranes.
I think all this is classic depression and anxiety. It's all about not been present in the now iv had this 16 months
I have had vague everyday symptoms for 10 years and my best advice is to change your diet and cut out sugars and fast foods, also dont smoke or drink alcohol. My symptoms flare up worst a day or so after drinking, i smoke to relieve stress from my symptoms kinda to give me a excuse to feel sh*t unfortunately,
All of which is uncomfortable and feels impossible to deal with, i keep active with sport and fitness every week which is some relief,
I live in Australia and my symptoms have matched alot of lyme disease symptoms but that disease is not recognized here and the government states it doesnt exist here even know theres some significant evidence supporting the case.
Although im lucky and dont experience pain at all but i know there is definitely something not right.
It frustrates me that they just assume its something when its not.
I have all of the symptoms mentioned in the original post, and recently discovered I suffer from 'silent' migraine (no headaches). Never knew before that it comes with all these diffuse complaints but it matches perfectly. Am going to do a Lyme test anyway, just to rule that out. it's unfortunately possible to have two diseases at the same time.
Hi Taylor ive got similar symptoms i feel drugged or spacy its hard to explian i also feel disconnected at times and my memory is bad i can be driving and cant remember were im going which makes me panic its anxiety and panic depersonalization or derealization all same thing but when its bad its very hard to believe its just anxiety
Hi everyone. Taylor, I first would like to thank you for creating this thread. It seems like a lot of people can relate to your situation; myself included. I am deeply sorry that you are expericing these feelings, and hope that as a year has passed, you have found some relief with your symptoms.
That being said, I can understand how you feel. I am currently 22, male, and have extreme brain fog... My mental sharpness and clarity has not been the same for a few months now. I've been so spacey, tired, headaches/migraines. I was diagnosed with depression and anxiety at age 11, and it has been with me since, although at that age I struggled more with suicidal thoughts than your typical brain fog symptoms like we are expericing now.
I'll give a more comprehensive list of my symptoms:
Major highs and lows (could possibly be bipolar... I am in the process of getting reevaluted by a psychiatrist)
Crying spells and suicidal thoughts on my worst days.
My cause of this is most likely depression. I've been through a lot in the past year alone (two major family deaths, a messy break up from a 2 y/o relationship) ... It has been such a difficult time.
I used to be so independent and so driven to do anything I set my mind to. My mind is so weak now, that I can only do my basic necessities throughout the day and then some. I find it harder and harder to do anything else. I work as a freelance artist for a living so my livelihood solely depends on my drive and what I can manage to do.
I have the motivation to do what I'd like - but I just can't. I have so many dreams and aspirations... It's so frustrating to be held back by this chemical imbalance. I know I shouldn't let it hold me back, but it's gotten so bad that it cannot be helped. I'm hoping that therapy and perhaps some new medication will help me. I'm currently on Topamax, Effexor, and Remeron. I've heard some nasty things about Effexor affecting your memory - so that very well may be one of the components to why I have such bad memory.
I find this thread very interesting as I have been suffering for quite a while myself. Ive pretty much had every symptom listed including hairloss, chronic fatigue, and deep muscle constriction/tension. Its probably the worst thing in the world, feeling trapped in your own mind/body. My symptoms, horrid symptoms, appeared three days after a simple surgical procedure under anesthesia.
You can PM me if you want. Id like to do som
e kind of qualitative study on this based on what possibly caused this. I know many fingers point simply to an anxiety disorder and high stress, which I do not doubt either. I hope everyone is hanging in there, be well.
My story is very similar to yours. Only difference is I started losing my hearing and having severe allergies as well. I'm scared for my future Please tell me you've found answers?
hey Taylor believe it or not i have been experiencing some of the same symptoms as you except mine has put me to where i stay in my room all day dont eat dont drink and basically sleep all day and all night it never goes away im never the slightest bit happy. and people try to hug and kiss me and make me better just by the flick of the finger but sadlybthey cant. They kinda make it worse i just feel like dying is the only possible solution. a couple of times i hsve even tried. i cant focus i cant cocentrate i cant remember anything literally its like i have no recollection of who i am or what ive been through or even eho i am. i recon im just a crazy person for saying this. Ive tried telling my om but she doesnt really seem to understand neither does my dad. i have no one who believes that im insane. ive even tried running away but that wont fix my problems. and im constantly in pain all the time but that doesnt seem to matter. ive tried sleeping the pain away but its no use. but if anyones out there listening if anyone can help please reply so i dont think im 100% crazy.
it's horrible it's like my brain is slowly deteriorating I hate it so so much especially when I'm alone
I too....had exactly the same problems....and i still do...
Like yourselves. I had every test that they could think of..
I was so unbelievably tired....terrible muscular pain..depression.i too found the brain fog the worst., and I still do ( i forget my children's birth date )...
After twelve months of tests ect...I was referred to a rheumatology clinic....within five minutes...I was diagnosed with FIBROMIALGIA. ..I was told that it was my body and my mind saying ENOUGH....I do suffer from a massive amount of worry and stress...our three wonderful adult sons..who live with us...all suffer from mental health problems ( very severe ones at that ) we know every psychiatrist in the whole system ....also..two of them also have serious health problems. ...it was nice to have an answer after all the various specialists i have seen....
Interestingly. ...I was in hospital for a week. A couple of months ago...I woke up and I could not move or feel my left hand ..I was admitted and had many tests...it actually turned out to be a trapped nerve....however. ...on the various brain scans...they showed
TWO PREVIOUS BLEEDS IN THE BRAIN....AND ALSO SHRINKINGE. .. I think caused by my ten yrs of alcoholism. ...
Now one of the hardest things I find....is because you look so well ....people do not believe you...
I am in a support group for fibromialgia. ..and any other condition that are unseen...e.g. ..mental health ....DIABETES. ...chronic fatigue syndrome ...and many others........
Hey, here are my symptoms, and what fixed it. Brain fog, memory loss panic attacks.
Removal of Soy and soy lethicin from my system. its in everything. My meds are even compounded.
PLEASE let me know when you find the answer. I have had years of the fatigue and it wasnt until I had my children that I was sent to a neurologist and had sleep studies. I found none of the meds helped. I found that the restless legs are worse then ever since I started meds. I could easily put my car in park at a red light and tell my kids to wake me when it turns red- and yess I can fall asleep. I have had one neurologist send me to another . I have seen endocrinologist. I have been on anti depressants. The month have March has by far been debilitating. I live in a fog! I can barely get one foot in front of another. The MD's only want to give me meds but no one can tell me whats going on with me. Last the neurologist wanted to put me on Methadone to help me sleep at night. I was like are you joking! I said put it in my chart right now - that is not an option!! I have 3 kids and I am so so exhausted! I am desperate and now have sought out a functional med Dr. This is no quality and feeling like this makes ya depressed. This is awful.
I have had 2 sleep studies. Restless leg is what they tell me. I don't sleep well at night and all I want to do is sleep during the day. I am in the medical profession so yes many tests done. My cortisol levels were elevated but when they did the next step to check for Cushings that was fine so they dismiss it. I have had multiple thyroid studies done ! Seeing yet another Dr and of course they wanted them drawn again so we will see. I work out and love to and had to even give that up because the past month I am that tired. I'm nauseous all the time. I started with vertigo now. And when you see these dr's they look at you like you are insane. But I know my body and I don't feel well and it's not normal to be able to close your eyes and sleep..... Especially because the neurologists have me on stimulants and I sleep right through them. I can take a 5 hr energy and
I have had all the vitamin levels drawn. I remember the vitamin B12 was pretty high. I was shocked actually. I can't recall the Vit d level. I have been on so many meds for restless leg. I was on Gabapentin and I had tried it 2 x now and I nods all day. It's too much for me. I decreased the dose , I have even spilt the pills down further ,,, I can't take it. I tried Mirapex and I ended up with augmentation which was horrible. I tired the sister of that. I have tried Lyrica. I have tried low dose narcotics ... I can fall asleep within 2 mins. It's crazy but within 1 hour I wake. Now the month of March has been horrible. I could sleep all the time. My
Only awake period is like evening hours. But I can still sleep. I have all the symptoms of adrenal fatigue and that's what the functional med dr said. But I have a lot of
Symptoms of Chronic Lymes. So piece by piece we are testing. Many of these tests are out of pocket though in order the get the correct test done. So it adds up quick. I am switching primaries . That's in the works .
Sounds like you are on the same route as me Boymom, going from one specialist to the next. I also can sleep at any moment, just not at the times I'm supposed to. I don't have RLS or high B12 but for the rest I completely recognize your experiences. I've also ended up at the Lyme hypothesis by now, but as you say: it all has to come out of your pocket, wel same here, am saving up right now for a new type of Lyme test which seems to be very reliable and they also test for co-infections in one run.
I got diagnosed with silent migraine a few monts ago but still am doubting if this is the right daignose. Too many weird symptoms, extreme fatigue all the time. and they never leave, just subside for a few days.
The only thing which helped me till now is Low Dose Naltrexone (LDN); at least I'm now relieved of joint pains and aching muscles.
Hi i had this when I was pregnant I had it for months I couldn't get out of bed I suffer with health anxiety and a cancer phobia it got so bad that I had the same symptoms as you it was a feeling of being on some sort of drug spaced out weird vision I couldn't walk properly as if I was on a tilt it was the most horrible experience I was back and forth to the doctors and they kept telling me it was the anxiety and depression I felt as if I was dead but was still communicating with people it slowly disapeared and now I have to try so hard to stay calm or I feel myself slipping back into the strange feelings I hope you feel back to normal soon
Sadly I never worry about me- its my kids but in the last year I have mot had a choice. Only reason I ever went and had sleep studies because I literally coul dfall asleep at a red light. I could put my car in park and nod off and my kids could tell me it was green. I always think nah it cant happen to me. I am in my 40's and off and on since my teen years I have suffered with chronic fatigue. I could sleep in class. Put my head on desk and out. But the last month has been debilitating. I cross fit , and I had to put that on old for now. I am too exhausted.
Have you been tested for Narcolepsy? My brother-in-law suffers from it and he will fall asleep in the middle of a conversation. Hate to sound like I'm pressuring you but, if you can fall asleep at a red light with your children in the car, what's to stop that happening to you driving on the highway? We are all on your side here, Sweetie so please get this checked out. Promise?
I was having the same exact feelings, episodes, heavy feeling in my head, my brain covered in a fog, can not get motivated, can not set daily plans, anxiety when I would have to talk to anyone outside of my family and finally I took a stand to get help from my doctor.
The week before going to a doctor I couldn't even talk to my kids as I was in a complete no zone of any thoughts. I would do my daily routines of taking dad to VA and kids to school, then come home,and literally pass out as if I haven't slept in days. I knew it was depression, yet I wasn't angry or upset. I was a bit sad and very lethargic.
I would sleep all night and much of the day, yet I felt like I was still tired. It was all
I was once a CNA and Phlebotomist. I was the kind hearted woman to help those in need of care, love and compassion. I was at the bedside of many who where in a hospice stage until they passed. I was the one to hold a family together during the loss of their family member offering support, love and compassion walking them through this stage. So, I have seen depression among many and That is how I finally realized I needed help myself. I am an Empath who wears my heart on my sleeve. So, I feel everything with my heart before it reaches my brain.
I was given buPROPion HCL XL 150MG. This is for major depression and seasonal depression. It helps restore the brain. Very few side effects unlike other meds.
I thought I was the only one! I totally know how you feel. Did you find anything out?
Taylor, same exact story, except its been going on for about 9 years. Hope someone somewhere finds answers, and a cure!!!
I want to offer you a somewhat different insight as to your brain fog and various other issues because I had a very similar episode that went unchecked for several years. One day I bumped into a friend I hadn't seen for a long time and he asked how I was feeling (he happened to be a clinical phycologist and the world's number one specialist in biofeedback and neural feedback) so I told him I felt spaced out, foggy, tired and unable to concentrate.
That got me a visit to his office in Calgary (Canada) where he explained how the brain works in regard to its various brain wave patterns.
He ran a bunch of tests and determined I was stuck in Alpha. How did he figure that out? Briefly, he attached electrodes to various parts on my scalp (totally painless) that were hooked to a computer. Then I wore goggles that had tiny lights embedded in them (they were designed so I couldn't see thru them). We know that our brains are affecting by many things, including flashing lights. So the computer measured my brain waves (Alpha) then programmed the mini-lights in the goggles to flash at a sequence that would attact my brain to reach Beta.
The best way I can describe it is for you to hold both hands in front of you and make like they are duck beaks. Now slowly open and close your left hand so your thumb and first finger touch every second or so. Now do the same with your right hand but speed it up so your finger and thumb touch twice a second. Now, your slower left hand 'senses' the faster right hand and begins to search for it. When it comes into contact, it begins to mimic the speed of the right hand. So your left hand represents your Alpha brain wave state and your right hand represents the Beta state as programmed by the computer. So the exercise serves to pour a little oil in the old gear box. The process is called ENTRAINMENT and after just two 20 minute sessions, I felt something very strange happen, like I'd been in a dark world when someone turned on the light. There is a definite science behind Entrainment and you might want to check around (look for a phycologist in your area who offers it).
Hey, are you still active on here? I got tested for brain waves a year ago and they were found abnormal but I wasnt able to finish anything with that. If you are still active, PM me!
I don't know if this is the smae thing but I seem to have a mild case of these symptoms and I have noticed a slow progression over two years. What I mean is that I had really good memory, to the point where I could memorize whole chapters in books, now I have situations where I am doing homework or someone asks me a question and I know I know what it's asking but when I try to remember I feel as if I hit a wall of fog and it feels like it slowly gets bigger. I also feel disconected from everything, but it comes and goes in days, or weeks, or even hours sometimes. I also want to know if it is common to get irritated with small things. Also I am worried becuase I can stare at a blanc wall and feel a almost numb throbbing pain but I can think nothing. I am aware of everhting but I feel a thousand thouts but I am so uninterested in thinking or doing anyhtng to the point where I think nothing. Sorry I am very worried because the descriptions are very familiar to me and I want to know if this is just me or that I am not becmoig slowly crazy,
I know all of those feelings. I, too, used to have a great memory and could study easily, but now I can't complete a word finder puzzle without struggling intensely.
I am only 19 years old, by the way.
Everything you've decribed are exactly the same symptons I'm having. I've been like this for the past 3 years, but I'm fairly certain that what caused it was the car accident I was in. For the first year I was really worried about it. I went to my doctor and he told me I had anxiety and depression, which I knew I didn't have, but I did what he said and took the meds he gave me for 2 months. Didn't notice any change, so he uped the dosage and that made it worse, so I eased off and stopped taking them.
I recently went back to my doctor about it because my memory is getting much worst. I redescribed how i was feeling and now he thinks I have ADHD(which I'm almost certain I've always had).
I have the same issue, think a traumatic brain injury made me sluggish and foggy, and was told to take Celexa for six months.
My doctor had me on 10mg of cipralex per day for a month, i felt no different, so he uped the dosage to 20mg for the next month, and it actually made it noticably worse somehow.
Thats excactly what I'm thinking but my doctor doesnt believe that.
I don't think so, i have some symptoms of ptsd like memory loss, not sleeping right, lack of emotion, etc. But I'm definitely not having any nightmares, flashbacks or self destructive behaviour, and my traumatic event is long past and it rarely enters my mind. sorry for the really really late reply :P
What I feel is something I really hope no one ever feels. It is horrible. I feel like I can't remember a single thing that happens, it's almost like I have absolutely no memory at all (not short or long term) all gone. Even while writing this, I can't even remember what I have written in the lines before, and my brain is too shut down to fully express how I feel. It is debilitating. Waking up is the scariest thing, because the day demands of normal everyday tasks that I feel I am truly unable to do, yet I suffer through them everyday. My life is so nice, and the saddest part is that I can't enjoy it. This feeling I have is worse than the worst of torture.
Hey I completely know exactly what you mean word for word. I know it feels like you're the only one but it gets better. Keep your head and don't let anyone tell you it's depression or anxiety. Keep your ego and who you are. We will find a solution to it If you know anything about it please message me and let me know. I feel the exact way for a year or two now I can't even remember at all
I know exactly how you feel you brought tears to my eyes and no one understands it
I feel u hun. For me it's post natal depression
Hi sarah i feel the same .did you find anything that helps pls let me know 😯
Im feeling the same way .did you find any answers or anything that helps?
Sarah i am exactly the same .please let me know how you are doing and if you found anything that helps.. empty mind absolutely no memories
hey, have you had any long term stress or trauma? i follow this thread for the same symptoms and have had fatigue, fog, dissociation for years. forgetting can be down to repression. don't want to scare you if it's not true for you but it can be the physical response to long term stress! get a blood test just in case because these symptoms can also be linked to lyme. best of luck to you))
Sarah ,how are you ?please message me, im feeling the dame way..
I know I have been gluten intolerant for several years and I take efforts to reduce and cut out gluten from my diet. I get the usual symptoms of bloatedness and swollen abdomen. If I have bread (wheat flour) it affects me significantly within a few hours, stops me sleeping, servere brain fog, heavy depressed feeling in my head, poor memory and concertration, headache. Otherwise, running is my magic cure.
I wonder if a lot isn't due to being on the internet, and using other electronic devices. My symptoms have become much worse in the last month and in direct proportion to the amount of time I spend on this blasted computer. It is difficult to stay off the computer, or whatever device you use, but I believe it must be done, and it must be done for at least a week to see what might improve. To keep electronic use to no more than one hour per day, apart from work, would be better than nothing.
Exactly same is with me...
But still m suffering....
For two years i took treatment from psychiatrist and feel only 50% treated but nw whn i ended those medication my condition is same again...
Every point which u described fits on me...
I m also mobile addictive nw... Coz of confusion... Nd state of zero mind all the time
Im the same did you find anything that helps ?
I have a similar story though with a long history of malnutrition. But even now that I eat normal again my mental symptoms that started back in summer 2014 didn't improve much. It has gotten much worse leaving me mentally unable to remember and think properly. I too was known for an excellent memory. All gone like my friends and joy for life.
I will continue substituting my deficiencies and also check my blood pressure because the pulse in my throat, eyes, head is so strong and even visible on my belly.
I also noticed a need for deep breathing and frequent yawning like I'm not getting enough oxygen although substituting necessary nutrients and getting necessary fats.
Neurological or hormonal imbalances could also be behind it but I can't deal with all this.
If I didn't see no improvement by the time papers are due I will stop caring altogether.
I agree with phil37826, all of your symptoms could well be coming from a gluten intolerance. I'm 24 and I have all your same symptoms. I used to suffer with depression and anxiety much more in the past so I know the brain fog from depression and this is slightly different because I'm currently not feeling depressed. A few weeks ago I stopped eating gluten and I actually felt much better, and told myself to not eat it anymore but then I did anyways and the brain fog started to creep back and the memory loss and just feeling like i wasn'the all there, it actually wasn't that bad until today I had a piece of a baguette and I felt HORRIBLE afterwards, I pretty much passed out because I was so tired. Like others have said I exercise and eat relatively healthy and even do yoga everyday which is why I know the brain fog is not due to depression or anxiety or stress anymore. I'm going gluten free for good now because I hate feeling this way. I'm also very intelligent and used to have the best memory and be able to multitask and focus and concentrate and I want that all back, so we shall see. I hope you and everyone else on here find your answer at some point.
Hello Taylor. I am Amy, 21, mother of one. I am diagnosed with Bipolar with depression , borderline personality disorder, PTSD and once was diagnosed with Manic Depression and experienced depression during my pregnancy.
Have you been tested for the gene mutation mthfr? I recommend that you do. Im homozygous 1298. It is crazy what how it affects your system. I just got my results and ive been experiencing everything on this thread. It is very common but not normal. Please google it, it may help!
If this is your first time EVER experiencing depression, you will have a tough time coping. No doubt about it. When I first got depression at the age 17, it took me nearly 6 months to stop being suicidal. It took me more than a year to accept that I had an illness. Not to discourage you, but it took nearly two years to learn to live with it. Thinking back to it now, I should've sought help sooner. You can really curb the effects depression has on you. Seek help as soon as possible. I let mine fester for 7 years until I developed terrible anxiety. The more you let depression take it's course, the harder it will be to undo habits. All my best wishes to you! Things do get easier. If there's anything depression teaches you, it's PATIENCE.
I got server anxiety while pregnant and depression. My daughter is now 17 months and I'm still low anxious and exhausted. It's like walking through wet thick sand or been in a dark tunnel trying to find the end. I can't expect that this is my life I can't be like this !!! I see a phyciatrist I'm on my second antidepressant now it's been 15 weeks on it
I think you have Lyme disease. I got a message like this and it saved my life. I don't have the timeto explain and reply to every single person affected. Research Lyme disease and brain fog. I hope it helps and wish you the best
I agree laura, i have similar symptoms and haven't been diagnosed yet. Would make a whole lot of sense
The posted question/thread is me down to a tea it's like been in a messed up dream world and then I first got it after my son I though I was dying, how can depression anxiety do this to you? I had nothing to be depressed about. Then I got it again after my daughter so I knew what it was but again it's so hard to believe because it's so awful and strange to feel in this fog.
I know this is an old post, but i thought i would reply. I had the exact same symptoms and went to many doctors/specialists, had mri's, ct scans, and blood tests. After 8 years I was finally diagnosed with Celiac Disease. Additionally, my vitamin D levels were extremely low (8ng/ml). I had doctors wanting to diagnosed me with depression mainly due to the fatigue), but they were overlooking the most important criteria, a depressed mood. I did start having panic attacks many years after living with brain fog, memory loss, fatigue, but it was mainly due to my brain fog. It was hard to interact with others. On really bad days i could barely comprehend what people were talking about. I was much better after my vitamin D levels leveled out, but i still experience extreme brain fog (sometimes for months) if i eat something with gluten.
I only recently discovered this post and I am thankful that you have offered your experience. I have been living with fatigue, memory loss, perceived learning difficulties, difficulty paying attention etc. I don't have the money to go spending on various tests. I'm not sure where even to start. How did you discover you were low in Vitamin D? Is there a general blood test for various deficiencies? How long did it take you being gluten free to notice an improvement? And I'm curious about how you keep yourself fed. I'm a thin and fit guy who is often hungry.
I am in the dilemma. I'm 45 and afraid I will lose job. I started cholesterol meds and thought it was causing it so I quit taking then but I'm still really bad. I'm gonna have dr test me for Lyme disease. I've had a stress test cause of chest pains and I go for results tomorrow. I've thought about mold in house. Or even lead or mercury poisoning. I'm gonna double check thyroid. Went to a neurologist last week and they don't think that it's anything neurological. Some nights are better than others but every morning starts off really bad. I'm on Lexapro already if anxiety and I really don't think it's that.
It's hard to even write this. I keep stopping and dreaming about what I want to say but I can't get it out. I just have a feeling of wanting to stare into space and just float away.
I tried to get an EEG for two years now, but the neurologists I went to didn't think it to be relevant... I think it's relevant, especially in combination with an immune system profile. But what I think doesn't seem to relevant either.
Over the last 18 month my daytime tiredness became a lot worse, with it my cognitive functions declined too. At times I do things and then right afterwards I can`t recall what I just did. Bright lights are a big problem too. A year ago I had moments where I had brief spells where I felt fairly normal. They could last for a few minutes, few hours or if I was lucky I had a couple of days where I felt almost normal. Those periods don`t happen at all anylonger.
With this problem. I have been experiencing this for years
And have been trying to fight it so much. Just like you I have changed my diet, I have tried running on the treadmill
So my brain could produce more serotonin and I even take Prozac because it helps your brain produce serotonin as well and still I am foggy, lost and and can't retain info. Now this is a phase cause it comes and goes and right now I have it at a very bad time cause I just got a job with usaa and I'm in training and noting sticking to my brain and I've been a banker for 10 yrs. it's like the switch just went off. J hope it comes back on pretty quick but it's pretty sad doctors don't have a diagnosis for it.
Thanks for sharing. The coming and going seems to mimic my symptoms. Question #1 how do you know its s serotonin problem?. #2 out of curiosity, did you do drugs in your past? Ecstasy etc?. #3. Does the intensity chance? # Do you feel like the prozac helps?
Thank you Pajjah for replying to my post. Yes, I use to do cocaine about 10 yrs. ago and did it for about 10 yrs. also but I have been experiencing this since my high school years in the late 80's and early 90's. That's when it started. I didn't start using cocaine till I was 23yrs. Old in 1996. As I mentioned I no longer use drugs but that's not to say it didn't had to the problem. Also, the left side of the back of my head hurts sometimes. Right in the dead center of my back of the head on the left side. I have to get my wife to rub it and man does it put me in another world when she rubs it. It's a pain like a tingle sensation, cold sensation and then she runs it and it's like I feel it flowing or something. I've had it checked and nothing so I don't know what it could be along with damn fogginess.
You're a lucky man to have the option of a back rub down from a wife . My marriage couldn't get through this foggyness and is sadley ending now. Thanks for the feedback. Let me know if you come up with anything and I'll do the same.
well i have been tested for lyme, HIV, syphilis, lupus, lead, vit. B & D and other things i can't think of. nothing to show. I am waiting on a sleep apena testing results now. 7 weeks and counting. praying for sleep apena right about now.
My name is Andrew, and I'm really hoping that someone reading this will be able to offer some help, advice or share your stories further, Did you find diagnoses, treatment and did you return to normal?\nHere is my story, Please get in touch if you think you can help me as I can't continue for much longer. On Wednesday 25th May, I returned home early from work having been unwell for the previous three weeks with what was initially diagnosed as a Quinsy abscess/severe Tonsillitis, During this time I was extremely unwell and prescribed three different types of Antibiotics, I'm not sure if this initial illness is in some way linked to what I'm going to share, But it gives a full picture of what's been happening. During this period of time, alongside being extremely physically unwell, I was experiencing overwhelming feelings of stress, anxiety and worry having recently started a new job and being in my probationary period, having to take time off sick which was unpaid and worrying about a number of financial implications and a few on going personal issues.
I returned home on Wednesday 25th May and at this point in time my cognitive functioning and thought process was clear. I felt physically exhausted and decided to have a nap at around 6pm, I woke up around 8pm with a very faint pain in my head, and feeling in what I can only describe as a state of shock about my current situation of being unwell, worried about my new job, money, being able to pay the rent if I didn't pass my probation due to sickness etc. I felt in a state of shock, and suddenly I was unable to think, unable to process thoughts, I closed my eyes to try and get to sleep and suddenly there was nothing? I've always had a very sharp mind, clear loud thoughts and a photographic memory but suddenly there was nothing? I immediately panicked and contacted my mother to try and explain what was happening, I suddenly had a blank mind. Like someone had turned the switch to off? I couldn't visualise anything, couldn't process thoughts, It's like I closed my eyes and there was nothing there - If you asked me to imagine a tropical island or an animal I couldn't. My vision was blurred, I felt spaced out, anything that happened I suddenly couldn't remember, or something that happened five minutes ago felt/feels like it was months ago, I can't remember anything visually since this happened. I can remember things factually (Who I am, where I live etc but that's it), I immediately went to my GP to explain what had happened and the fact I suddenly was unable to sleep, was experiencing memory loss, blurred vision, spaced out and felt extremely distant and depersonalised, I was told it seemed like an after effect of my throat infection and things would improve and was given sleeping tablets, I returned home unsatisfied with the result but positive and hopeful things would return to normal. They didn't and I returned multiple times to little success, or further prescriptions of sleeping tables etc but I didn't feel like they were taking it seriously, The GP consulted a Neurologist and I was told there was nothing to worry about. My symptoms continued and in a state of desperate panic I went to A&E to seek further help, I was given a CT Scan which came back negative which was a huge relief and again was told it seemed like a hangover effect from being unwell but again I didn't feel this was giving me any answers, I returned home and continued to feel exactly the same. After two weeks of not sleeping, I slowly managed to fall asleep naturally again on and off which was a huge relief however since May 25th, I have constant memory loss, I can't remember anything that happened five minutes ago or I feel like it was months ago, I feel constantly spaced out, dazed, blurred and like I have constant brain fog, I'm exhausted, I can't process thoughts, Or the thoughts in my head are suddenly non existent - The only way I can describe it. I have a constant light pain around the front of my head, I can't sleep, I can't function. I'm on the verge of losing my job and being unable to pay the rent and bills which is causing further stress and worry and I'm on the verge of killing myself because I can't continue like this.
You're not alone. Do you have a family member to live with while some serious diagnosing is done. Hang in there. Negative thinking will snowball everything. I can personally relate. I'm just going through a separation basically because I can't get my clear head back. Im about to lose my sales Management position too I think. It's unthinkable for me but better days are ahead. Have you attempted meds?. Trying exercise?.
Unfortunately not, I don't really have any family and had quite a difficult childhood and early life so sadly there isn't really anyone I can fall back on, I'm not sure if what I'm experiencing is a combination of long term stress and worry or if there's something underlying.
I'm sorry to hear you are experiencing similar symptoms, and hope you are able to get through this too! I feel too spaced out to exersize at the moment, I wish I could!
I know exactly how tou feel ...i also started losing my mind after being on antibiotics ..pls let me know how you are doing and if you found anything that helps ....😯
Hey Taylomason, I've had the exact symptoms your describing for 2 months now with no sign of it going away. Whatever it is, has it gone away yet, and what have you done to stop it. Please, I need help.
Hi everyone. I understand that everyone here has some kind of brain fog issue or they would not have found this forum. I myself have been suffering from the same issue, I gave it the name \"brain fog\" before I knew that other people used it too.
Before you skip over this post let me say that I found something that worked for me, this may sound like a pitch, but it's true. I'm not selling anything and it cheap to try it for yourself...but first, a little history to show that I'm serious that I had this. If you don't care about me, skip to the end.
I apologize in advance for my English. I am their Russia.
Two years I can’t understand what’s wrong with me. Visit a lot of doctors and no one can help.
i began following this forum when i first encountered all of these same symptoms myself back in the summer of 2017. for two years, i visited countless doctors and have received multiple diagnoses.
well today i was informed that my bloodwork came back positive for lupus. now, i don't think you all have lupus, but i recommend you all get tested for it. i don't experience any of the skin flare ups, so i never thought it could be the culprit. it could explain the head and face pressure, as it causes inflammation. can't believe it took two years to figure it out, but at least i have an answer.
over the last two years, adderall 15 mg and evekeo 5 mg has worked for me. the depression was a result of not being able to live the active life i was used to living, so instead of treating the depression, we treated the fatigue. it helped. it made me so productive and energetic, i almost felt normal. the depression and anxiety subsided. actual anti-depressants simply made me crazy.
it's been quite the journey and ive learned a lot about myself and this collective condition/symptoms/management of it all these last two years. i managed to still graduate college a year early and im planning on going back for my masters. if you guys ever need someone to talk to about this, please send me a message. i remember how hopeless i once felt, and i'd like to help.
i think i am having the same thing.... but does anyone get the tingling in your head and the feeling like you aren't comprehending what is going on for about 10-20 seconds? i believe i am also going through peri-menopause
"Hi 😃\nthere is medicine available to help. i had all the symptoms and more, but fully recovered!
I am on zoloft 100 mg, remeron 15 mg, lamictal and rivotril. this combo took the crazyness away and now starting to slowly wean off.
i dont know if i can take it any longer i feel so off like im not here like i cant think i cant talk i just feel really awful like im gonna die any minute i wish i could just end my life so i dont have to keep feeling like this anymore i just want to do things like go places or make friends i have no friends . im am i here still to live like this it feels like god is punishing me. i just feel like yelling just kill me already i hate my life!
Hi Taylor, I was reading your post and have so many of your symptoms. I was wondering if you found anything that helped you get your life back ?
I know most of us have gone to professionals only to find little wrong, so why not try these other methods. You got this!
I am experiencing some really strange things with my head. I have a little insight as to what is going on, but it requires an open mind. I have never had any sort of anxiety that changes my brain chemistry and I take zero prescription drugs. I have only had one episode of brain fog in my life that may have been caused by poor diet and too much sugar. That situation could have been a vitamin deficiency. However, this situation has been described as \"ascension\" symptoms and sickness. If you have been to doctors and had run all the tests and are still confused you might want to research this. As it was explained to me is that this sort of thing is an adjustment or upgrade allowing your body to become a light body. So, if you have not discovered any medical reason for this try to eat more vegetables and cut sugar from your diet as this may help. Anyway, I saw that you were a young person struggling with this and I wanted to reach out to you and present to you something that is a it \"out there\" but a lot of us are experiencing. Good Luck.
I had this 12 years ago, to the extreme, spent a month at the hospital also. in my case, the cause was anxiety. 2 years on zoloft helped. i have also read that lamictal sometimes helps together with an atidepressant.
The last year of my life has been a brutal one. At the age of 22, I am in the lowest of lows and I desperately need some help!
Here’s my tale:
About a year ago, a couple months after an extremely strenuous relationship, I began noticing that I was tired all the time…and all around, I wasn’t really satisfied. Don’t get me wrong, I still enjoyed my friends, and activities…but life just wasn’t as bright and vibrant anymore after a month of noticing this ever-present fatigue, it got a bit stronger. I would wake up each morning completely zombie-mode…and that feeling would remain throughout the entirety of my day, until my head hit my pillow that evening.
The fatigue and the weight of the world slowly got worse over the next handful of months, UNTIL I woke up one morning and everything escalated greatly. I felt completely stoned. I couldn’t think right. I couldn’t concentrate. I felt inebriated. I felt totally disconnected and spacey. I felt as though I had no control over myself. I lost drive and motivation. I lost a lot of confidence. I always had an incredibly sharp memory. It was actually something well known about me to those in my family and friend circles. Yet, on this morning, almost all new information could not be retained. Things that happened earlier in the day, by evening, I felt they happened a day or two before. I could no longer recount the activities I took part in. This is possibly the worst of all the symptoms. The extreme short term memory. I have no context for time and I sort of feel like I’m just floating through life suffering.
For months I visited doctors getting tested by specialists. I visited a neurologist, infectious disease, I had an MRI, & I had about 20 different blood tests. NOTHING. My doctor literally said “I have no idea what this could be. I am beside myself” TOTES reassuring! I tried altering my diet entirely to organic and all natural. I continued my workouts and ran 15 miles a week. I tried sleeping even earlier. I tried all I could think of .\nI have scoured the message boards and found a few people suffering from the same, but without answers.\nI’m not sure if depression is the culprit, but depression sure has found its nasty venom-coated fangs into my veins. Tired, depressed, failed memory, no drive, scared…it’s no way to live. I want my life back.
Initially, I suspected some form of sleeping disorder. I set up a sleep study, got my thyroid checked, ferritin levels, all the basics. Sleep study revealed I sleep just fine and all my other blood tests came back negative.
😦 thank you for replying. I feel the same.
no some things actually made it worse. when you take all these things you get out of balance and I believe that also makes it worse. i have been avoiding alcohol, and sugar - trying to eat clean and exercise that seems to help a little
Did any of those treatments help with the brain issues? I'm in the same boat, I had/have Lyme but am also sensitive to radiation from cell phones, Wifi, DECt phones, cell towers etc. so difficult to say what causes what.
yes all kinds of memory and focus problems I've been on many different antibiotics over the years and lots of other lyme treatments
I have seen so much lately about how stress can affect you brain so negatively! They say prolonged stress leads to focus issues and memory problems. I REALLY feel this is alot of my problem! I feel like its cyclical though... i worry about my brain fog, concentration and memory issues which makes my stress level higher and the symptoms get worse.
its different for each person. you need to investigate for yourself the underlying problem. For me it’s Lyme and seems to be for several others. I also have Candida and other immune things going on which also could be the problem. One last thing is I suffer for anxiety and stress which also can contribute. Look at these things and be an investigator of your health and try and narrow it down.
wonder if anyone felt these symptoms coming after being on antibiotics ?!my life is ruined totally.
All the stuff you got prescribed is suppressive medication. Nothing wrong with that in itself but it doesn't heal you, especially if it doesn't work at all like in your case.
I'm not sure if I have the right place but here goes nothing. I have peripheral neuropathy in my feet and rheumatoid arthritis and degenerative disc disease. I also have anxiety along with it. For the neuropathy, rheumatoid arthritis and degenerative disc disease all the doctors gave me is gabapentin which does nothing for the nerve pain relief. He also put me on carbomazepine for the anxiety but that doesn't work either. I had been on nortriptyline and that was doing nothing either so I took myself off of that and my primary care physician just gave me buspar to try. So far it hasn't kicked in. I have had lyrica, cymbalta, celexa and effexor and they made things much worse. if anyone has any ideas let me know.
Im assuming you didnt have any EXTREME physical symptoms or EXYREME memory loss..NO THIS IS NOT IN MY HEAD ...my brain is fried with pressure burning sensations and a million pains ...so no its not anxiety or depression ...im glad you made it 😉
Everybody please take this with a grain of salt, but I was finally able to feel like my oldself again - I got rid of my Obsessive Compulsive tendencies. I was online every day and night reading these forum covincing myself something was wrong with me. I spent a few thousand dollars on office visits to find out why I wasnt feeling “normal\".
Anxiety and Depression are also symptoms of MOLD toxicity. While living in toxic mold I was also diagnosed and treated for anxiety, but while the meds helped, it didnt fix all of the issues. Be aware, houses that look perfectly fine can have water damage and mold.Thank you for this response I am now going on 5 years living this way. Mine started from having a panic attack at a funeral. I thought it would go away but it got worse and worse. So do you have any more information on how to go about how to get rid of the causes of the anxiety I'm desperate and I miss my life before this happened. I have a six year old son and I can't even play outside with him for too long without wanting to go back inside and stayin what I think is a safe space but none of it is really. I'm missing his childhood from this and it breaks my heart so very much. If you were able to get out of this I applaud you so much.
I can totally relate to everything you’ve said! I’ve been dealing with this for about a year. My anxiety, Brian fog, forgetfulness, sadness, loss of interest etc. symptoms are starting to subside. I’ve always been a worrier but this ramped up last year when my son moved out and off to college. I was so sad, crying all the time and then the brain fog kicked in. I thought I was losing my mind. This year my son tranferred 11 hours from home (last year he was 5 minutes from home) so I of course have been worried that all this fuzziness and brainfog will come rushing back. I’ve tried not to worry and focus on my own sadness but rather focus on the good...the new experience she my son is getting to have, him becoming an independent adult, etc. it is for sure helping. Thanks you for the advice!
I've recently emerged from a five year struggle with severe anxiety disorder and bouts of depression. Brain fog was hands down my worst symptom. I had short-term memory loss, difficulty following conversations, difficulty speaking/getting my words out, couldn't process information well, whether it be spoken or written, and many others. It got so bad, I feared even having conversations with people, even my family, wife, and best friends. I nearly lost my job because I was having such a hard time thinking and communicating. My marriage and relationships suffered. I basically became a hermit in my house. It was the most difficult time of my life.
I write the above with brain fog symptoms for over a year. Diagnosed with general anxiety disorder. Extreme levels where I felt dizzy, not with it, tired, spaced out, feint. I couldn't drive sometimes. I couldn't walk or be in crowded areas. I couldn't escape the thoughts. I forgot things. I panicked alot. Constantly worried about my health. They dominated my life 24/7. So i havent written the above with any naivety to the seriousness of the symptoms of brain fog. The community we have however is amazing... and we can all help eachother
I can totally relate to everything you’ve said! I’ve been dealing with this for about a year. My anxiety, Brian fog, forgetfulness, sadness, loss of interest etc. symptoms are starting to subside. I’ve always been a worrier but this ramped up last year when my son moved out and off to college. I was so sad, crying all the time and then the brain fog kicked in. I thought I was losing my mind. This year my son tranferred 11 hours from home (last year he was 5 minutes from home) so I of course have been worried that all this fuzziness and brainfog will come rushing back. I’ve tried not to worry and focus on my own sadness but rather focus on the good...the new experience she my son is getting to have, him becoming an independent adult, etc. it is for sure helping. Thanks you for the advice!
Hmmm I'm wondering if I have mild in my house. We do have water damage inside the house in the ceiling and we've had multiple leaks. The only thing is I live in the house with my family and no one else has the symptoms I'm displaying. I do have an attic in my closet and my whole closet has a foul odor. I wonder if that is mold related or something else.
Mold!!!!\nI posted here with the symptoms of brain fog, memory loss, fatigue, etc. last year and just two weeks ago I found out that my rental house was full of multiple types of toxic mold. I moved and the symptoms have subsided! I highly recommend that anyone having these symptoms have their home tested for mold ASAP, especially with a history of water damage.
Has anyone had a PET scan? I'm wondering if I should have one done. I see a lot of people have done MRIs. Would that include with contrast? Mine was only done without contrast that's why I ask. I'm not sure what the difference is between the two and what without contrast shows versus with contrast. I'm having a lot of these same problems too. It's truly so depressing. My neurologist literally said she doesn't know what's causing it and suggested I should just take ginkgo biloba. Only problem is my psych said ginkgo interacts with a lot of psychotropic medications. It's like I can't win ughh
I don't like the way this forum is structures, but I think I have found some things that have helped me.
The last year of my life has been a brutal one. At the age of 22, I am in the lowest of lows and I desperately need some help
About a year ago, a couple months after an extremely strenuous relationship, I began noticing that I was tired all the time…and all around, I wasn’t really satisfied. Don’t get me wrong, I still enjoyed my friends, and activities…but life just wasn’t as bright and vibrant anymore after a month of noticing this ever-present fatigue, it got a bit stronger. I would wake up each morning completely zombie-mode…and that feeling would remain throughout the entirety of my day, until my head hit my pillow that evening.
"i can relate. the thing is,you can't always believe what your mind says.AFTER YEARS, and i mean years,of therapy, i still have these days when i feel exactly as you describe.On those days,my mind gets locked into that same loop. "" oh whats the use , I'm 65 , ive raised my family,i no longer feel inspired by anything,there's never going to be anything new and exciting in my life,etc. I so easily see the logic in all that. BUT then i remind myself of how much i love a good laugh. Sometimes i can start imagining a comedian doing stand up about my life. My main relief is remembering , I m not always obligated to see me and my thoughts as being inseparable. and sometimes im reminded i am not my thoughts.and then ask myself ,""WHERE the heck did that come from?"" START MOVING START DANCING. i hope you don't mind my 2 cents, but honestly nothing ever stays the same.
I haven't spoken about it to anyone, I cannot see the point, what would they do ""try and talk me down.."", why my mind is made up, it has been for several years I'm just looking for the time that suits me.
"Hello, I feel the same way. I don't feel depressed or manic, I just feel that once I've had enough I see no problem with just ending myself. After all if you were at a party or a club or a bar etc, if you got bored, or didn't enjoy it you would leave, I have just applied this principal to life. I do not find the prospect of living to a ripe old age appealing at all, in fact the thought is horrifying to me. To end up in a chair surrounded by similar types having your bum wiped and being fed by a spoon because your to addled with some sickness to feed yourself - no thanks.
Not sure if there is an answer for this, just writing. I'm not angry, I'm not hurt, I'm not even sad as such, I'm just tired...
I just feel I'm never going to be happy, I am soon to be much a burden on those around me (my gf) and that, in the long run, it'd be better for all if I just went. I know my family and gf love me - but time heals, life would get better and people move on. In the long run I'm sure it wouldn't effect my family and 100% sure my gf would be better off.
I know this sounds odd, but I don't even have the will to get 'better', largely because I don't think I can. I am just 'me'. I am negative, boring and even if it is all just selffullfillng profecies - it's still me who has done that. I'm not blaming life, or others or anything else.
I dip between a wish to not be around that is forever there and seems to be backed up with wholly logical reasons that people genuinely struggle to refute to absolutely crashing panic attacks/ given up when my 'theories' are proved.
So, currently I've quit my job as a teacher, couldn't take it - always something to improve and with my way of thinking that just sounds like constantly someone telling you you're useless (and it backing up your own thoughts anyway) but even though I liked aspects of my job I don't think I had a passion like I see in others. I felt I'd let everyone down so disappeared, my partner/ parents got me through immediate days after my sudden departure from work and saw Doc who was nice enough - put me on medication which seemed to do very little - even after a few months. In fact it only had negative side effects so about three weeks ago I stopped taking them completely. I also started seeing a CBT person about three/four session ago but this feels like it's doing nothing at all either, we talk, I'm honest as I can be but there is some element of being 'public' and putting on that face/ jokey responses.
I have a cycle. Get job, put on confident easy going persona, get physically tired from doing that, lose energy to maintain job, focus on negative, leave job in some form (fired/quit). Friends are much the same, play easy going fun, can't keep it up, lose or push them away. Relationships, get attracted to ones who need help, help them in anyway I can, get to a point where I feel I am no more use so should go as they'd be ultimately better off.
I'm not going to be dramatic and say I'm going to end it, it sounds so pathetic (no offence intended to anyone) but I have thoughts of 'going' or even dreams that I could die 'blamelessly' thorugh accident or illness. Selfish I know.
I have always been pretty useless socially, but have had a normal upbringing, no horrible experiences, have gone through education fine and even got jobs but I've never enjoyed life, never really cared and normally feel like I'm not really worth anything and, inevitably enventually, will become a burden.
im not scared of death i no my family love me and i think i love them i kinda just feel numb its hard to explain i guess i know them and i let them into my life and i dont let many ppl in if i do it just means i have to put on this act for more ppl .
a lot of what you said i have been trying to put into words for a long time but it just comes out like im crazy everyone assumes i have to be depressed im not i see more benefits for my family with me not in the picture.
"I want to die also. I am almost 60, and I look back at my life and realize I have done nothing but hurt the people I love. I have pushed them away. I'm not lonely, I am just worthless and a waste of air. My daughter and my ex best friend will tell you I an toxic. I have always felt defective and have proved that is true. I wish I could go to sleep and not wake up.
There are no easy fixes and no easy words to a depressed individual. To push through day by day min by min is not a easy thing it takes courage determination and a will that refuses eveven thpugh the body is very weak . In most cases as was mine a underline health issue eas the cause. Having pain that puts u in a depressive state but not knowing thats what happened is very dangerous and painfull. Just hang in there it may not get better it might get bearable at best. Having purpose helps . Anything positive helps. But my words will not fix you nor will they ad hope at best you know your not alone and that is something to give support. I may be at the place u were or are. Talking and sharing the road traveled I believe helps. If you can find a group to vent like this where others are going through the same pain at least you know your not alone and we are not just spewing empty words . Our words have substance nutriance and life. They are not spoken from putty or a know it all point of view. our words are of the same dish of pain and suffering. I once heard if we are unable to love a person that has pastaway our sorrow is not of the loss but rather that we are unable to give the love we want to give that causes us sorrow. So in some cases your pain is causes by the fact u just want to love or be loved and have nothing to give and get. That in my opion is a good explanation of pain. Thank for listening and I truly love u all
"So pleased to hear you are still around but just keeping low profile. Like you i am resigned tomthe fact they cannot fix whats wrong for me but i still look for answers. You do well to keep going.
"Hey. I just wanted to say that recently Ive been doing much better. For a little bit of a backstory,,, I went under the Holy Spirit when I was 14. That religious experience was very dramatic and I cant say that I necessarily became very religious after that experience. However in my late 20's I started reading Bible and touching my spiritual essence much more. Then not so much again. BUT, as of late I feel blessed and feel that for the most part I am practicing Gods will. Wanted to tell everyone here that is my experience.. I was in a suicide depression for over 8 months and I feel just as I write this a small hint of dread again, but like I said, something transformed in me and I wanted to share it ThankYou
"I stare at a bottle of pills everyday just thinking when will I take them all and this pain be over I hate my life
"I almost tear up when I read your words as they are the words that are also in my heart and head. It's an awful place to be and we have to draw strength from each other that this is something bigger than us, and not worry if we don't particularly ""fit in"" or even want to ""fit in"". My life feels like a Stepford wives movie, where everyone is perfect and I can't get through to anyone, there's no transparency, live a vicious game that I can't find the door out of. How our heads can play games on us. Anthony Bourdain and Kate Spade show us that wealth, popularity, success and fame do not buy happiness, nor do people telling us to ""be grateful"". I have no answer just to say, I feel your pain, and sincerely believe there will be an end to it. Mine has gone on for 5 years now, and I was always such a positive, happy, person.
"Suicide not even close running away into the wood to live like a hermit might work but the a bear would eat us so not bad but painful. All jokes aside the only way ive been able to cope is day by day and staying away from family thry can be triggers and the worst in time of disstress.your lucky if ur not homeless yet. There is someone alwzys worse off. So for me anger inside anger that is rages on. Im angry at myself for letting myself fall this bad im angry at God a spirit so powerful it can create a universe and here we r suffering because a goverment and society has taken away our right to have a home on empty land. I could live ok on my own but in society people plot to ruine u if your to good at your job .now im jobless carless homeless. I have no reason to wake up anymore . It truly is killing me inside. Why should i bother getting better just so i can be knocked down again. I went through colon surgery survive that for this. I experienced the beauty and love pf God to only be left alone and sad beyond any measure. A hopeless people becaise even hope a fake coping tool has abandoned me. Even the universe that helped me see the whole picture revealed all of it to just leave me in a worse place than before i knew for sure this is a creation. So why cant he help me become a sucess to be a help to others a real help not a for profit help
Without me but I certainly don’t think taking my life is the answer to my problems. I don’t even know what to say. I’m tired of it like I want to fall into a put and lay there for eternity.
"I too am a burden to this. My Friends are the ones hard done by because they are always out having a laugh drinking, socialising and what have you but, lately for about 4 months o have kept pushing them away and not going with them. My family also regularly go out on a weekend but I to avoid it by staying at home or just going somewhere on my own. I want to escape it all the lifestyle I live in and especially my area but just to be free. Girls always seem to effect me negatively as they fall into love but I only hurt and don’t want to continue the story. My honest opinion is that the world would be a better place
Checking myself out is also not a option a desire but im not capable of murder. So i can sit and rot because we are very usefull we have great skills and we even have faitb yup God is real and part of tbe problem. He could fix it but even he has stepped back he could use our willing vessel but doesnt. The evil one has even passed because there is to much good in us even though we are in fact useless. Goverment programs ha nope. So rot away we rot away not by chouce by circumstance. Ill get the ones who say get up go out and make something happen. Did that i wouldnt be doing this if i had that as a option
"I can relate i wanted to respond they make everything into a task . Nothing is worth it ive responded to job ads for training and cant even land tbem . Housing has turned into a business driving is defensive now. Im just so tiredhope is fake always was but we use it to push forward i cant even use fake to make it
Not sure if there is an answer for this, just writing. I'm not angry, I'm not hurt, I'm not even sad as such, I'm just tired...
"I am so tired of life too. I will be 43 soon and I am sick and tired of the repetition, doing the same thing week in week out. Life has become so boring and meaningless. I do not want to change who I am or what I do...I just want to go to bed and never wake up. At this stage in my life I feel that I have done all that I wanted to do. As I get older I also find that I have become increasing tired of people, I put on a brave face but inside I just want to run a mile away from them. The pretense is wearing thin at this stage and I feel that it will only get worse. I also have a growing detest for the way we humans can and do behave towards each other and the way we treat the plant we live on. Turn on the news, read a newspaper, the injustice in this world is shocking, the lives that some people are forced to live is shocking and most people just do not care, the greed, the arrogance + much more...all of it turns my stomach and it makes me resent life. I dream of getting away from everyone and every thing and living a very quite secluded life...living like a hermit I guess...but of course this is not possible because of responsibilities and my financial situation will not allow it. I guess never waking up is the only true and permanent seclusion that is available to me now....hence why I crave it. I would never self harm or kill myself but I do not want to continue either. The more that I think about life, the more meaningless I see it. Whether you are rich or poor, happy or sad, healthy or sick .etc. it is all temporary and the same faith awaits us all...death. Graveyards are full of high achievers and billionaires. When you are dead you are no more so what you achieve in life becomes irrelevant to you...even if you did take pride in it while you were alive. I remind myself of this all the time, I find this very reassuring and it helps me to not take life too seriously. Life is a gift, for sure, but I wish the gift could be returned when you have had enough of it. Sorry for being so pessimistic but years of working hard, struggling, dealing with ass*oles, trying to fit in, repetition, worrying and seeing how we behave towards each other...has worn me out. I know that some people can just keep going and going no matter what but after 42 years I feel that the fight in me has gone....I gave it my best shot and I feel that I am entitled to bow out now. The occasional high that does come my way from time to time is fleeting and it does not give me any reason to want to continue anymore. The thought of hanging around for another 25+ years is depressing. I have never suffered from depression in the past but I feel that it is waiting for me around the corner....beam me up scotty....energize..darn...still here!
"This is such an excellent comment, I also feel that rsjg posts have resounded so well across so many people and I'm one of them. Like you said all the posts here allow me to see that there are many who also have felt so tired of life despite unable to pinpoint a real dramatic event that has occurred in their life, furthermore there isn't a lot of comment on ""you should do this"", it's just a community telling one another about their story and how they feel, filled with all the human emotions. For me who also have lost any real purpose and tired of having to wake up to another day for at least 10 years now, I feel like at this point what I want isn't medication but instead someone to connect to. I mean I probably won't find a way to ""cure"" my thoughts but seeing I'm not alone made me just a bit happy, perhaps enough so that I can continue on a bit longer.
Thank you for letting me be who I am. Long-winded, self important, selfish, self obsessed, ungrateful, intolerant, negative . . . . and maybe human but a bit too much so!
I am not a great supporter of medication for this. All medication if taken in sufficient quantity to be effective is likely to have side effects. And this problem is so fundamental to us and such a product of our thinking that taking a pill does not seem realistic. Only my experience but I was totally unable to explain myself to a professional, I kept making things up and saying what I thought he wanted to hear.
That is not to say hope can't creep in. We would not have carried on if we didn't allow hope at all. But hope seems to be easily crushed by our doubts and fears and apathy. The French have the word 'ennui' which seems to be the exact thing I suffer from. Tired of life. I have tried it the way other people do it, I have tried it my way, I have tried to balance them both and have achieved fleeting satisfaction but it is not sustainable for me. I revert to Default. Even as a child I remember responding to my parents with “can't be bothered”. After 58 years I am tired, I have several health issues and few friends, I thank God for a good day each day but cringe inwardly as I don't really feel that it was. Why do it then? Because there is still a little bit of hope. I try to run through the things which were ok and ask for help to do better tomorrow. It keeps me going.
I tend to push people away subconsciously. Unfortunately there are answers to this but my experience shows me that we will not keep it up. There are lots of answers but the only true answer is to accept who we are. Don't worry what everyone else thinks. Be grateful for what we have. Help others. If we do all that and keep it real we will be in a good place. Life is a journey, there is only one destination. So we have to enjoy the journey or change our mode of transport. I have tried a lot of fairly objective self analysis in a 12 step recovery programme (the addiction was not the problem, it was me) and I understand a lot of my problems and character flaws. But ultimately I will disconnect and look for negatives without some serious work, which I get tired of quickly. There is a lot of bad stuff in the world, our society seems to be fixated on wealth and not well being. There are some who think they are the same. We may disagree I think. On the other hand there are some who give and do wonderful things just naturally, I am not one of them, but i do try when I can despite my lack of altruism in doing it.
"Hi to all who post here and to rsjg who started this. Thank you for giving me this window to connect through. The lack of instruction on what to do is refreshing. And also important. My internal response is always, “don't tell me what to do about this, you don't understand”. Contradictorially (is that a word? Looks like one!) I have the same feeling even if I identify with what you say. So maybe I just want to be allowed to be like this. This is the beauty of rsjg's post for me.
"Thank you! That was helpful to read, and I do agree I am one who thinks about it, but would never be brave enough to do it, or ever that hopeless. I think perhaps it's just a means of reaching out for friendship and non-judgement. I only wish I were in the UK or Ireland, where the pressure to be young, beautiful, confident and extroverted is not as much a part of societal norms as it in here in California. Either that or back home in Australia with family.
"That makes 3 of us - I wrote a suicide note to my best friend this morning - just done with 4 years of crying every day and lost the joy in the little things I used to love. I no longer dance when I cook and that was what defined me.
"I feel the same.. I am tired too
i am tired! hope god will call me soon
i dont want to die but i cant afford to live with pain of emotions that i am worth less and no one needs me!
sometimes not sometimes infact 24x7 i think to end up witg life.
but I am not. I have mental illness not a mental retarted person!
Become burden on others and also lost my farther last year so I'm too much in grief that now what will happen to me who will feed me now! Im an adlut still feel helpless like a small kid!
I'm 35 years divorced woman from India.
And it's really difficult for me too to cope up with life when small thing makes me feel that its end of life!
Well iam diagnosed with BPD borderline personality disorder
I would like to tell you after read your story it seems that i am reading my own!
I really think I would be better off gone since I have no one to start with to begin with.
"I pretty much understand where your coming from. I have felt like that since my divorce 12 years ago and the relationship I'm in right now really makes no sense at all to me.
Not sure if there is an answer for this, just writing. I'm not angry, I'm not hurt, I'm not even sad as such, I'm just tired...
I just feel I'm never going to be happy, I am soon to be much a burden on those around me (my gf) and that, in the long run, it'd be better for all if I just went. I know my family and gf love me - but time heals, life would get better and people move on. In the long run I'm sure it wouldn't effect my family and 100% sure my gf would be better off.
"You are very welcome Chris. It always puzzled me why I had depression from childhood and have problems in relationships. I wasn't beaten or abused etc so I couldn't fathom it. When I came across CEN by chance bells started ringing very loud and it describes my childhood to a tee. Now I understand the roots of my depression. I only wish I had known about it many years ago as my whole life could have been a lot better. x
"Thanks hypercat. Really useful link. I think I experienced one or more of those things from my parents. They were both single children born in the Thirties from very traditional backgrounds and would have no access to the information we have today. I cannot blame them but have never had a close relationship with them. Interestingly my sister rebelled and was a bit wild and I sort of crumpled and shut down. She has a much wider life than me now with children and a partner, whereas I keep myself to myself more but we both have suffered with a depressive outlook and suicidal thoughts. Dunno about her as we aren't close (surprise) but mine continue. Just started really addressing things now, so thanks again for your help.
"This sounds like it may be helpful to me, but I couldn't see a link where you say, look at this? It clicked with me too, as now I feel I am very scared to feel anything again, let alone joy.
According to CEN emotions are what connect us to ourselves and lead us to have a rich and fulfilling emotional life. The good news is you can to some extent teach yourself how to reconnect and I am doing this right now. Have a look at this and see if it can help you. I hope so. x
I came across something called Childhood Emotional Neglect on the internet a couple of years ago and it immediately clicked for me. It is something which until now has been virtually ignored by mental health experts but is gathering pace now. It's to do with never learning to experience and deal with our emotions through a healthy and nurturing environment. Because of this we dampen down our emotions in order to survive then either have great problems learning to reconnect with them or are unable to completely.
"I have been re reading some of the comments here and what strikes me is how many of us feel empty and put a mask on. How we can't find any joy from life and just see it as a burden, and feel one on those around us.
I don't respond well to compliments, I don't know how to handle them , so I will just say 'thank you' for such a lovely post. Yes I'm still here, still going! I'd love to believe your post, but I'd be lying if I said I did!
"I do still reply on here and read every comment but yes, I do find it a little tiring occasionally. I also feel chronically under qualified to help those asking for it. But if someone speaks to me directly I do reply - I've had a few private messages!
"""I know this sounds odd, but I don't even have the will to get 'better', largely because I don't think I can. I am just 'me'. I am negative, boring and even if it is all just selffullfillng profecies - it's still me who has done that. I'm not blaming life, or others or anything else.""
"I can very much appreciate how you feel rsjg. I have a full-life with wonderful children grand kids, a wonderful job and a strength that has gotten me through most anything. But I'm very tired of being here too!!! And I am not depressed!!! And no one will convince me that I am. Drugs are not the answer. I just don't see the point anymore and that doesn't make me sick. I would never do anything to harm myself, but I'm just so done with this place. The bottom line for me is I'm very bored and alone. Mostly alone. I have hobbies that keep me sane. But I never thought I'd be alone this long after a horribly abusive 25 year marriage. I search the web often and ask Google, ""What do I do with the rest of my life?"" like I'm going to find some miracle cure for this life. But I happened upon this thread and just wanted to say Hi! ""Hi!""
"Know how you feel, I feel exactly the same.
A spiritual gem that helps me cope with severe depression and
"I agree that religion in the wrong hands is oppressive and can do much damage psychologically. Many have used religious books, traditions and institutions to dominate, harm and deceive others. I must admit that I tried to use the bible to get my family to do things my way on occassion,....It backfired! I've learned that the bible is a mirror for me to change me and only me. I am not suppose to read it with the hope of changing others. I can share what helps me but ultimately their life is their choice. God gave each person free will to choose whether we serve him or not. No one but God should judge our decision. Actually Jehovah God has given Jesus the authority to judge but I digress. : )
"I think religion plays a major role in mental health i tried to work out from the very beginning why this is affecting me tracing it all back and realised that i was brainwashed. I sometimes would rather not have known or rather not been told about God and whilst i believe there must be i'd have rather worked this out myself if i was ever going to. I have honestly thought about suing over this but i'd have more chance of winning the lottery. I asked my mother why i was put in a catholic school she replied because i was and whilst this made me angry because it was the exact answer i was dreading but expecting i don't blame her as i don't think a lot of people understand how it can negatively affect someones mental health.
"First, I need to say thank you for your candid post. It truly is too bad such conversation is not valued and freely discussed with true support given in the family, in school, in the workplace and so forth but there is a time and place for all things. This forum, your words, gave voice to my feelings. I cherish and am nourished by such discussions! Instead of accepting one another as we are people want to fix us with medication or heap more stress on us by pushing us to leave our comfort zone and follow our dreams, goals and ambitions! Cast caution to the wind, risk your life, do what you have to to get ahead! I've been told I'm too nice as though it is a negative. I've felt crushed and inadequate by constructive feedback, advice and suggestions. I quit my job 6 years ago (retail shift manager)because of severe anxiety. I loved helping customers but was not leadership material. I am uneducated by the world's standards but I understand things pretty clearly. i have difficulty expressing myself which is very frustrating. My brain glitches and for the most part seems empty. I cant carry on a conversation because i dont seem to have many thoughts. I feel confused, drained, unworthy and stupid. Ive wanted to ""leave"" everyday for 15 years. I am clinically depressed and so are millions of other people. Ive analyzed and picked apart everything said to me and everything I've said to others. I've felt like a burden to my husband. Do I think my family will be better off without me? Not anymore but I used to. What helps me? Knowing that the way the world is set up is not conducive to good mental or physical health. Knowing that mankind as a whole is flawed. I feel unworthy and inadequate because I am... and so is every human. I know you have your views on religion and it's understandable because it has failed to do what it's designed to do which is to direct mankind to the true God. The hypocrisy, greed and complete disregard for what God wants has resulted in as you say the blind leading the blind. The most intelligent men on earth (scientists, doctors, engineers, lawyers, professors, political and relgious leaders, etc) have been unable to solve the very basic problems of mankind ie; wars, crime, violence, poverty, homelessness, hopelessness, disease, corruption, drug addiction, the list goes on endlessly. Its no wonder depression has increased by leaps and bounds. We'd be crazy not to be depressed. Those who are coping or appear to be handling things well (my husband included) have resigned themselves to the madness with such sayings as ""it is what it is"" and ""get yours"" oh and my favorite ""you think too much""...... There is hope, there are solutions, there are answers. Can you guess which Religion I am? It's also weird that since I joined my religion I became more depressed because I became more aware. Keep knocking, keep searching and praying. You will know the truth... you will be set free...... Sorry so choppy!
"I don't have depression even through I probably should after what happened to me but it's just that everything is boring my life is a never ending repeating routine so I'm just like what am I doing what does suicide guarantee me a escape no one knows if that really is it
"I almost cried when I read your post, as the feelings you express are just as I feel - that sick empty sinking hole is so very crippling, and I do not know what to do either. I don't know how old you are but I am 58 and even done with my career. How I wish we could find the cause of this pure agony, worse than any physical pain, and denying us the fullness of life and hope. All I can offer is that you are not alone.
"I too feel done with life. Not suicidal just tired of the struggle. I get no joy from anything or anyone. I love my family but I seem to dread being around them. I love my job but I always dread going to work and dread coming home from work. I am just tired of it all and feel like the best of life is behind me andi have nothing to look forward to in the future but the end. I’ve tried any different antidepressants but they do not seem to help. I’ve tried alcohol but no real relief. I feel this sick, empty, sinking hole in my heart that won’t go away. I don’t know what to do; I’m just miserable all the time and am ready to call it a life.
"I had a similar issue two years ago. I called a fdriend on the phone two-three times a week and I felt better
"Powerful words. I join you in not feeling I belong anywhere. I am currently reading a book, Braving the Wilderness, which is helping. I guess that's what therapists are for also.
Oh yeah - are you still a teacher? Either way think you've found you're calling. Just look at all the people in this thread you are helping with your words. I feel comfort there's more like me
I don't know. Even i think im talking s**t sometimes. I've been on meds for about a year. Tried 4 before i found the one im on that doesnt have the horrible side effects the others had but i still feel numb and like a zombie at times. No interest or motivation. I wish i never, ever started them. Working out use to be my thing and it helps me loads but doc convinced me i needed to go on meds and now its like i cant get off them. Withdrawal was always so bad i had to go back on them. I hate the word 'suicide' as its connotations are brutal, negative, selfishness and 'crazy'. What if we are the 'normal' ones. We just don't fit into societies boxes. We beat ourselves up for not following their linear thought patterns.
I think it's cool you're able to hold down a relationship. I never could. I've always had this feeling that I'm not meant for this world. And that's OK. Surely not everyone is. My soul does not connect with anything. Not even my family. Only with nature, the skies, the moon - anything solitary and all encompassing.
"Hey. Ok - so first this is weird. My own Google search of despair has lead me here, to your post dated 3 years a go but currently relatable and compelling me to reply. I see many others felt the same and I'm glad to see your still alive even though I support anyones decision to do as they please with their lives. Whats made you hold on? Or rather how do you just live with it? Freud argued we have life and death instincts. What if some of us just woukd rather not be here? I resent having to think about my family and loved ones etc... they are not really here to support and understand now so why should i stay alive just to suit others? To stop their pain. What about my pain? I find life exhausting. So exhausting. I'd like to sleep now. I'd love for there to be a land of utopia where I could reside but unfortunately as with life there are no guarantees.
Funnily enough the more I learned the more I knew about myself and the less I wanted to take my own life. I am mainly glad I stuck around otherwise I would have missed some interesting times. If I can do this then so can you and the others. Don't give in until you have tried everything first - and I mean everything. x
I decided I wanted to learn how to make friends (this had totally bypassed me before) so I watched other people, how they interacted and how they talked and behaved towards each other and started copying them adapting it of course to my own personality. At the same time I sought counselling. Well I learnt and started making friends. Then life just opened up for me and so many good things happened ie going to Uni, buying my first home etc. through to discovering a couple of passions which I still have in my life.
I faced a stark choice in my late 20's but chose to do everything in my power to make my life more to my liking - after all I had nothing to lose did I? The other was my comfort blanket which gave me the confidence to try and sort my life out if you see what I mean.
"Hi I totally get the peace thing as I have held it as my comfort blanket for many years now. What I always have done though is hold off making that decision by deciding every morning that today wouldn't be the day I would do it. I have held it off now for around 35 years. I was convinced I wouldn't make old bones either, but you know what I have - yes I am gobsmacked but there is a certain satisfaction to be found from that.
"So true...thanks for the reply. The peace continues and I even smiled today, I know right...wow and I ventured outside! But I’m not stupid I’ve been here many times before and I’m still clinging on..for now. I’m also glad there are people just like me, who think and see the world from ’our’ perspective and people who, unlike me, can put it into words so elequently like you’re able to. Thank you.
"That peace to which you refer is as beautiful as it is scary. It is something you can never tell anyone about or they will think you have lost your mind. It is so deeply rooted, you can't grasp it's source, how it suddenly replace emotion, hope, love, joy. If you told anyone in healthcare, you'd be put in a padded cell to protect yourself and that is terrifying because we are not crazy. I have always been a writer, able to express my feelings, in poetry particularly, but now I grasp with this peace to leave - I watch people living their lives with wonder, see them see me as a successful human being, and am bewildered. I do hope you, and I, grow old, that we can find the source of this evil peace, of this thing that has stolen our will to live or to try. I pray I will wake up and be a new person, I even pray something will happen to me, shake me into reality. I will pray for you too.
"I’m gobsmacked! I can relate to this 100%. Socially awkward to a degree...I can get jobs (nurse NHS) but I always get involved in things that don’t concern me and....I usually leave. I’m plagued by bad decision making, regret etc etc. I no longer have friends, not a single one, my life is inside these four walls.i feel bad for those who die young or suddenly and here’s me not wanting to be here anymore. I’ll never grow old, I know that for sure. But I’m biding my time and making sure ‘things’ are in place. I don’t need or want sympathy, I’m past that....There’s a kind of .... peace when ‘you know’.
"i m 24 ...i have been feeling same thing...i am a teacher too...i teach others but cant teach to my mind...i dont want to die because of my family but i also dont wanna live...i have lost fun from my life i srsly dont know how do people live happy...because i dont know what is happiness
So, in answer, in the end all we have is God. I long to see him and be in that glory, but I don't want to go there feeling like I have let him down and missed the opportunity to share what is good in me ( I know there must be something), to help even just one person, bring a smile to someone. Thanks for sharing openly and allowing all us others the safety and freedom to share our own path and support each other.
"I read your story with both understanding and sadness, having that same underlying and constant feeling that I long to be free of this life. It's not always been me though, I was a person with drive, leaving home at 16 and moving with conviction and belief that I could make a difference - I was a glass half full girl. I was the one throwing out all those verses that now drive me crazy, thinking, if they knew this pain, they wouldn't be saying, ""pull yourself together"", ""look at the bright side - You're smart, fit, ok looking and married"", or ""look at all who are worse off"". Truth is I don't know when or how my spirit just one day died, my will to get up every morning and have hope, to believe in myself and that I would ever have joy again, all just sizzled up. I forgave my husband for his 2 year affair with a sexy Cuban, it's not that, he stayed with me through it. I know I can work, and have lots of potential, but I can't even finish my writing jobs. When I go home to Australia or travel somewhere else in the world, and am in a safe environment with people who love me, I get a sneak glimpse into the Sally that could be, but I come home and it all falls to pieces. I wish I could say I know it gets better. I'm still hoping God will save me, that in some way I am going through a life lesson, and that I need to be totally cleaned of all that is me (all that I have come to believe is a burden on others and unappealing) and start over as a brand new person. I know God can do it, as I sure can't and that is the hope that keeps me going. I can't see myself having the power to solve this, and I get quite upset when my husband tries to fix me with his superficial niceness. I feel like a face a long long fence, too high to climb, too deep to dig under, and no doors as far as the eyes can see. Or like I""m playing a game of solitaire, and no matter how hard I try I know it's a no win.
I don't know what you love to do or know what you want from life or what you loved in life before you felt this way only you can find this but your like myself and many others with the feelings.
You have depression (I have depression) I feel blank but I think if you were on MEDS at any point for a lengthy period over 3 months they change you as a person it really messes with your brain chemistry more than anyone who studies will ever realize unless they experience it themselves. The good thing about this whether or not you were on meds is all these unfortunate feelings can be changed.
"You seem like a really nice caring person and I can relate to what you say almost completely and especially the ""everything is pointless"" and ""my life ended some time ago"". I personally don't enjoy life like I feel I should I haven't really since I was 16 now 30 and I when really young subconsciously told myself as weird as it is that how happy I was as a kid is not going to last and that i feel i am going to die young anyway. (Surprised I am still alive tbh ) Anyway I feel we all have our paths pre set in life (Fate ) if you want to call it that and you can't change that but on this path we have 2 or possibly more directions given to us and this new direction takes up a portion of our lives until the next directions are given to us and what direction you choose to take doesn't matter meaning that if you choose to look after number 1 you'll get what you want from life but doing so you have to cut things out or people who you want to make happy or you feel obligated to help. The next direction is the opposite of what I said earlier the final one is give up and either stay on the path what your on and do nothing.
I tend to compare myself to everyone I meet and feel pretty useless in my own eyes (it's bad, but it comes so naturally), but I have faint hope on bad days and hope on good ones that who I am is good for something or someone, somewhere.
I pray you find purpose, I pray for it myself every day and am only now starting to see where I fit in this life equation at 30 - it's being revealed a little more each day.
Knowing how futile and inappropriate it is dishing out advice - the best I can offer is an ear to listen that understands completely. Most days I feel hopeless, joy is elusive though the best moments usually arrive when I'm with family - I'm only truly close with my immediate family and a few of my cousins who've known me since we were kids. I have never been able to hold on to any friendships for longer than it was convenient for the other person, perhaps I came across as distant too. I too can't stand small talk and am quite comfortable with silence - though I'm trying now to engage a bit more with other people by throwing out the odd question.
"I empathise with you completely. It's quite astonishing that so many of us have found others who feel exactly the same way about life in this corner of the net.
"I am a ghost, a shell. I no longer know who I am, or care for that matter. I exist in the world as an observer. I am neither happy, nor sad, I just am. I am talented, yet derive no enjoyment from my skills. I don’t like people, and hate to engage in shallow small talk. I have an amazing gf, a kind and loving soul that works tirelessly to help me see the bright side of life, and I do try. She is such an inspiration to me, I wish I could be just like her, but alas, I am confined to a bland existence in my own mind. I feel my life ended some time ago, yet my body persists. I don’t indulge in drugs or alcohol, exercise, seek help with physical and mental issues, yet deep down there is a deep rooted belief that everything is pointless. I have taken the maximum dosage of my antidepressants for over 5 years now, and feel that how things are now is as good as it gets for me. I role play my way through my job, and my relationships, but when the masks come off, and the curtain goes down I am blank, emotionless, and lonely. It is almost time for me to go, I wish you all the best😔
"Indenial of death scared to die and scared of family dieing prompting what's the point? I dunno if this is what's up with you but what you said was like mimicing me.
"Man you have taken every though and put into words for me. Thank you. Hope your okay. I hope I'll be okay.
"I have been holding onto that for a long time. Some days seem slightly better than others, others are awful. Feel pretty useless and just treading water. Are you on a med? They have tried several and I get worse on them. Is there any cure for this out there?
"Yeah they are the only reason I’m still here. However it’s getting harder and harder to hold onto that.
"You have kids, always a reason to carry on. I'd never have kids because of that responsibility but if you have kids you owe them to fight. My partner might well be able to find someone better, but your kids will never get a new Dad. I think other family are different; you don't have a responsibility to them but kids you do. There's no way they're better off without you around. So if nothing else, just remember your kids everytime the thought crosses your mind. Good luck.
"I feel so much the same way. However I think I will end up “doing myself in”. I always thought 50 would be the “right” age, I’m almost 41. Kids would be moved on etc etc but for me things are getting increasingly hard to keep positive and keep going.
"I feel the same way I just feel there is no point in living. I always pretend that I'm fine with others because no one really understands me and I feel that I'm all alone in this world. I've often thought of suicide but it would just be a pathetic way of dying.So all I can say is I guess the people who are like this just have to live with this burden forever.
Everything you say is true. But thinking it and believing it/ living it are very different worlds! I do wonder, whether self inflicted or not, that such thoughts eventually become so ingrained in ones psyche that you become that person anyway. So even if I wasn't what I profess to be at the start, such is the mindset that I have now become that person beyond all repute. There is little denying the burden I have become.
I keep thinking of insignificant things that wouldn't bother your average person. And it's impossibly lately to make it stop. I just seem to relive over and over stupid moments that in my mind I could have said something different or behaved in a different way. And almost as though I set myself up for failing down the road I sense doom sometimes. Not a good feeling. I haven't taken meds and this current bout was almost like a nervous breakdown. I'm the past due to relationships etc. I've had depressing moments, but nothing like this. I wonder what I have that finally came in so suddenly and gripped me?
"It's beautiful that we all post comments here and share our experiences. You wrote that you feel very similar to poster and I very much do as well. I have friends that I used to do stuff with (hiking. Camping etc. ) I just don't anymore. Sometimes looking someone I know in the eye I can sense that they feel I'm not my old energetic outgoing self and I don't know how to change it. I tell a friend or two I can trust that I'm not feeling great, and I always hear basically to suck it up. I don't know how many people on here have constant repetitive thoughts , but I'm tired of it. The only relief is work since I need to focus , but I'm not feeling myself at all. I'm just treading water. I don't want to be here in this place. I own my own home outright. Very very little debt. I'm still relatively young (44). Good 9-5 job. Never work weekends. and here I am. I don't understand it, but whatever.
I guess write if you feel like it. I don’t know if it helps to know I feel very similar to you. It helped me to read your comment, because I thought “ oh, I’m not the only one”. I wish us peace , inspiration, and enthusiasm. Good luck, and I’m pretty sure you’d be missed if you weren’t around.
I’d like to feel some passion for something. Anything that would permit “ flow”, but sometimes there are no avenues. I’m seeing my weekly therapist tomorrow, and quite frankly, I’m tired of that , too. For a couple of months I did neurofeedback, which I thought was helping, but now, I don’t know. What is CBT?
But back to you, when I read your entry, I felt such a kinship. I know that feeling of futility in the game of life. Sometimes you can navigate the waters and float. It’s not great, but at least there’s no undertow.
I was struck by your mention of helping people. I , too, like to help people . I feel most significant when I am helping my friends, but at the same time , I don’t want then to not feel better so I’ll feel needed. Ironically, I’m therapist to every one of my friends.
My husband is an excellent father, but with that, he’s much rather see our kids than ever have quality time with me. He’s not at all romantic. I have friends , but many are living retired with their husbands. My husband is in biotech and plans to work for at least another year and a half.
I have officially been an empty nester since 2014 , the year my younger daughter finished school and took off for Boulder.
At 36 , I had a child and a husband, which gave me a measure of security. My mother, father, and sister never lived to see my child. I was very close to my mother, and she died the year before I met my husband. Then a second daughter arrived two years later in 1992.
Sometimes I am able to control the thoughts after years of reading self help books and trying various late 1970’s workshops to get “it”. Nothing helped, and at one point in my early 20’s I was afraid to be alone and afraid to be with people.
"Today was definitely one of those days of which you describe.even though I don’t have them as frequently, they happen seemingly out of nowhere.
In answer yes, no, not sure! Very little has changed since the first post all those years ago. Sometimes I want to sleep forever, other days I feel better but it's still there in the back of my mind at all times. I'm not sure, if I were ever asked directly, whether I would ever say I was happy - it's more what degree I'm fighting myself today.
"I'll keep this short, but as you asked me directly I feel it only right to reply. I think it was the word 'cry' that caught my attention - I've been so accepting and calm about my inadequacies that I haven't cried in years...that's probably slightly odd!
"Rsjg I've been reading your messages and cried as I did. The way you are feeling I have felt most of my life. I want to know how you are doing? Have you found a way to cope and find some joy in life yet?
"Oh am very sorry you feel this way but please do not think of even committing suicide or just dying.Sometimes we feel that way about ourselves .Even I have felt that way too but you should keep living and not giving up in life at all.Will recommend this site's to you.
"I can't believe I found your post. By all accounts I have a great life and great husband but relate completely to ""I'm just tired"". How are you now? What are you doing these days? I'm having a hard time with the point to it all and somehow came across this post as searching for painless suicide methods. I just feel like I exist. I don't see a counselor or take any meds. I'm not addicted to drugs or alcohol, I have not been abused. I have fun sometimes, I laugh sometimes but, I'm just tired. Let me know how you're doing.
Just a thought - you say you had a normal childhood? I did too in the sense that I was physically harmed or from a broken home or anything, but what I didn't realise for many years was that I was suffering from Childhood Emotional Abuse until I googled Childhood Emotional Neglect. Suddenly many things made sense as CEN isn't about what was done it is about what wasn't done.
?So that's why I don't really respond on here, because I'm not sure I can really advise anyone or help you with questions like you put directly to me - nothing did it for me, I doubt anything ever will.
?I still have no 'job' other than day to day stuff which is very unreliable. I still have zero friends, I still have zero social life (obvious really!) and still feel a disconnect from my family. I still feel like my gf would be better without me.
?Some days are better than others, some days I can act 'normally' and no-one would notice. Other days I just hideaway. My most overriding feeling of the last few months has not been of anger, sadness or anything other than tiredness, just like I want to close my eyes, lie back and never wake up. I've sat on the edge of my bed, taken a few deep breaths, closed my eyes and just wished that it was that calm and easy to disappear.
?I would absolutely love it I could say yes I am much more upbeat but I'm not sure where you get that from! My last response to a message three months ago basically stated nothing changes. I re-read my first post and a handful of ones I've written in response to others over the years and couldn't think of one thing that I feel differently about. Still tired, still a burden, still all the things I think about myself.
"Mmm. I'm not sure how to reply to this. I've cut back on my responses on here as the thread seems to have taken on almost a community of its own - a place for people to say they feel similar and get responses. I read every post but feel I am far from a poster boy for success - quite the reverse.
"Your original post was three years ago. I read your comments regularly now and you are much more upbeat. What did it for you? Sure as hell the meds they have given me have made me worse at times. I seem to need a different approach, any guidance.
"Hey there. There is no proper solution to this as such but I believe that it is your thought process which needs change. You should talk about your problem to someone close to you or maybe vent it out by writing or engaging into some activity which requires expressing oneself such as acting or singing etc. It is good that you understand that life ahead is going to be beautiful, but what you also need to have at the moment is patience and don't lose hope. Maybe this is why after having gone through medications and therapies, you are not able to recover from your condition. I recently consulted an online forum called eWellness Expert. They have psychologists with wide experience in their field who can help you, if you require professional help. Hope this helps. Take care
"Hey Natalie. I noticed that if I keep busy, have something to look forward too , that it helps. Keep moving on.
"I feel very similar to you a lot. I do have a few things in my life that are out of my control and suck a bag right now...but not like anyone is dying. I do want to do things and want to make friends. I have a husband but he doesn't really understand me and he is a part of some of my ""out of my control"" issues...but There are many more. A brief and complex list goes something like this..I apparently can't hold down any friendships and now I don't really want to, I never cared about becoming someone or having the drive to have a career till I was 29 and am now screwed bc I know nothing yet want to know, and I am the laziest 110lb girl in the universe yet want to move. I'm a an enigma. My dad made a quote up about me a while ago saying ""the only thing consistent with Becca is that she is always inconsistent"". ..it's pretty accutate and he is a psychiatric social worker (yet he is his own piece of work.) I have been depressed since 6th grade. I am 31 now. It was in remission for a while and kind of turned in to anxiety as I got older. It's now leading back to a depressive state. It's kind of like my brain and body want two different things. Although I have a gimpy knee, my body is a little ball of energy that can hardly stay still....bit my brain says, ""No, sit down and sleep, bc what's the point."" I'm not trying to be an ass but sometimes tupac has it right...why am I fighting to live when I'm just living to die! It's not like I want to die...quite frankly it's a bit terrifying, but I do want mental peace. Instead of picturing me taking my own life I kind of just picture myself hanging in space orbiting around my own planet. Idk, I look pretty normal and plain but I am a really odd bird. I Think about what people must have done in previous times when life was a lot more simple, but perhaps they were more happy because they just kept busy and they didn't have the option to sit and mope. I really like tv because it's distracting. I finally did something to help me with my drive to become someone, but its probably going to fail.....and then what??? I never ever wanted self-worth before.. I kind of just accepted myself for who I was, pretty much a plain old nobody. But now I'm trying to better my situation and what if that goes wrong..I'm back to being a plain old nobody. I don't know where to focus or emphasize importance. I have been souls searching since I was 10 really and I like myself..i think I could be nicer to family, but other then that I am okay with being a hater and for not keeping up with the Kardashians. I try to find solace in nature, but a storms always a brewing. I often say to myself, ""okay make the most of any situation and your here now so may as well enjoy yourself bc no one is going to make you happy except you and you have one life."" That's kind of my mantra, and also very true, bc often people make me very sad...especially the ones closest to me. Anything can help.. Butler? Any words?
"I see that this is a very old post, but I appreciate it. I feel exactly the same way
"It's very sad reading all these comments. I hope you all get better and find happiness. You all deserve it too. I'm in the same situation but I have good reason. Everything is against me. It's not only the depression, the nervous breakdowns, GAD, Agoraphobia, Social Phobia, Social Anxiety, PTSD. I suspect BPD too. All the problems I have revolve around people and me. How can I live when I can't even be near anyone?Even my own family which hurts me. I wish I had a career, etc. Everything everyone does but instead I'm stuck in my house letting the time pass me by. Just wasting time I shouldn't think about it so much I don't have anything to lose. All my problems have caused my misery since I was 4. I don't have a furture. I don't want a present either. I want my pain to go away. I want to be like everyone else. Functional and social. Useful. But instead I'm stuck in my bed I no longer get out of it. I'm all day in it. Even when I get up I get dizzy and feel I will collapse. Anyways I really hope you all get better and are still hanging on.🙌🙏💖
"I feel like this too. I don't understand what it is. Sometimes it's more extreme. Hope you're still hanging on.
I'm going to stick around for as long as I feel like it, but when I deiced that I had enough, I will leave in the calmest, cleanest and most polite way possible as not to inconvenience others by my decision.
I think what we experience is part of the human experience, natural and everything else we do is the unnatural part. Plus the only reason ""Professionals"" and ""Governments"" pretend to care, is because its their chosen career and to make sure that there are more cattle in the farm ( the cattle are us).
Please do not tell me how lucky I am and to look at the less fortunate, I was borne in a refugee camp! and I lived there until 10 years of age. I remember having nothing and being happy because I didn't any better , It is a 100 times worse to have more than many and still be ""JOYLESS!"", it adds a new layer of guilt for every single thing that should make you happy and your are not.
I attended a couple of Maori funerals in New Zealand, all we did for a WEEK, was drink, eat and celebrate the life of the departed. Many other societies have the same Idea and many of them existed for over 20+ thousand years. But NOOOOOO! We the ""civilized"" ones (with a few hundred years under our belt) must live as long as possible to pay more taxes, to buy houses, to finance wars, and keeps governments and useless public servants (including me when I was one) in their jobs. And the majority of them, do not have enough sense to think of 1% of what we are discussing here.
I feel the same way you do, I had a reasonably good life, traveled, got a wonderful family, PhD, etc... I just can't shake the feeling that none of this matters. Who the hell are we to ask the most arrogant question ""Why are we here?"" who the hell do we think we are.
"I felt the same way for the past 20 years, its like I am watching a very long and boring movie, which I know the ending for it and yet everyone around me is forcing me to keep watching it. Its like I am watching a bad magic show and I know how all the tricks are done. The worst thing is when you talk to the ""professionals"" and they keep spouting the same patronizing crap and you keep biting your tong because you do want them to label you or medicate you, which could ruin your kids chances of getting your life insurance payout if you deiced to leave the movie before it finishes.
I don't know what exactly i am doing....!
At first i was searching reasons to talk to her and now searching reasons to avoid talking to her.
I have a good family and girlfriend whom i always feel annoyed. It's very difficult to understand a girl and what actually runs in their mind.
But alone and i dont need a company either.
Sometimes feel like to go some where far away from people.
I don't know where i am heading too.
Even i feel the same.
80% of your thoughts are matching to mine.
Well, that went grey pretty quick jeez, lol. Anyway perhaps just this very act of sharing is enough to keep hope alive...like a support group of sorts...I'll leave you with a verse that
If all else fails, good honest instrumental music always seems to cut through my conscious mind no matter my emotional state and hits me straight in my subconscious (like how a good or a bad smell almost immediately can stir up memories or feelings) - it almost forces a smile out of me and the sun then breaks through the clouds if only for a little while...the takeaway here being that of being present in that moment, it gives me hope of something more if only for a short while.
I don't know, I keep praying about it and am experiencing more of the authentic joy buried deep inside - I savour it when it appears, but I know exactly how you feel.
I can't say I have any answers because I feel exactly the same way as you, but I've been feeding my mind and spirit with not just general positive stuff, but what I feel is truth to me - sifting through the superficial fortune cookie quotes and delving deeper to get to the heart of what is true, it really has brought a change in perspective at least for me. It just gets hard every day, getting up in the morning you feel somewhat ready to take on the day, but then the cloud catches up and you're back under it wondering why you bothered waking up at all, by the evening I feel like a zombie, drained and defeated once more.
I can say I've been blessed in my life with an incredible, loving (though imperfect as all are) family and extended family as well as a pretty good upbringing with good opportunities...but like you I feel useless for the most part and have no desire for life really. I've managed to hold a job for a number of years, although it has been my first proper one out of varsity - but even so the feelings have never left completely, I have perhaps one or two close friends I still keep in contact with otherwise my closest friends are my family, my male cousins and my older sister. I've gone deeper in my faith and committed to going to church every Sunday with my Mom and older sister and have been doing so for about a year and a half - a major feat as I'm not one of those disciplined folk at all though I've made a decision to treat it like I treat my job, get up and go despite your feelings and desire to sleep in - it always ends up being beyond rewarding and incredibly uplifting.
Man, it's insane how accurately your descriptions of how you feel line up with how I've been feeling for years and the cloud was especially thick tonight which is how I ended up here. The irony is not lost on me that all of a sudden I'm excited and gained a burst of energy knowing that I'm not alone in feeling so incredibly listless most days and 'apathetic' too as one user described it.
I didn't think I'd find my psychological doppelganger (or perhaps I'm yours), but indeed here you are and after having read your posts up until the very recent ones I can most certainly relate.
"This is a good response, and one i feel the same as. I continue to live for my familys sake, but life is not. Good for me, too many years of trying to treat something they dont manage to affect. I dont know how i get through the days really. Hubby gets angry sometimes and says im not trying, but i am, it just wont get better
"I just want to say I love all of you , the fact that there are others like me helps me everyday . Deep deep down it hits a piece of me that is dark and helps greatly because I know I am 38 now and can't change anything or expect anything out of talking ( because I am not a talker really hate the grind of talk that has no meaning) but if I find some solitude even for 15 min then it is worth it at this point . I am at a all time high on not being able to take it ! So ty all and hopefully one day some of us will find each other and have a real impact on our lives .
There is no fix for me.
I am not suicidal but wish every night that I will not wake up in the morning.
"At least you are honest about things. I am 65 now and am breathing air that should belong to people who deserve it. I also cannot see things changing.
I am in a vicious circle largely of my own making or thought processes but it does not change the reality and such is my age that it is now impossible for me to repair the damage I, or my mind, has done to my life.
So I apologise for not giving a better answer. I wish I could give you a more positive spin. But in a world in which I see ever more proof that to succeed you need to be selfish then perhaps I was never cut out for humanity anyway.
Life hasn't improved, I still can't function as 'normal' and try to continue finding a route which just about suffices whilst continually making me feel half complete. I can't hold a job so take temporary ones but therefore can't be what I feel I need to be (financially stable, a non-burden on those around me) - I find short term solutions to long term problems but kind of know, deep down, that I will inevitably reach a D Day and will be unlikely see old age. That in itself is some comfort.
Which is why I rarely post on here any more. I am no poster boy for success.
"Nothing changes, just my ability to pretend things are fine. The thought processes remain each and every day. I am all I ever thought I was. Some days I will ignore it better than others but it's always there.
"Me too, coming to the conclusion that after all a/d trials i am left with this for life. At least i had several good years beforeit hit. Love to find an answer though
"Give me ur whatsapp number.i want to know details because i have same problem
"I just want to say that, yes, I HAVE NO GOOD REASON and I am depressed. I have been depressed since age 18 as I can remember...it's just how I am...I have no good ""excuse"" and that can make it feel worse because your pain feels unjustified and that feel shameful. I don't know why some people are like this (like us) but you are not alone. I am sorry for your pain. Truly.
So i know what it feels like alone lost tired - not a great thing to be huh
I feel for you i really do. check out Athur Janov primal scream no, not a self help book it's real and cuts to the bone of why we feel the way we do..but alas nothing worked CBT NLP midfulness etc nothing at all, I am a consultant and quit my role i left my long term partner he wasn't that bothered really. I lost my dad and i am floating in my head like some wind that is just passing through
"Tired is something I now a lot about. Caring too much is tiring as is thinking too much and then not caring. Everything i have read here is the same as what I feel and have gone through also. People leave i feel lost alone and just plain tired have little or no feeling for anything and jusmp onto diff things at the drop of a hat
"I pretty much feel the same. I am just tired of these little unfortunate events that happen to me everyday. Like a si oke task (steps a to b), something will just happen and the task would be complicated (making it steps a to e). get me? and seeing good things happen to bad people. I have been a victim of some of them. I tried to help soneone and she gets away with my money. My family treat me as others bec I am highly introverted. And friends who are just there when they need you and during good times. I try to be positive and optimistic but now I am just tired.So tired. No hope left in me.
"Feel much the same but you know what, the problem is that there's no solution but miracle or death and I believe that the second one is more likely. I don't wanna sound like I'm too gloomy and pessimistic, no not at all, but There comes a point in life or at least in my life that you .....
I am very angry about how this last relationship ended as there was nothing we could do about it. I feel totally dead inside.
It is as if my time here is spent and I wish something would happen to end it all. I do not have the courage to try suicide.
I am now living with my eldest son and his partner which is hardly ideal but it is a roof over my head. I cannot imaging going on like this and since I have had all sorts of health issues myself for which cardio and chest investigations have been done without any result I really cannot see any reason myself staying on this earth for any longer.
My story in all of this is that I have been divorced three times previously and had numerous relationships - all fairly short (around a year). Five of those ended as a result of a child, albeit they were all adults, and over the years I have felt more and more useless as a partner. I have always been banned from interfering.
I suggested, as did other friends and family, that the daughter get help from a professional. My partner seemed reluctant to admit that her daughter may have a mental issue but eventually suggested to her that she would go to where she lives and help her to get the help she needs. Eventually that is what happened.
Later in December her 33 year old daughter who lives a distance away started verbally and emotionally abusing her mother. This developed to the point where my partner was completely traumatised by the constant abuse.
"At the beginning of 2016 I met someone and fell in love with her. The year has been the best of my miserable life. In December an old boyfriend arrived uninvited at the door and her reaction to him disturbed me in the sense that she was obviously not over this previous relationship.
Hope you are still with us..an i mean us...The people that suffer fron clinical depression..
"U r absolutely right.i have same feelings and thinking.but i want to enjoy my life i want to feel the beauty of life as the people around me..plz anybody help me
"I am sorry to hear that you feel like I do. I just want to say that I totally agree with you and I'm stuck here living this life too. It's too bad we have to live a life that is so unhappy.
I have searched every option, and found no solution. I think it is in genes. ""Depression"" or this miserable feeling will stay until we are breathing. So based on my experience, there is no way to get out of this. The only things I found that would take me, for few hours or short time, out of this miserable situation are the no-no stuff that knocks one out. Life is meaningless, boring, depressive, and unfair.
I'm not going to sugarcoat. Here is the truth based on my experience: there is NO ANSWER. you are not going to find happiness or what you are looking for. I didn't. After reading all your posts, I see that you are a little similar to me in how you feel. But I'm in much worse situation. The older we get, the worse it gets.
"Hi friend..I do not care either..I have no one in my life that does not want something off me..Thier motives to help me are never truly altruistic.All I want to do is get my health better but I am never given much opportunity. I know from reading others issues it helps with your own..I hope things work out..If you bring things back to basics it always seems to help me..excercise..food..mental stimulus.
"I feel the same. I'm just so tired. No sappy stoey here. I just think I am ready to die now.
After analyizing these conditions for happyness in me I realized that these are the things that human beings are meant to do. We are meant to seek personal or familial enrichment through hard work and adventure seeking. In the days of our ancestors when the work that you did gave a direct result of how good your life was it was easy to find fulfillment. When we were able to strike out into the world and make it as we saw fit with our own 2 hands and imaginations for ourselvs and our loved ones we were fulfilling our purpose and thus had no reason to be depressed. It is this modern societal construct that is failing us, Human beings were not meant to live in this way! We were not meant to be shackled by any rules, laws and obligations that we did not choose for ourselves! I want to point at a horizon and go as far and as fast as i can in that direction then settle down any damn place i please to nurture myself and my family! I want to learn about anything that takes my interest simply by watching/listening and trying! That is the freedom we are meant to have and THAT is the only way of life that will make a healthy human being! Untill these great societies of ours recognizes these basic human needs whe will continue to circle the drain and more and more people will grow ravenous as these needs continue to go unsatisfied untill eventually it will all collapse in chaos and people are FORCED to live in those ways simply to survive and to rebuild, just like our ancestors.
"I have been afflicted with these feelings and issues for the vast majority of my life. I find myself falling into the same self defeating patterns that you describe and having a lackluster outlook on life and living in general. But I remember the times when I was happy, the times when things seemed to make sense and feel right. There were certain conditions being met in all of those circumstances, not all at once or in any particular order but those conditions were as follows.
I'm not even sure I have depression, I think this may just be 'me'.
I have always been pretty useless socially, but have had a normal upbringing, no horrible experiences, have gone through education fine and even got jobs but I've never enjoyed life, never really cared and normally feel like I'm not really worth anything and, inevitably enventually, will become a burden.
I'm not going to be dramatic and say I'm going to end it, it sounds so pathetic (no offence intended to anyone) but I have thoughts of 'going' or even dreams that I could die 'blamelessly' thorugh accident or illness. Selfish I know.
I have a cycle. Get job, put on confident easy going persona, get physically tired from doing that, lose energy to maintain job, focus on negative, leave job in some form (fired/quit). Friends are much the same, play easy going fun, can't keep it up, lose or push them away. Relationships, get attracted to ones who need help, help them in anyway I can, get to a point where I feel I am no more use so should go as they'd be ultimately better off.
So, currently I've quit my job as a teacher, couldn't take it - always something to improve and with my way of thinking that just sounds like constantly someone telling you you're useless (and it backing up your own thoughts anyway) but even though I liked aspects of my job I don't think I had a passion like I see in others. I felt I'd let everyone down so disappeared, my partner/ parents got me through immediate days after my sudden departure from work and saw Doc who was nice enough - put me on medication which seemed to do very little - even after a few months. In fact it only had negative side effects so about three weeks ago I stopped taking them completely. I also started seeing a CBT person about three/four session ago but this feels like it's doing nothing at all either, we talk, I'm honest as I can be but there is some element of being 'public' and putting on that face/ jokey responses.
I dip between a wish to not be around that is forever there and seems to be backed up with wholly logical reasons that people genuinely struggle to refute to absolutely crashing panic attacks/ given up when my 'theories' are proved.
I know this sounds odd, but I don't even have the will to get 'better', largely because I don't think I can. I am just 'me'. I am negative, boring and even if it is all just selffullfillng profecies - it's still me who has done that. I'm not blaming life, or others or anything else.
I just feel I'm never going to be happy, I am soon to be much a burden on those around me (my gf) and that, in the long run, it'd be better for all if I just went. I know my family and gf love me - but time heals, life would get better and people move on. In the long run I'm sure it wouldn't effect my family and 100% sure my gf would be better off.
Not sure if there is an answer for this, just writing. I'm not angry, I'm not hurt, I'm not even sad as such, I'm just tired.
oh im so sorry to read all this, i pretty much feel the same as you, and i often think i wish i never was born, and i find my life a total diseaster, all the wrong decisions i made...im very depressed, taking medication, see counsellor, but in the end its all up to yourself.
You have taken the first step and that is asking for help. It can always be worse. It sounds like you are extremely depressed. I too have had problems keeping jobs and friends.. when I got to the point to where I wanted to end my life, I did something that I've always wanted to do. I went skydiving and all my big problems became very small. I think facing death in an indirect way helped turn my life around. Every time I got to the point to where I was depressed I would go skydiving again. About seven years ago I didn't think it to get worse but I got Dystonia torticollis, that's where your muscles start pulling the wrong way. My head lies on my shoulder and I'm in extreme pain all the time. In between being depressed and getting torticollis I actually became successful until I got torticollis. Please try skydiving jumping out of a plane will help. And remember it can always get worse. If you realize how lucky you are and that ""the big problems in life are really not as big as what you think"" I am now broke and I'm worse off than I've ever been but I feel everyday is a gift. Even though I'm in extreme pain and my body is distorted now for some reason I want to live every minute that I possibly can. Just remember it could always be worse. Merry Christmas
​But then on the same hand, not recognising how lucky I am isn't the problem, it's knowing that I am and I'm still not feeling good which then further compounds how bad I feel about myself. I know I'm luckier than most, I know things could be worse, I live in an affluent country with water on tap, have good health and had a normal upbringing with no major traumas. So knowing this makes me feel EVEN worse about myself. I see I'm selfish, and ungrateful, and petty and all other words - why can't I just be happy?
I've put my life on the line a few times, both within the safety confines of organised activities and on the less controlled activities I may do myself - it doesn't help me. Being near death doesn't impact me positively or negatively - I'm almost apathetic to it.
If we all focused on 'it could be worse' they'd be very few people in this world who could complain, unfortunately it's not that simple. This depression doesn't care that I'm lucky, it just cares that I think badly of myelf and reminds me of it every day and actually accelerates when I speak to people who could argue they do have a good reason to feel bad. I know I don't - and that makes it even worse.
Not having the luxury of either family, friend or partner to bail me out I must work or sleep on the streets within weeks. No other options due to my inability to function as a normal human. Personal responsibility is a wonderful thing.
The reason I ask is purely that I don't have either the time or the inclination to do something for myself as I don't deserve the help from me that others receive without question, oh and the fact that High Functioning AS adults currently don't get diagnosed (labelled) due to them being too clever and the only so called 'real help' out there costs an arm and a leg, both of which I'd rather keep hold of thanks!
Please don't pick holes in my punctuation, grammar and sentence building (lack of) skills, I may have also once been a teacher, been measured by British Mensa and found to be an actual genius and have taken ages writing and re-writing this, but I still make mistakes.
I've also mentioned that it is probably important to get outside your own head - think about doing things that stop you thinking about yourself. However, as a caveat, I also recognise doing anything (like talking to another human being as you rightly point out!) can be extrememly stressful.
Quick research, scan read. Told you I would... I definitely don't have HFSA. You may well have but it'd take more than a quick chat to establish that.
I think I have depression, with social anxiety. I have signs of bipolar, I get symptoms of SAD, I have trichotillomania, I have mild OCD that gets worse if I'm stressed, I have panic attacks, I over think everything, I have low self-esteem and no confidence, I feel suicidal most days and a million other mini-labels. Doesn't help me though. It's the classic 'what's in a name?'
I hope you see my point. We sound very similar yet I would class myself as a people pleaser, I rarely sure emotion outside the house and am overly polite to even strangers. So whilst HFSA might apply in parts, it doesn't solve everything.
I don't know when you wrote this or how your feeling now but I am feeling the thoughts.
You however seem to know this and some so I'm guessing you feel similar to me. The answer for you is not to concentrate on the whys his and why not but to keep on doing what your doing and compliment yourself for it as your making the world a better place
I feel the exact same way, we are all lead to believe that we are unique. This is the strangest thing I've ever experienced. I do believe we need to chat together. The way you feel is the exact same as I feel in my life right now.
Big hug & prayers to you Steve. I know this is years later but I can't help but tear up when you speak of dystonia, because my mum had it and I'm sure it was the toughest time in her life. She did recover though with prayer & Botox injections etc. I wish you strength.
I'm not even sure I have depression, I think this may just be 'me'.
I have always been pretty useless socially, but have had a normal upbringing, no horrible experiences, have gone through education fine and even got jobs but I've never enjoyed life, never really cared and normally feel like I'm not really worth anything and, inevitably enventually, will become a burden.
I'm not going to be dramatic and say I'm going to end it, it sounds so pathetic (no offence intended to anyone) but I have thoughts of 'going' or even dreams that I could die 'blamelessly' thorugh accident or illness. Selfish I know.
I have a cycle. Get job, put on confident easy going persona, get physically tired from doing that, lose energy to maintain job, focus on negative, leave job in some form (fired/quit). Friends are much the same, play easy going fun, can't keep it up, lose or push them away. Relationships, get attracted to ones who need help, help them in anyway I can, get to a point where I feel I am no more use so should go as they'd be ultimately better off.
So, currently I've quit my job as a teacher, couldn't take it - always something to improve and with my way of thinking that just sounds like constantly someone telling you you're useless (and it backing up your own thoughts anyway) but even though I liked aspects of my job I don't think I had a passion like I see in others. I felt I'd let everyone down so disappeared, my partner/ parents got me through immediate days after my sudden departure from work and saw Doc who was nice enough - put me on medication which seemed to do very little - even after a few months. In fact it only had negative side effects so about three weeks ago I stopped taking them completely. I also started seeing a CBT person about three/four session ago but this feels like it's doing nothing at all either, we talk, I'm honest as I can be but there is some element of being 'public' and putting on that face/ jokey responses.
I know this sounds odd, but I don't even have the will to get 'better', largely because I don't think I can. I am just 'me'. I am negative, boring and even if it is all just selffullfillng profecies - it's still me who has done that. I'm not blaming life, or others or anything else.
I just feel I'm never going to be happy, I am soon to be much a burden on those around me (my gf) and that, in the long run, it'd be better for all if I just went. I know my family and gf love me - but time heals, life would get better and people move on. In the long run I'm sure it wouldn't effect my family and 100% sure my gf would be better off.
Not sure if there is an answer for this, just writing. I'm not angry, I'm not hurt, I'm not even sad as such, I'm just tired...
I pretty much felt like that most of my life. Moving from place to place whether it is work, friends, relationships or home. Living is just so tiring and it isn't fun or enjoyable. It took me a failed marriage which ended in the most hostile way possible to seek some help. I am slowly and beginning to admit that it is some form of depression. Haven't done the CBT though. Even if you don't think you are suffering from depression, try everything, you never know, something might work for you.
Thank you. I am trying everything but more out of doing what I'm told than having a belief anything will change. I couldn't vouch for CBT yet, it's done nothing. Mind you same for medication! What is depression and what is just character?!
I have also moved from place to place as a child never had any real friends. Never felt like i fit in. When i do make an effort with work groups people i can only last so long it gets tiring and i cant be bothered. I thought if i did hair from home home that would be better but even then i dread people coming i am sick of that as well. I thought getting married having children would help my quest in searching for happiness but it us all just exhausting even though i love my children . i wonder when is it ever going to end or is life about living in this rat race constantly having scheduals and running aroubd plus trying to fit in seeing people so they dont get annoyed. Its all too mich fir me. I look at peopke who seem so happy ,motivated and excited about life and feell what is wrong with me. I would rathet just be on my own with no scheduals but calmness does this mean i am just a lazy person. I try to be upbeat but it wears off quickly.
What a well written submission, and I hope it helped rsjg as it did me. For a long time I have tried to understand why moving to America at first excited me, then overwhelmed me (2 step daughters perhaps?) and then I began having anxiety attacks - something I never had before. You are right, and now, after going through being betrayed, and losing several loved ones, I see quite clearly the happy facade in California around me. It is, as you say, deadening, almost like living in a Stepford Wives movie where you don't fit in.
Your description of depression is also very clarifying. I think it was my only way to numb the pain of inadequacy and lost love. I wondered why i had lost my spirit which was once so strong, why I struggled to feel a sense of belonging .... anywhere. Why I looked at myself and wondered who I was.
Sally! I couldn't agree more! I also feel like that
Oh Tess, how many have said that to me, family and friends, yet I seem rooted to the spot having lost faith in being able to cope on my own or make any meaningful life again. A friend just said to me, Rock Bottom is a safe place to be, it's solid and you can only go up (or sink in the sand?). So I have to believe there is going to be something that will jolt me back into living, hope and believing. Funny, as my husband comes from a Hollywood upbringing.
Hi I relate very much to what you are saying as I have much the same thoughts. I just feel sad and hopeless much of the time and wish my life could end in a natural way. Then I feel awful thinking this with so many people with life threatening illnesses who desperately want to live.
I don't have anyone to love me - no partner or kids (I am 60) so you are one up on me. I have 3 sisters and only 1 nephew. 1 sister (who I don't have or want any contact with) has 1 son. She is a snob. Out of my other 2 1 is a recluse and shuts herself away and the other is a thief who stole all our mothers money before she died. So I have no one who would truely miss me. At least you have love and constant people in your life.
Thanks for your reply rsjg. I do see on sister quite a lot and of course I do have friends - several close ones, drinking friends, casual friends etc. I am not working as can't get a job so am often lonely.
I do go to a social club for over 55's but don't do knitting! I play cards in one of them and attend a writers group. Despite my advanced age I do occasionally go to nightclubs you know....
I have quite a good social life and go out at least 3 evening a week playing darts and dommies with the lads at my local. I also go to bingo.
Oh and I certainly don't need my reclusive sister!!! You sound very young and I think you will find that us 'old folk' don't sit in a corner of a kitchen anymore knitting anymore and I hope you will be the same when you are old like me....
It doesn't follow that I know how to make myself happy so I don't know where you got that idea. I keep as busy as I can but what I was saying was I don't have love in my life or anyone really close to me. That makes me unhappy. No one would miss me that much if I wasn't here.
I to am in my 50's and on face book there are many groups but mostly for the younger generation and I don't sit and knit either lol I am here if you need to talk ok
I'm not even sure I have depression, I think this may just be 'me'.
I have always been pretty useless socially, but have had a normal upbringing, no horrible experiences, have gone through education fine and even got jobs but I've never enjoyed life, never really cared and normally feel like I'm not really worth anything and, inevitably enventually, will become a burden.
I'm not going to be dramatic and say I'm going to end it, it sounds so pathetic (no offence intended to anyone) but I have thoughts of 'going' or even dreams that I could die 'blamelessly' thorugh accident or illness. Selfish I know.
I have a cycle. Get job, put on confident easy going persona, get physically tired from doing that, lose energy to maintain job, focus on negative, leave job in some form (fired/quit). Friends are much the same, play easy going fun, can't keep it up, lose or push them away. Relationships, get attracted to ones who need help, help them in anyway I can, get to a point where I feel I am no more use so should go as they'd be ultimately better off.
So, currently I've quit my job as a teacher, couldn't take it - always something to improve and with my way of thinking that just sounds like constantly someone telling you you're useless (and it backing up your own thoughts anyway) but even though I liked aspects of my job I don't think I had a passion like I see in others. I felt I'd let everyone down so disappeared, my partner/ parents got me through immediate days after my sudden departure from work and saw Doc who was nice enough - put me on medication which seemed to do very little - even after a few months. In fact it only had negative side effects so about three weeks ago I stopped taking them completely. I also started seeing a CBT person about three/four session ago but this feels like it's doing nothing at all either, we talk, I'm honest as I can be but there is some element of being 'public' and putting on that face/ jokey responses.
I know this sounds odd, but I don't even have the will to get 'better', largely because I don't think I can. I am just 'me'. I am negative, boring and even if it is all just selffullfillng profecies - it's still me who has done that. I'm not blaming life, or others or anything else.
I just feel I'm never going to be happy, I am soon to be much a burden on those around me (my gf) and that, in the long run, it'd be better for all if I just went. I know my family and gf love me - but time heals, life would get better and people move on. In the long run I'm sure it wouldn't effect my family and 100% sure my gf would be better off.
Not sure if there is an answer for this, just writing. I'm not angry, I'm not hurt, I'm not even sad as such, I'm just tired...
oh im so sorry to read all this, i pretty much feel the same as you, and i often think i wish i never was born, and i find my life a total diseaster, all the wrong decisions i made...im very depressed, taking medication, see counsellor, but in the end its all up to yourself..
You have taken the first step and that is asking for help. It can always be worse. It sounds like you are extremely depressed. I too have had problems keeping jobs and friends.. when I got to the point to where I wanted to end my life, I did something that I've always wanted to do. I went skydiving and all my big problems became very small. I think facing death in an indirect way helped turn my life around. Every time I got to the point to where I was depressed I would go skydiving again. About seven years ago I didn't think it to get worse but I got Dystonia torticollis, that's where your muscles start pulling the wrong way. My head lies on my shoulder and I'm in extreme pain all the time. In between being depressed and getting torticollis I actually became successful until I got torticollis. Please try skydiving jumping out of a plane will help. And remember it can always get worse. If you realize how lucky you are and that ""the big problems in life are really not as big as what you think"" I am now broke and I'm worse off than I've ever been but I feel everyday is a gift. Even though I'm in extreme pain and my body is distorted now for some reason I want to live every minute that I possibly can. Just remember it could always be worse. Merry Christmas
​But then on the same hand, not recognising how lucky I am isn't the problem, it's knowing that I am and I'm still not feeling good which then further compounds how bad I feel about myself. I know I'm luckier than most, I know things could be worse, I live in an affluent country with water on tap, have good health and had a normal upbringing with no major traumas. So knowing this makes me feel EVEN worse about myself. I see I'm selfish, and ungrateful, and petty and all other words - why can't I just be happy?
I've put my life on the line a few times, both within the safety confines of organised activities and on the less controlled activities I may do myself - it doesn't help me. Being near death doesn't impact me positively or negatively - I'm almost apathetic to it.
Not having the luxury of either family, friend or partner to bail me out I must work or sleep on the streets within weeks. No other options due to my inability to function as a normal human. Personal responsibility is a wonderful thing.
The reason I ask is purely that I don't have either the time or the inclination to do something for myself as I don't deserve the help from me that others receive without question, oh and the fact that High Functioning AS adults currently don't get diagnosed (labelled) due to them being too clever and the only so called 'real help' out there costs an arm and a leg, both of which I'd rather keep hold of thanks!
I've also mentioned that it is probably important to get outside your own head - think about doing things that stop you thinking about yourself. However, as a caveat, I also recognise doing anything (like talking to another human being as you rightly point out!) can be extrememly stressful.
I think I have depression, with social anxiety. I have signs of bipolar, I get symptoms of SAD, I have trichotillomania, I have mild OCD that gets worse if I'm stressed, I have panic attacks, I over think everything, I have low self-esteem and no confidence, I feel suicidal most days and a million other mini-labels. Doesn't help me though. It's the classic 'what's in a name?'
I hope you see my point. We sound very similar yet I would class myself as a people pleaser, I rarely sure emotion outside the house and am overly polite to even strangers. So whilst HFSA might apply in parts, it doesn't solve everything.
I don't know when you wrote this or how your feeling now but I am feeling the thoughts.
I feel the exact same way, we are all lead to believe that we are unique. This is the strangest thing I've ever experienced. I do believe we need to chat together. The way you feel is the exact same as I feel in my life right now.
Big hug & prayers to you Steve. I know this is years later but I can't help but tear up when you speak of dystonia, because my mum had it and I'm sure it was the toughest time in her life. She did recover though with prayer & Botox injections etc. I wish you strength.
I no exactly how you feel.reading what you've wrote sounds like I wrote it myself I just don't have an answer to give you I wish I did I'd help myself too , I just wanted you to no there are others who feel the same . Cbt isn't helping me either.
If so many of us are feeling the same way, it almost seems like it is actually normal to feel this way about life.
That's exactly how I felt the first time I had depression.
Anti-depressants can help but every person's brain is different so pills aren't a one size fits all sort of thing. It can take time to work, or even to find the right ones for you. I tried 2 before the third drug worked for me. But that is something you may want to discuss with your gp or counsellor.
I'm wary of drugs anyway. But I gave them about three months plus and no effect at all. If my life meant I had to take drugs forever I'd rather not anyway!
I read through your posts and found them to be really helpful as Ive suffered from anxiety and depression since 18 but never really knew what it was till recently. I decided recently to go back to a low amount of medication for anxiety and depression to hopefully keep me mellow as I broke down walking home from work one day and locked myself away for a while.
I suffered from my first major breakdown at 21 now 27, I started a new job as a teacher I was fine for the first 2 months but the more responsibility I took on the more i got stressed and anxiety and evently depression kicked in. I couldnt hold myself together and would go home and cry myself to sleep. I didnt want people to see me the way I was including my family and as I had moved to a new area in the UK only had a few friends I could confide in about what I was going through. Now when i look back on it i just wish i had been more wiser as seeked a second opinion as my doctor at the time just said i needed to get out more and see more friends. I was actually doing ok and enjoyed helping students with there studies and a lot of it was in my head. In the end my parents came down and took me home and looked after me and got me back to a normal state.
Id like to say am cured and never suffer from it but that would be lying. But once i got back on my feet i went travelling had some great experiences and now living in Australia.
Im not going to say am perfect now as I have another dilema in my life if I want to stay in Australia or go home as feeling not completly settled and I have been in Aus for nearly 5 years.
Im not sure if this has helped and sorry if I have rambled on but I wish you luck in the future. I try and do one at least one new experience a week if thats trying a new restaurant, go on a date or meet a new person. I started hitting the gym more as its very cliche but feel so much better after going.
Hope you feel better soon. Have a listen to a band called the Album Leaf it helps me relax and close off my mind.
I'm not sure what I'll do now, think teaching is gone, can't see what I can do to keep me 'sane' as a career and find very little point in most things. I go to CBT but it just feels like we're talking about philosophy, my way of thinking hasn't changed one iota.
I had no reasons to think this way, I created them almost. Now I actually have no job etc. I am not a victim, I did it to myself. I think I have just given up, if I see 2015 I will be a little surprised as I imagine something will come along in next few months that will be enough to knock me fully over the edge; an unexpected bill, a worry how I'm impacti
Yeah teaching isnt for everyone and at that time in my life it wasnt. Have you thought about going travelling for extended time go work some jobs you never thought you would do. I worked on a farm stay and at one point cooked up a meal for 40 people which i never thought I could do and had to wash emus and feed osterichs lol. I know its hard to save but just cutting some luxarys out makes it a little easier.
Australia is beautiful place dont get me wrong and i have some amazing friends but do miss my family a lot as there all back in the UK. I only get to see them like 3 weeks a year and still want to travel more.
I know how you feel as recently i left my job like yourself and have only had two weeks off and feel like i should be back at work but am slowly working on parts of my life with the time off I have. its good to have structure which am lacking at the moment as am going to bed late and getting up in the afternoons but now after 2 weeks of i need to change my ways and start getting a few things off my to do list as then i feel satisifed and happier for myself.
It funny how you mention about reason of been depressed there doesnt always need to be a root cause. I had a job with people that i got on with most of the time but as i sat there everyday at the same desk, talking to pretty much the same people with the same problems I realised there must be something else Id rather be doing and needed some time off to help realise what that will be. Im now looking at jobs where i can help people as i miss the one to one and want a job that i find rewarding. You just need to mix things up in life, there isnt one set route and if you want to do something different you can there is no wrong paths.
I do love travelling but now, having just had to quit work, it isn't even possible for me to 'save' at all. Besides, my gf still has a job so I'm taking on my full time job of being a burden
I too only really get enjoyment from helping others, the issue comes that when that 'problem' is solved I feel of no use and begin to withdraw. I have done it with friends and family. My girlfriend is a case in point, she had relationship, financial and work issues and I helped her solve all of these to be in a better place to the point now she considers everything to be pretty good in those departments, but I have nothing left to offer her. Worse still, I am now only going to be a burdn on her financially and emotionally and can offer her no decent future prospects. All that swims in my head is ""if you love them let them go"" as staying with her seems very selfish.
However, she is the first person who I have ever really shared this with. My past relationships completed the cycle! She understands as much as one can and is very supportive but I feel that her patience must run out eventually (she's a teacher so she does have a lot!) and she shouldn't have to deal with this anyway.
I wish I could find just one positive to focus on. I really can't. The only one I should have (my gf) I twist to make it one of the biggest negatives - me being a burden to her. I'm not fun, I'm not confident, I now have no job, I have cr*p future financially, I can never acheive in basic things like house buying etc (I've never even owned a car in my name!) because every time I get myself on an even keel I sabotage it best I can, waiting for the disaster to hit.
"Yeah my family remind me how much an achievement it is but i feel like am missing a lot of family time which i do crave and a Greggs Sausage Roll .
Hi, a late response to your post,I just really felt the need to reply. So much of what you said resonates with me, actually all of it does. The feeling like a burden thing, especially to my husband who is a fully functioning member of society who although sympathetic doesn't really get how others aren't so I can't shake the feeling that I'm dragging him down and why on earth would he want to hang around. The day to day struggle to perform simple tasks ie make a phone call, deal with the plumber, go to the shops for food. I could go on forever with my feelings but really I just seem to be someone whom life is just to hard for. And like you, it's for no good reason.
I fully empathise with your issues, they sound identical! I beat myself up a little more as, being a man, society expects you to step up - think I get weird looks when the gf is dealing with everything!
I understand exactly what you mean Ihm88. That's how I feel as well. I have always found life hard work as well and nothing has come easy for me. I wish something would for a change :d
I am 60 now and am tired, tired of fighting, and fairly tired of living but hey ho I have made it this far so some credit is due I guess.
I am just living now to make sure I get the pension I deserve after working all my life. Can't get it til 65 (hate the barstewards who changed that). I am determined to get my money's worth and live til at least 96
I feel just the same as you do. I really do not find anything to be impressive anymore and that makes me feel like I've seen it all. I just cant help to think there's nothing new even when it is.
I just googled ""I am tired of life"" and came across your discussion. I read your initial entry and thought I was reading about myself. I thought you stated your position extremely well and showed a tremendous amount of insight.
I also feel like my partner/wife would be better off without me. I know it. I have given up on relationships and have very few friends left. I wished I had an answer but even if I feel like I have an answer, it doesn't mean I will follow it simply because I am tired of trying. About the only three things get me somewhat excited are loooking forward to my next bike tour, my dog, and volunteering which gives me a good dose of perspective. Except for spending time with my do, doing the other 2 are requiring more and more effort.
I feel like I am fanning the flames instead of trying to help so I will stop. I hope you and others with the same situation will find some relief.
Paulsinbc you sound very similar! I'm impressed you can volunteer, I struggle with people and then somehow feel worse as I think I should be able to cope compared to people who have REAL problems. I've never felt hard done by or unfortunate - my problems are me!
However, you're right, there is an element of fanning the flames! The reason I've largely stopped looking at this site is I don't see a benefit for me or anyone else. I recognise some may get comfort from support from like minded people, or signposted to suitable resources or recognise symptoms of PTS or similar, but for me all I read is people who live with it forever with no answers and that in itself is depressing.
So for that reason I'm very much keeping this site at arms length. I'd unrealistically hoped for advice or signposting or, ridiculously, a miracle cure but it's more a gathering for people to support each other with knowing nods or virtual hugs. I recognise the support that may give to others but for me, it just makes me feel worse.
Little has changed. I tried drugs, didn't work, I tried therapy, too much religion and not willing to try again - a weird catch 22 in where you need to ask for help but are afraid of talking to people even day to day. Friends are nonexistent, I quit my job and haven't returned. I still feel like a burden to those around me, and how ever much they care it doesn't excuse it - in fact it makes it worse. I can't escape feeling that if I was a good person then I'd protect them from me - if you were highly infectious with a deadly disease would you hug your family? So internally and externally, very much status quo. I'm still here, slightly surprisingly.
It is fair to say I'm confused as to my wants and beliefs about my situation. One day it's just me and there is no hope, next day it's won't please someone give me a magic wand (but I won't ask!). If I seem ungrateful with any responses then that wasn't my intention, maybe it's my way, I always focus on negative and all I see is lots of people struggling and no-one coming out the other side. It feels like the blind leading the blind.
Further more most people seem to have a good reason through circumstance or substance abuse or dramas in their life -I'm just like this for no real reason. Pretty pathetic really.
My girlfriend does support me but it both helps me survive and yet stops me facing my issues and makes me feel not good enough and as if I'm holding her back. I know she doesn't feel that, but I feel like it MUST or it will eventually when she realises what she'll miss out on.
Cycles of mood are continuous but rarely hit a positive slant, some days I'm just ok and potter around and others I feel the strongest urge to give up. The only trigger I know doesn't help (but isn't crucial) is the weather but that's common with lots of people. A bad day will turn in to a bed day easily if it's grey! Lucky I live in UK
I've tried improvements in diet etc but I'm not exactly a bad eater anyway, exercise is fine but doesn't really change anything, just gives me something to do. Easily lose will to do it though. My socialising is obviously nonexistent and I try to encourage girlfriend to do her own thing with friends in that respect.
So in summary, nothings changed, I'm in a state of status quo, every plan I come up with I find a major flaw in, I strongly doubt there's a way out, I hate the way I look, sound and feel and feel I should protect people from their own blinkered love.
I agree, I have nothing to really complain about, I almost wish I did as then it'd explain it. I just can't cope with society; I can't even talk to people on the phone or worry about what a stranger thinks of me. I just don't know what to do; stubbornness, stupidity, anxiety stops me from doing things and every time I try to fight it I can only keep up the pretence for a while and then everything collapses. I just know I'm right - we seem scared to admit some people are just failures and not equipped. We could name loads of people in our lives we could say are useless or horrible etc, but the second their is an element of affection for them is we decide to lie to them and ourselves - ""they're just unlucky/ need help/ have hidden talents"" - I don't believe it.
I have, and if not struggling, do still do a fair bit of exercise. Cycling, jogging etc but fitness has never really helped. In my 20s particularly I was extremely fit but it didn't help. When I said way I look I meant more appearance than shape.
Oh and yeah, very fair to say I'm boring! Never smoked, done drugs, broken the law, have no wild stories, rarely drink, don't socialise, am afraid of people - I'm as vanilla as it comes! I know it's easy to change that if I wanted but I also can't on the same hand if that makes sense. If I'm not boring, you couldn't describe anyone as boring!
There's a degree of melancholy one experiences when depressed and with it comes the stubborness-I know, Ive been there. It doesn't help and you have to avoid the temptation to ruminate in it. Boring? Even if someone else did describe you in that way it's only their own subjective opinion. Ps I've found one of my hidden talents so I can't agree with you there. Inevitably you'll be good at something. I wasn't pointing out the good in your life to guilt trip you, I was hoping you could come up with a few more. Practicing gratefulness/thanking people raises happiness
I smiled at that last comment - my girlfriend says I'm too nice. It's a idea I struggle with (how can someone be too nice?) but she says people just take advantage or walk all over me. I'd bend over backwards to help a stranger even if it detrimented me which is possibly part and parcel of the worrying about what others think element. So whilst on here I may come across ungrateful I can assure you I'm not really - this is perhaps my selfish place. I've tried to be very thankful for all the responses on here, I just struggle to see any benefit in it.
You can't say you have a hidden talent and then not say what it is that's just mean...! Good for you though. Genuinely. However some people are just bang on average, I'm one of those. I'm not in some deluded spiral that makes me think I'm the worst at anything, or have a difficult hand or anything, I'm just realistic and know I, like many others, are just bang on average but if I do dip one way it's always the worse than average way. It's my head that beats me up for my limitations and stops me just fuctioning - it's hard to explain so I'll stop!
Trying to think of good things is difficult for me, I can't think of anything I can't put a negative slant on! Maybe I'm good at arguing... But if I look at widely accepted sections of my life it's not a good overall picture:
Family - fed up with me, disappointed and feel sorry for me on one hand. Have never really included me anyway (but maybe that's my withdrawal tendancies)
Love Life - good and yet that makes it bad! If I didn't care about her I'd be quite happy taking advantage but if you love someone you don't want to hurt them in any way, emotionally, financially, future etc. If you love them let them go as the saying goes...
Financially - was poor, sorted with job, would be cleared up in a few years (credit) but don't struggle day to day at all as girlfriend is very successful. So I'm just leaching...
Friends - if you can measure a person by their friends then I'm zero. I mean zero, not one person. My fault, there fault it, it doesn't really matter.
Career - down the pooper! Can't return to full time teaching, know I can't do that. To 'stuck up' for want of a better word to take a shop job knowing I trained to be a teacher. Also can't find another job that is term time only (to spend time with partner). I'd struggle in ANY job anyway. Too overqualified for most things that might suit purpose. Supply is possibility but that means new people and stuff every day - not my string point! Plus it means phone calls for availability and I can't talk on phone! Pathetic, whinging, excuse riddled crap eh? Not on benefits or anything as gf is on plentiful wage.
I do appreciate your help/advice. I still wonder if it's just character rather than depression. Maybe I'm just a cynical, boring, lonely, ugly loner. That's fine when it's just you, a killer when you feel you're holding others back from a 'proper' life.
I search for topic on ""Tired of life"" because i feel the same as you.
Reading your issues, I feel that I am reading about myself, maybe I am worst than you.
Is it good or bad, happy or sad to know that I and you are not alone?
So you and I are normal, there are many people around us feeling this way.
Solution? I have none else i will not be here looking for an answer.
Resisting the urge to get in to a theological debate... let's just agree to disagree. Sometimes I envy those with faith, today I almost feel anger... Anyway, my problem not yours.
I'm as tired as I've ever been. Tired, bored and had enough. I can't even think of a positive thing to say. I think I'm ready to sleep now.
I do appreciate responses but worry there is no hope. Maybe I can't hear it even if there is....
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
"Thanku so much for your reply, however I was tested for h pylori virus two weeks ago my results came back last Friday saying negative for h pylori. Pain is worse than ever before today so have had to leave work and come home, I have docs appt at 4 and will ask to be referred as I thankfully have bupa ins, managed to get an appt with stomach specialist for tomorrow. Terrified it's something serious :-s
I went to the doctors on Friday 25/10 and got referred to a private hospital THANKFULLY (finding the nhs doctors not very helpful at all if im honest). So Saturday 26/10 I went and saw a stomach specialist, he listened to all my symptoms and what I had been going through and how long, I also told him about the Lansoprazole which wasn't working at all (which he said if its not working, stop taking it which I did), he examined my stomach (felt it) and booked me in for an Ultrasound which was on Wednesday 30/10 and an Endsocopy on Wednesday 06/11, he didn't comment on what it could be as he said he needed to run these tests first. I asked him what I could do for the pain in the mean time, he said he didn't know as he didn't know what was wrong, which is a fair comment but to maybe try paracetmol and see if that helps.
So the pain in my stomach was still feeling horrendous, flaring up general mornings and afternoons to the point it would make me get extremely upset and not knowing what to do with myself, on Sunday 27/10 so much so I just said to my other half pls just look online and see what I can do to cope! I seriously didn't think I was going to make it to either of the coming appointments. I get upset stomach a couple of times a day too which added to the worry.
He looked online and said it sounds like I have an ulcer so basically said to me to eat every 2 hours (little and often), stop drinking tea (I only have 4 a day anyway) so I have exchanged it for 3 green teas a day, I used to have 1 can of sprite in the evening with my dinner which I have stopped as you shouldn't drink fizzy drinks, I have stopped eating spicy foods, I used to smoke 5 cigarettes a day which I have reduced by 1 so now smoke 4 a day and only have one after eating... Long story short it this seems to of stopped my stomach flaring into mega pain however the pain is still there but luckily it enabled me to go to work etc.
So I had the ultrasound, ALL CLEAR! which was a massive relief as I was petrified they was going to pick up something bad... he checked ALL my organs and said it all looks absolutely fine, which was a huge relief however they don't pick up stomach ulcers on an ultrasound so I still needed an endoscopy to see what was going on inside my stomach however the relief I had that the scan was all clear.
So it felt like a week took forever to roll round until the Endoscopy, Wednesday 6th November was finally here, which I was extremely nervous about as the thought of having a camera down my throat into my stomach which was sooooooo painful was terrifying, my apt was at 3.15 and I wasn't allowed to eat for 6 hours before hand.
I had the endoscopy under Sedation (which didn't fully work) however it didn't take them long to do it and the doctor and nurses were amazing and really put me at ease. To be honest I was just glad when it was all over, however my results were ALL CLEAR! No ulcer and from what he said my stomach all looked fine!
Well in a way it was lovely to hear however what is this pain I have been getting! So as you can imagine I am no further forward really, my stomach is still extremely tender I feel sick all of the time, I have a lump in my throat I am eating and drinking all the right things (as far as im concerned) I have had the all clear on all tests so far WHAT DO I DO ?
The consultant didn't have time to see me after the endoscopy, so now im booked in to see him on Monday 25/11 yes another two weeks away I am pinning so much on this apt, I can't surely live with this pain for the rest of my life, I don't want to go out or do anything its a struggle to come to work and I am just sick of not feeling well.
The one thing that I have changed in my life since xmas is I started taking Asda's own A-Z Vitamins and Minerals, could I per allergic maybe? I stopped taking these on Thursday 07/11 however to date haven't noticed a difference in how I feel, how long should I leave it for to see if it is them?
I know, I thought the exact thing, how can I have so much pain yet nothing be there? As I say the consultant didn't see me after like he was meant to and I have an apt with him Monday week, however I would of thought he would of told me something after the endoscopy?
I haven't lost or gained any weight I am exactly the same, as much as I feel sick I have been eating regularly (I am a creature of habbit anyway!)
Well I went privately and when the I saw the consultant he said that I would have the endoscopy (by him) and then he would see me afterwards to tell me what he saw... however on the day the apt before me over over ran so I think that's why he had to shoot off hence why he booked me in to see him Monday week.
I'm not sure what is going on with you, but a few years ago I had unexplained gastritis that the doctors did not take seriously. Everything I ate caused nausea than diarrhea. I was losing a lot of weight and since I am already naturally underweight, I didn't have much to spare. I finally was prescribed marinol, which helped with keeping food down, but if I didnt take it the symptoms returned.. I eventually completely modified my diet and did a yeast cleanse (no sugar (grains) and certain yeast friendly foods) for 2 weeks. Then I went on the Paleo diet. My symptoms disappeared.. I don’t know if this works for you.. but it sounds like you’ve tried a lot of the harder stuff already.
Thank you for writing, How long did your gastritis go on for in total? Luckily I haven't been sick as yet even though I feel on the edge of being sick all the time, however I do get a constant upset stomach.
I am finding that since I have been eating every two hours (little and often) it has helped, however I still get upset stomach in the mornings and every early evening, strange as its generally always the same sort of time and mixing up what I eat doesnt' seem to change that either.
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
I stayed on the Paleo diet for 6 months. I had to stop because I got married, and my husband was not as supportive of my diet. It became too hard to continue it when the other person in the house continued questioning its effectiveness. I really believed that it helped though and always recommend it to anyone with stomach problems. When I stopped doing it, I was okay for about 4 months, then the symptoms started to come back.I struggle with gastritis occasionally now... So that would be 3 years now.. but of those three years I spent 18 months of it pregnant and 6 months of it on the diet. I did not have the symptoms when I was pregnant.
My wife has twice had a similar problem to you. First time she was admitted to hospital and like you had all the tests. Nothing found t account for the pain. I suggested that she take Aloe Vera and after a few weeks it worked. When she had a follow up appointment the consultant was non committal about her remedy.
Three years ago my wife had the same symptoms again and went through the same tests plus a CT scan. Again nothing was found. She has been taking Aloe Vera every day since. She has stopped it a few times when on holiday etc but has been glad to get back on to it so now takes capsules away with her.
Just to give an update on me, since last writing I received confirmation from my consultant that the Endoscopy results were all clear, I since had blood tests testing me for pretty much everything which came back all clear, toilet sample tests all clear, and a colonoscopy which 4 biopsy's were taken again ALL CLEAR! My consultant didn't want to put me in for a CT scan as he is confident with the tests that he has done (he said if it gets worse that would be next but to go away and see how I get on)
I will have to look into Aloe Vera Capsules, out of interest, what was your reasoning to suggest for her to take the Aloe Vera Capsules? I wonder what is in them that is helping her stomach?
I have to be a little careful regarding spicy food still however I am trying to have it now and again just so my stomach gets used to it.
Hi I'm from the US .. I'm dealing with the sane things now ... Nothing worked ... Was taking Prilosec I mean everything lol.. The doc said I might she. Pylori so they put me on antibiotics that I hate. Just waiting on another endoscopy. I'm also waiting for my stool test. I keep hearing ppl say to try Bragg's apple cider vinegar. I put a capful in my water and felt better. Aloe Vera did help me in the past but I think I need to try another brand. I cut out eating everything. I can only tolerate chicken mainly now. I hope we do get better. The stress is killing me. I feel your pain Jenny... I hope they find a cure soon
Since last writing I feel like I am getting somewhere (well my stomach isn't a daily nightmare, at the moment anyway), as I said I am still taking the Acidophilus Plus capsules which I think are my savour! Since taking these it seems to of made a massive impact on my stomach, In 5 1/2 weeks I have just had 3 flare ups! which is amazing compared to having it daily for 3 1/2 MONTHS!
Last week (due to the flare ups I had again - which all happened in the same week) I decided to go to a nutritionist and have a food allergy test done. It didn't show that I had any sever food allergies however there was about 8 things that showed up that ""stressed"" my digestive system if eaten, so now I have changed my diet again so I only have those items in small amounts on occasion. I hope this is the cure!
Very interesting and definately sounds like a posibility as all my sypthoms are listed! i will mention to my stomach specialist when I next see him.
I am curious to find out what food you are avoiding. I have had the EXACT same symptoms. 2 years ago, I went to my doctor, and she suggested that I may have an intolerance to gluten. She suggested I remove all gluten from my diet, and take probiotics. I did that, and felt so much better after 10 days. I still have flare-ups now and then, and have been wondering if I have an intolerance to other foods as well. So far, I think it may be nuts, egg yolks, brocolli, and aspartame. This week, I have had severe flare-ups, and have become very nervous in what I can eat. I am wondering if I also have an intolerance to dairy products.
I went to see my doctor (unfortunately not the same one that recommended going gluten-free) and she has ordered an ultrasound for tomorrow. She thinks it is my appendix. My 'gut' feeling is that she is wrong, and do not want to go through a bunch of tests.
I have the same thing. We have an over the counter medicine called mylanta and I drink that all the time all it is is an antacid it helps sort of.
I have been in and out of doctors also blood test ultrasound x rays all come up perfectly fine.
But I'm kind of at a standstill I don't know what to do stage of the game also
I do have known food allergies
I'm allergic to nuts berries sulfites nitrates nitrites processed meats of any kind
I should add my particular symptoms get better with food
If I don't eat is when it actually hurts but I get very very cold
I feel my best first thing in the morning I usually start to feel sick 2 o'clock in the afternoon not really sure what significant about that time 2 o'clock in the afternoon is when everything rears its ugly head
The one I went to was done by holding a silver tube in one hand and then on my other hand the lady put on and off a silver point to the tip of my finger, not sure if it pierced the skin or not if im honest, but the computer took readings from it.
in Nov of 2009 i had a Nissen fundoplication, its a surgery where they wrap the top of my esophagus with a mesh to keep stomach acids from splashing up and causing extreme pain. it reduced my pain dramatically for about 2 years, and in 2011 the pain came back, i was checked for another hernia, ulcers, h pylori, celiacs disease, and many others. all results came back negative. I began just to live with the pain as a part of day to day life. about 4 months ago it got so bad that i had completely stopped eating and if i did eat i became very sick and dizzy. i again went to the doctor had much of the same tests done and again no results that would indicate a reason why it hurts. I have quit smoking, drinking alcohol and soda pop, spicy foods are unfortunately no longer a part of my life, and i am now no longer able to bend over and pick things up as it causes stomach pain. reading through your messages it sounds very similar to where i am at as well. Aloe Vera seems to help somewhat, however there is one thing i have tried that assists with helping subdue the pain so that i can eat, and that is the ingestion of cannabis.
Now i no this is always a sensitive topic, and is still illegal in most states in the US to include the state that i live in. but there is some medical research done into the effects of cannabis on stomach pain such as what i have and seemingly what you have as well. ""smoking"" of it DOES NOT HELP ME, in fact it almost makes it worse at times, however my mother lives in a state where it is legal to use for medical purposes, and i have been ingesting it for roughly a month and have been able to eat and maintain my lifestyle. I thought that i would share this with you as it seems like you have exhausted many resources and although its not the most ""professional and desirable"" way of treating this, it is working for me. I Hope that this helps you out.
Hi. I was wondering if I could have some Help with the same problem. I'm 17 years old and usually a very healthy girl. With no problems what so ever. Nearly 3 weeks ago, on a Thursday. I got up and did my usual routine, things that I would usually do and went out for food with my friends that night. I went to bed completely fine that night with no problems. at 2am the next morning I was woken up with unreal
Very good idea also, I just recently received my medicinal marijuana card back in April 2014.my girlfriend said that there's capsules for gastro problems. And she wants to get them and have her mom try themso of course the s bother thingsame idea popped into my head also.today being the third daythat I'm in so much pain I'm ready to go back to the ER like I did years ago when I found out my diagnosis as really bad acute gastritis.
although I don't see that happening considering my shoulder is dilapidated,/ing now effecting my elbow! It just hurts so bad knowing that I spent years for 8 hours a day to train my body to do things normal people cant do, to get hit by a car,find out I have degenerative disc disease among MANY OTHER THINGS.I Also had Kawasaki disease as a child and because it's such a rare disease I figured maybe they should have followed me my whole life to see how it effects you 30 years later.I wish much luck to all of youmany prayers and much love God bless Sincerely
I wish my doctors at my pain clinic would use the same common sense.all they do is mask the real problems, shots on my knees shots on my shoulders shots in my elbowsback procedures rhyzotomy they go in and burn off 13 pinched nerve give me a walking epidural gram and do a facet joint block,they did the same thing to my neck twice it didn't work so now they did the rhyzotomy on my neck w 4 herniated disc and one bulging herniated discs.I just recently received my medicine medical marijuana card back in AprilI went to a dr and got his approval for chronic painso I haven't tried much but the hash seems to work out and I know they have stomach pills also in little capsules that I might try also!
I am also having gastritis.its been a year.. Really tired of the dull pain in upper abdomen and medicines also not working. Had done endoscopy also.. Really worried, what is happening with me : (
Unfortunately I am know further forward. Still get the same syptoms swollen upper stomach and bad upset stomach regularly, not every day like it was however guaranteed minimum once a week I really don't know what is causing it as is the same whatever I eat, if I am stressed or not!
The only thing I can think may be causing it is run down/tiredness ? Which I am all the time! lol
Thank you so much for your post, unfortunately as much as I wish i had I have not yet got round to trying Yoga, however I am extremely keen still to do so!
Unfotunately I lead a very hectic lifestyle and am finding it difficult to fit anything else in, however new years resolution is to start
I am from the United states and like you have been experiencing the same exact thing as you. Spent alot of time in and out of doctors and emergency rooms only to find out that nobody knows what was wrong with me. I finally found a doctor in my town who is also a younger one and he told me it was caused by anxiety. He ended up putting me on an anti depressant which eventually stopped the pain
I have nearly all the same symptoms as you except I use to just feel like getting sick all the time where now I do. At first they thought it was ulsers then H pylori but they haven't got a clue really my stomach pains are starting to get out of hand now and all the tests are coming back clear any advise .?
It's amazing that stomachs can behave like this with no known cause. It's my story, too, so my heart goes out to those who suffer with like issues. I've had gobs of tests, endoscopies, CTs, blood tests, etc etc. My doctor cannot tell me why my stomach hurts at the very top, sometimes burns, sometimes a dull ache. This time it has been ongoing, not constant (comes and goes) for 16 months. More frequent and small meals help. I do have a reflux problem and IBS. I have been taking Nexium for years but try to take it only 3 times a week instead of every day. I also use Kefir at least several times a week. Still, I wish I knew what causes this. One of my docs told me a lot of people have this problem and no cause is discovered. Frustrating at best.
I am at my wits end as well, such a mystery and I wish I could find some answers. With me, my pain comes in cycles/flares, I can have a constant pain which is achey/twinges in the upper central abdomen, about 2 inches above my belly button. My pain will last anywhere from a few weeks to a few months, then magically disappears, this is why I call it flares. Have had all the tests a few years back. Ultrasound, endoscopy, colonoscopy, tested for celiac etc... My pain is constant, it does very in intensity through the day, but it's always there, smack dab in the middle of my upper abdomen. Nothing I eat makes it worse or better, bowels are soft than hard, so i was told it's ibs. But why would ibs come and go like this? I can sometimes go months and be fine, but when it does happen, I have it for weeks/months and it is relentless. The only thing my ultrasound ever showed was a fatty liver (which I have been told is not the source of my pain) and if even I did think it was this, my pain is central, not to the right (where your liver is) My endocopy a few years back only showed mild inflammation, could these be gastritis attacks? Any info/input would be greatly appreciated...thanks
I had your symptoms years ago and it took 2.1/2 years for doctors to tell me I had Mucous Colitis! I was put on three different drugs which did help but never put it away. I changed my life style/diet and that helped. I came off the medication because of the worry of all the dude affects! I was then tested positive for H-Pylori and was put on triple therapy antibiotics and felt better. But have gone on vicious cycle of infections v antibiotics and lots of inflammation!
Hi Pam, i can relate to your Flares as thats exactly what i have. I had an attack 3 weeks ago and all my stomach felt on fire and swollen, it was excruciating. My doctors said my stomach felt swollen as i told her i thought the swelling was affecting my bladder as i could feel pressure on it making me need to wee more often. I too was told i had a small patch of inflammation after an endoscopy, also a small hiatus hernia. I am really scared of it becoming a regular thing as i am worried what damage it can do to my stomach. Ihave had 2 ultrasounds this year and also told i have slightly fatty liver. Hope someone can come up with a way to help us all cure this painful condition.
All I can say is that reading all of these has been a HUGE releif for me. I have been dealing with the same symptoms discussed on this board for close to 4 years now. Utrasound, endoscopy, cat scans all check out normal. I have seen 4 doctors, digestion specialists. Everyone says ""there is nothing wrong with you."" I questions if it could be anxiety related, but have been told it is not (even though is causes it) The last thing I was told was thast I must have gotten a bacterial infection that still lingers. I have been on pro-biotics and am currently taking panterprozale for stomach acid and slight inlfmation in my esophagus. I have vowed to find a ""cure"" for myself. Andi, I will. Knowing that you all are out there helps me know I am not in this alone. Anything I find, I will share. I have tried to describe it to other people, but they simpy cannot understand what it is to live with this day in and day out. It is constantly on my mind and I am sure all of yours. If anyone has heard of any new remedies please share.
Thank you all so much for the information. I'm about 6 months into this problem, but I get severe pain in the middle of my chest too. My stomach hurts all the time and sometimes it's so bad I'm close to doubling over. I'm also nauseaus all the time, but don't vomit. The pain in my chest gets that bad too and will hurt into my back. Most times I feel hungry even after I've eaten a full meal, so I will try to eat something mild thinking it will help and then I'm really full and feel worse than when I started.
Hi great to find this.my symptoms started suddenly on my birthday
It looks like I'm in the same boat. About 3 years ago I began having stomach aches, dull pain in my stomach, like someone put a brick in there for fun. After about 2 weeks of constant pain I went through all the usual tests, from blood, scans, endo/colonoscopy, h-pylori, etc etc.
3 months later, Docs said it was stress related and IBS was main diagnosis. I didn't lose weight, or had bathroom problems.
I thought I was truly doomed, then one day it went away like magic, literally magic. Haven't had the pain since until last week after a spicy meal. I thought it was just the food, but I'm a week in and quite honestly terrified. I don't know if I can go through another few months of this day in and day out.
good luck. I would like to know what you're told. I have been having the same symptoms for 4 years. All tests show nothing, thankfully. Been on pantaprozol for a year. Trying to come off now. Need to find the source not just cover it up.
yes, I've had them both, not on this occasion as I'm only a week and 1 day into the pain again, and the thought of doing them again is not pleasant to be honest!
I have been suffering with severe pain and diarrhea for years now. 2 weeks ago I was hospitalized and did all the tests (colonoscopy, endoscopy, ultra sound, Xray, CT scan, MRI, stool and blood testing for bugs) EVERYTHING CAME OUT FINE. I am so frustrated as I am a college student trying to do well in school and being woken up by intense pain. I tried going paleo, now I'm just dairy free, they put me on anti biotics but I'm going to stop them because truthfully at this point I have little faith in western ""classic"" treatments and feel as if the answer lies in something more homeopathic. Have you had any luck? Thank you. This is such a struggle and so so frustrating.
I had to give up tea coffee fruit juices all I drink is boiled water and I had to stay away from sugar all I eat is salmon with all purpose seasoning in over with boiled rice salad tuna steak
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
thank you so much for your message, very interesting and could definitely be a possibility! I had an ultrasound of my organs but nothing came up however maybe they wasn't thorough around my uterus?
I am due to go to the doctors for a smear over the next could of weeks so will speak to the nurse then.
I had stomach pain, bloating , nausea and really bad periods. The pain would vary from really bad to just like cramps. My last fibroid got so big it was affecting my kidney. I had trouble going to the bathroom because it go so big. Small fibroids can just make you uncomfortable. There are two types of ultrasounds, the first is one where they put the gel on you and move it around over your uterus. The other is that they put wand with a camera in side of your uterus and see if there is any fibroids and the location of them. I hope this helps
Thanks Amy, the only symptom that I don't have is really bad periods however the others are the same.
Last year (6 months ago) I was diagnosed with CIN 3 cervical cells which I had to have removed I wonder if it could all be linked maybe....
My symptoms have been exactly like yours but over a few years. More frequent now but all clear everywhere like you. I am having ct scan for closer look at upper abdomen and pancreas now. Did you take a few supplements each day or any other meds we could have in common that could cause it? What does the aloe Vera do? Do you get upper abdominal pain in middle of night?
Hey I'm from Canada and iv been experiencing the exact same problems for the past 3years! Everyday is a struggle constant nausea, direahha, constipation, major stomach aches, feeling like total crap. Iv had so many tests run on me and everything cams back negative which is so frustrating cause there's gotta be a reason as to why many of us feel this way. When I was pregnant with my daughter all the problems had gone even for 2 months after she was born I thought it had finally gone away but I was wrong it came back full throttle! Hope someone figures this out soon
Hi everyone! I have similar symptoms for about 6 yrs now. I've been in and out of hospitals trying to figure out what's wrong, my last visit was last week and I was in the hospital for 2 days. I had an ultrasound, and tons of blood tests and a stool sample test. They wanted to do an endoscopy but they decided it wasn't the best time since I'm 27 weeks pregnant. Blood work came out great and I'm still waiting to hear on the stool sample plus a separate blood test to check for an auto immune disease. My pain starts below the rib cage and extends to my right backside. The ultrasound came back normal. Gallbladder, lived, and pancreas looked fine but I'm still having this extreme pain. They think it could be a number of things...possibly microscopic gallstones, possibly an auto immune disease, possibly celiac disease, or even the pancreas but can only be sure until I have that endoscopy. I'm due in June so I can't wait! I also wanted to mention that the only thing that seems to take the pain away for small amounts of time is a heating pad. They prescribed me Zantac 150 mg and some lidocaine patches which haven't helped. I just want answers and soon.
I am having similar symptoms as well.
I also have been having stomach pains. I've been to hospital 3 different times. And everything cam back normal. It doesn't make since to me to be in so much pain and it be nothing. I have pains all throughout my stomach.. My sides, and my back. Even a little lower then my stomach. Some pains are sharp, shooting, radiating, cramping. Right now I'm having pains in my right ribs. And lower back. There were days I would feel like something is in my throat, and some nausea. The pains are getting more consistent. I have not gone to the doctor yet, but as bad as it is getting guess I will have to soon. What kind of dr. Should I even go to? My primary doctor, my ob? After reading everyone's posts, I'm thinking of looking into the aloe Vera capsules or some probiotics. Bt I need something!! And what pain medicine should I take? Advil, Tylenol, alieve? I need help!!
I pray by now you have found relief from your GI symptoms. For many years, I also have suffered with all kinds of persistant abdominal pain and discomfort. Three different doctors, Gastroenterologist, could not come up with anything more than IBS (Irritated Bowel Syndrom). If you have not been able to find the etiology of your pain, you might try getting off all dairy products. A drug named Bentyl helps with my cramps along with a heating pad.
have you had your CT Scan Yet? I went back to the doctors last week absolutely useless! The doctor I saw said ""you have ibs"" and prescribed me laxatives! (I do not need laxitives to say the least!) anyway, I went to my chemist (he is fantastic I would say better than I doctor) He said ""don't take this prescription - yes it is a laxitve and I don't think you have ibs!"" he said to go to the supermarket and buy ""ONKEN NATURAL YOGURT"" and take a tablespoon morning, lunch and night, basically this has live good bacteria in (acidiphilu in particular which is what I have been taking in tablet form) he said the live yogurt is better and the tablets are processed ect.
So I have been doing just that for just under a week now, only time will tell, my chemist thinks that its an imbalance of bacteria in my stomach which is causing this and by having this yogurt after time it should even itself out again and become normal! I have stopped my Acidiphilus tablets and just having the yogurt.... only time will tell.
Meanwhile one good thing about going to the doctors, I asked to be referred to see the stomach specialist again, so I am now booked in to see my specialist end of April (nhs is a waiting game) so hopefully he will refer me for a CT scan as that was what he said last time!
I haven't tried the aloe vera yet, im going to see how I get on with the yogurt and take it from there.
Anyway my wife has been taking it for about 19 years and is still here to tell the tale.
Very interesting! sounds like im going through what she did!
Well I will see how I get on when I see the consultant / CT Scan (if he still agrees I need this) if that's all clear and there is another silence I will definitely try the aloe vera!
For years because of not being good at getting up in the morning my breakfast consisted of two ginger biscuits and a cup of tea. I ate several apples a day as our house at that time had been built on the site of an orchard.
Recently, I’ve had two incidences of positive feedback (yes - it’s amazing!) regarding treatment advice I gave for nausea. In both cases, I had advised eating a humble ginger biscuit and in both cases the feedback was it worked surprisingly well. One patient was shocked that a young-ish doctor like myself would suggest ginger over a prescribed anti-emetic. From personal experience of being on a boat pre- scuba diving, ginger was a great cure for my sea-sickness.
Had ct scan back. All clear but they are saying probably pancreatitis as had that 13 years ago for a year. No ssymptoms of this at all though. I have got cysts on one kidney but they mean nothing. Now they are looking to see if maybe some kind of bowel issue slthough i have no symotoms there at all! Basically no idea still
Thanks Jenny for sharing your story here. I am Aman Chopra from India and i have very similar symptoms as you have. I have this stomach ache since Sep 2013. All test including CT Scan, Endoscopy, Colonoscopy are done but all reports suggest i am fine.
Doctors have diagnosed it with IBS and i am not sure it's helping me either. I am going to try Aloe Vera Supplements as suggested above or Acidophilus tablets to check if it works for me. Keep sharing!
Hi, Jenny, my husband has had the same symptoms for over a year. We went to Domnican Republic and many of our group were ill with sickness diarroheah. My husband wasn't ill at the time but got ill when we got home. He was diagnosed with h pylori and took two courses of the three treatments (2 antibiotics and one gastro medicine). He didn't get any better and now having had two endoscopies, a colonoscopy, a CT scan, including putting dye into his body, two ultrasound scans, numerous blood tests, stool samples etc everything is coming back clear. He too was given laxatives despite not being constipated. He was told by one doctor that it was probably (!) IBS but he has none of the usual IBS symptoms. At the last appointment he was given a further blood test to look for coealic disease. We are due back to see consultant on 24 April. I (we) are almost positive it is not coealiac as he is not sick, does not have diarrohea. His symptoms are constant nausea coupled with stomach pain and the feeling of being stabbed between shoulder blades.
Had the same thing was put on omeprazole 20mg after2 weeks ok now just flares up when stressed , so I take them when needed only for few weeks untill feeling better , endoscopy last time showed inflammation gastritis first 2 endoscopy showed nothing , because the omeprazole had cleared it up before I had them , I know how depressing it can be , been on going on and off for last 15 yrs
Hi Maria, I see that your post is very old but I have to try at least. My mom has been suffering from the same symptoms as your husband. An excruciating pain in her stomach or pancreatic area, she has gone through all the tests - endoscopie, a colonoscopy, a CT scan, two ultrasound scans, numerous blood tests, stool samples etc and everything comes out good. Based on her results she should be the healthiest person on Earth but she's in so much pain anytime she eats anything or drinks anything. Now she's basically not eating to prevent the pain, but she's loosing tons of weight and we are worried how much longer can she live like this. I see you wrote that some doctor said that there is some part of a stomach that is hard to see from any kind of test . Have you had any luck figuring out what was the problem with your husband? I really hope that you have already figured it out and that your husband is feeling better now. Please let me know if you have any update or any information that could help us. Thank you! Martina
Hi, how is your Mother doing now? She sounds just like me. I went 3 weeks without eating due to fear of the pain. Then I eased back into eating for 1 week, now I'm back in the same pain. I have appt with gastro dr this week, am praying for answers.
I found your story interesting as I have a similar problem in the past 6 YEARS
It all started in 2008 when I was diagnosed with pancreatitis.
After a couple of days of hospitalisation and diet I was free to go home however I had to go back for blood tests to check if my pancreas is all good
The blood test came back, pancreas is good but my thrombocyts (red blood cells) are waaaay to low (Normally you'd have 250 000, I had 30 000) which is causing bleeding. Everywhere. Anytime. Internal as well. So I was hospitalised again, for weeks.
I had a blood condition which I was prescribed STEROIDS for.. (Medrol).
In the hospital all they said to me was: ""Be careful with the steroids, the can cause you stomach pain""... Well, appareantly I wasn't careful enough because I've been living with this unexplainable pain in the past 6 YEARS!!!!!
I was told that your body needs about 5 years to get rid of the traces of steroids which was last year and nothing happened....
I was taking probiotics and different tablets for stomach care but nothing worked.
I've been trying to find out what causes the pain for 5-6 years now, with no success
So I usually associate the pain with hunger.... If i eat, it gets better, if not, it just gets worse
I've done all sorts of tests, tried gastroscopy, tablets, vitamins and nothing seemed to ease my pain.
When I had my tests done, the doctor came to me saying that the good news is that everything is fine, and the bad news is that everything is fine... So it's very good that there are no visible symptoms of some serious condition, but it doesn't help me and I can't have a good quality of life at the age of 24.
I always have to make sure I've got some snacks in my bag otherwise I panic and become agitated again.
I can't really lose weight, but I can gain kilos very quickly and easily..
It's hard to explain to my mind for example that I'm not hungry and I do not need those carbs, but my body tells me otherwise and in order to keep my body happy and to be able to work, I have to give my body what it ""needs"" otherwise i can't function...
I've tried to settle my stomach pain with fruits, nuts, good fats and healthy stuff but I've got a feeling that I'm now addicted to carbohydrates and if I don't have it, the pain will kill me.........it's a vicious circle, because I need to stop eating so much carbs for the pain the go away, but if I don't have it I feel hungry ALL THE TIME.
For anyone that is still reading this now, I have exactly the same symptoms and find that nothing helps me but porridge. This may sound stupid but I always have porridge in the morning and it eases my stomach pain.
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
"I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
"Well after I posted on here I followed one of the leads and watched some Jason Klop YouTube clips which lead me to investigate SIBO small intestine bacterial overgrowth. From there I looked into Murdoch University’s FODMAP diet, bought the app and within days everything cleared up. As my Dad died with the same symptoms as I think the stress and pain contributed to his heart failure I so wish I had found all this earlier. I hope this info can at least help some of you
"I’ve had so much terrible for 10 years I’ve had all tests came back gastritis no one helped rid of it for months and months and even when the anti bortic finish I was still bad I’ve changed all my diet I take movicol and they put mine down to I bs but I had my gallbladder out to in 2011 I’m not a well girl at 40 and the headaches I feel my life has changed forever
"OK here's my story. Exactly three years ago I started having burning sensations in my stomach for weeks then it would pass. This went on for about a year. I went for tests ultrasound, bloods and stools. I haven't had a solid poo for years on end. It got me down, almost losing my marriage as I was very down and most of all angry and irritable. I still went to work but it was so hard. I just wanted to be at home l you down. Luckily my child was only a few years old so didn't understand. Doctors put it down to ibs. This was even more frustrating. I then started taking strong probiotics (Holland and barret) and aloe Vera tablets overnight. This was a revelation. I only had a hand full of flare ups in two years which would last just a few days. There has never been any pattern from the start I terms of food. I have however over the last four weeks been in turmoil. Its come back and it feels worse than ever. Burning, trapped wind, depression. Feels like I'm a different man from the happy guy the last two years. I fully understand all how you are feeling. I get angry with my wife my child. Very short fused. I feel like I need to be away from them. I'm thinking of going back to the drs but I almost know he will say ibs. At my wits end again. Dread waking up thinking how the day will pan out.
Now I’m Feb 2018, this year, I started having the same problem. I already eat Paleo and actually more Keto so don’t have any grains or sugars, been doin that for 3 years now. I’m having thre days of pain then only having water and protein shake for a day or two then have two days of relief, then the pain starts again. I’m wondering if anyone here has considered Fecal Transplant Therapy? I know it sounds out there but I’m thinking of seeing if I can get into a trial. I have taken notes of everything everyone here has tried and will start on those and book a doctors appointment. With all the pain and what has happened to my Dad this whole thing just has me so scared and sad.
"hi my name is kellie sherriff my pain been going on for about 2 1/1 years now. It all started with about of gastro that caused the lining of my gut to spasms. Put now I am still waiting for answers I recently just had ecoli posioning that made my guts angry and I lost 7 kgs in under a week through diarrhea and vomiting. I got to be careful what I eat also like deep fried chips from a home cooker with old oil it will make me vomit and my gut spasm. my gut spasms when ever it want to I could be having a conversation with my mum or sister and it spasms or goes as hard as a board. I am still waiting to see a gastroenteriris dr cause my gp has done all she can do by giving me collet tablets for spasms which 95% of the time they don't work. thanks for listening to my story
"Hi there just wondering if you’ve been given relief as of yet. I’m currently going through this exact thing and would be super happy if there was a way to resolve these
"Hi Jenny, I have been reading through this thread and feel for everyone here. My Dad had pain every time he ate solid food from last Feb 2017. He would not eat or only have liquid smoothies for a couple of days then come good. He would then try eating something solid and end up with loads of pain again. He went to a doctor that only gave him a laxative and told him he was having trouble from his divaticulitus. He had had a colonoscopy 6 months earlier as he did yearly. He had had bowel cancer twice twenty years earlier. He eventually had two stints on hospital where they did a CT scan the first time and endoscopy the second time. They told him they were checking his eusophicus the last time which infuriated him as it was his bowel that was having the trouble. They sent him home after a week in hospital and gave him a follow up appointment in two months time. My Dad died of a heart failure at home 5 days after discharge in September last year. I feel from stress of the condition and not being able to eat much for 8 months.
"Has anybody found a cure yet? I have had an awful pain for about a week now. It started near the middle of my esophagus and stomach which landed me in the ER. Now it comes and goes and it’s mainly in the middle of my belly, like where my intestines are. I no longer have diarrhea. Someone’s response on this thread was very similar to mine. When I eat, it gets better. When I don’t it gets worse. I’ve been surviving off of chicken noodle soup crackers and a smoothie made of peaches, papaya and honey. Nothing works. The PA at the hospital prescribed me a stronger dosage of OTC Pepcid which has not helped. I also had an ultradsound done because they thought it was an ulcer. Negative. I’m really worried and petrified that this pain will never be resolved.
"I've felt nauseated everyday for months, but when I ate it did seem to help. This was about 10 years ago. At that time I was told to get my Vitamin D checked. It was very low, and I begin to get Vitamin D shots, and I was so surprised did it help, a lot. And to my surprised my fingernails even begin to grow. I always assumed I was one of those people whose nails just didn't grow. I also had acid re-flux and got on medicine. My stomach still gets upsets from time to time but nothing like it was before. I don't know if this helps, but I wish you all the best.
"I was so relieved to findthis post & all the other discussions on this topic !! I have the same upper abd. Pain, the nausea, the feeling in my tummy like theres a heavy ball in there, then it just aches and all of this has been going on for over a year. Same as so many others, all tests done to date are negative, yet the symptoms remain. Next test is upper GI, but they wanted $1000 before they would schedule it, even with my ins., so haven't been able to have that one. In the mean time, im o n Carafate, protonex, pepcid, mylanta and a probiotic. A friend recently sent me a link about a Kombucha drink. Its a fermented cold drink found in a grocery store. I added that to my arsenal and have had a calming down down of the terrible pain and nausea! I've been a nurse for 36 years but this has me stumped, as well as my doctors. Thank you so much for your posts, i dont feel so all alone in my battle. I will research the other recommendations also. My sister gave me a soup recipethat helps with gallbladder issues, but i did get a good result using it: 2 zucchini 's, 20 green beans, one bunch parsley, & 4-5 stalks of celery. Steam these together for about 10 mins., then puree. I would eat this for lunch and dinner for about 2 days, and the relief was amazing. I slowly add tolerable foods back in as tolerated. For me this works. Im 5 days into my latest flare up, so will make the soup in addition to everything else (meds) and hope for relief. I wish us all relief in whatever works for us!
I hope this helps someone. Its not a cure, but how I have managed to reduce and deal with this pain for the last 4 years. I hope to go to the doctor this coming year and see a specialist and allergy doctor and hopefully one day get a real diagnosis of what is happening to our stomachs!!!
WHEN THE PAIN STARTS, I don't eat anything until the pain goes away I ONLY have sips of water or lemon water. Unfortunately sometimes I will go hours without eating but its worth it because having even a crumb will make my stomach hurt worse. So after hours of only drinking water the pain will start to subdue and then once I feel less or no pain I only have liquid food like Milk, yogurt or cream of chicken soup but don't chug it because you are starving, just take a small spoonful and wait a few minutes to see if it brings the pain back, if not you are safe to eat liquids. I don't eat solid foods until the next day. Also if I am home while waiting for pain to go away it makes my back feel like there is a dagger stabbing me right in the middle. I lay down on my left side with a heating pad on my back and try to take a nap, this is helpful in reducing pain as well.
My doctor prescribed me HYOSCYAMINE for STOMACH SPASMS. THIS HAS BEEN A LIFE SAVER. They are small pills that dissolve under the tongue and the pain will be completely gone with an hour. HOWEVER timing is important because there have been some times i have taken it and it doesn't fully work but it does lessen the pain.
"I don't know if anyone is still reading these responses, but I also have this Mysterious stomach pain. I did actually get diagnosed with H-Pylori about 4 years ago and took the massive amounts of antibiotics to cure it. But i am still having this chronic stomach pain. I've had an endoscopy, ultrasound, gallbladder check. Everything clear. I have tried reading many articles to try and pinpoint the issue. Eating foods that are not too hot or too spicy, cut out coffee. Stay relaxed and not stress out. Every time i think i have it figured out it will mysteriously pop up out of the blue. BUT I have reduced the pain from once a month to just once every couple of months.
"I would just like to say to anybody who found themselves here reading all these posts that sound very familiar to your own symptoms. To please do yourself a HUGE favor and research SIBO and a naturopathic doctor who specializes in IBS/SIBO named Dr. Jason Klop. His page and seminars are free, you just need to sign up for them from his Facebook page. What we are all dealing with, are the results from poor dietary choices we made in our lives, that have caused certain things to happen in our bodies, incorrectly. This is completely 100% reversible with modifications to your diet, which will create the changes needed in your digestive system, which will then alleviate everything from cramps, pain, diarrhea, constipation, sinus issues, migraines, headaches etc...
I'll report back as I make it through my fasting test. In the mean time, good luck to everyone trying something to help themselves. .
From what I've been reading and researching, it should hopefully solve the problem unless I actually have some type of serious issue. I'm 6'6"" 230lbs so fasting isn't easy...lol....but it's all a mindset. All you feel is hunger and your brain trying to make you give up and eat. I can deal with that.
I've done a lot of research on fasting and intermittent fasting having great success in resetting your gut and microbiome. I just ate my last meal (6oz. Flank steak, steamed broccoli and some fresh fruit) at 2pm today. I'm going to fast for 24 hours and then eat 6oz of protein and about 18oz of steamed vegetables and then fast again for 24 hours. Then do intermittent fasting where I only eat betterment noon and 6pm and fast the other 18 hours. Eating only small protein portions and unlimited steamed vegetables during that 6 hours.
I don't drink or smoke. I need to exercise more, but I eat pretty healthy. Lots of fruits and veggies, healthy meat, barely any sugar, no caffeine and organic whenever possible. I drink almost strictly filtered water.
"I can't believe there are so many people with similar symptoms that are being undiagnosed. I've had the symptoms for about 3 weeks and have been scouring the internet looking for answers. My dull pain mostly on my right side under my liver, pulses on and off all day for no reason. I'm being set up for a colonoscopy. Not sure what that will show. The pain is more annoying than anything and is sometimes accompanied by a wave of heat throughout my stomach area. Obviously for most of us, the pain just doesn't feel right...like organ failure or something not right.
Just wondering if your still experiencing gastritis pain? I am currently having extreme burning pain. Meds aren’t helping. In fact my symptoms are getting worse. Thanks
"hi everyone so nice to find this thread !!! And that it's still going talk to me everyone ! I have the same problem I've had it about a month now upper abdomen bloating and pain that doesn't really go away it will settle abit and I get good days but it's swelled up tonight for no reason I've had such a bland meal tried cutting things out of my diet and nothing's working I'm on ranitidine atm which does help a small amount but the dull ache is still there ... I'm going back to the doctors tomorrow I'm so fed up of this constant pain it's getting me down anyone found relief? Doctors think it's gastritis
"Yes your not alone I suffer this too every so often I feel drained with it stomach flairsbup swollen to the point I think I’m going to pop trapped wind ?? absolutly cramping pains in back stomach can hear the wind in stomach poop cream colour I thought it was because I’m taking fat burners still not sure but I drank sea salt water two table spoons and warm water it helped go toilet but I’m still in agony going to try fybogel tomorrow will let u no if works I no the pain 3 days I’ve been crying and wanting to be sick it feels like food stuck just under my breast so tight and stomach massive Xx
"Hi jenny. I have had a similar problem for 6 years with no diagnosis. My pain is severe and I have had it for 8 weeks non -stop this time. I have had all the tests, but now I have them all over again. I'm on ranitadine an osemeprazole, but they don't do much. Tell your doc you want to be referred to a gasterenterologists. For tests. I drink ginger and lemon tea for the nausea and suck crystalised ginger .
"also ultrasound /MRI and blood test all come back clear
"Hiya in so glad Iv found this post Iv also been suffering with the same symptoms feels like there's a lump in my stomach at the top in the middle my pain also moves around sometimes in my right side sometimes left this all started when I had my daughter delivered by c section but over the years the pain has got worse bad wind burning sensation pain like Iv banged my stomach but haven't mine always gets worse when I am due on my monthly cycle about the week before and then when Mother Nature comes it disappeares Iv had blood test /ultrasound /MRI scan and different tablets and nothing works im starting to work my self up as it's on my mind all the time
"Hi Jenny. I will the enzyme supplements a go. I have been prescribed buscopan to relax my gallbladder, but it does nothing for the pain and other symptoms. Thank you.
"So my husband was having symptoms for about a month, upper left abdominal pain, nausea, vomiting, headaches. The stomach pains and nausea was so bad he couldn’t really eat. Lost 30 lbs in the month, went to gastroenterologist had colonoscopy, endoscopy, barium swallow with iodine injection and a motility test and all the blood work!! Everything came back normal!!! I tell my chiropractor the symptoms and she says immediately it’s a spastic gallbladder and gives me Cholacol & Zypan which are bile salts and enzyme supplements that anyone can get online and he’s been taking 2 of each with each meal for a week now and the symptoms are gone!!! They apparently break down the sludge in the gallbladder that is causing the spasms!!! Just FYI so other people might try it also because the spasms won’t show on tests!
I've had a bad mental state for a few weeks now, increasing with every negative test. I've already cut out most food, but I was eating breads as something soft in my stomach. Usually I don't want to eat, id rather just starve if it hurts either way I guess. I'm going to try the home remedies listed above, despite the seeming lack of success overall. I truly am greatful to hear others went through this, but I wish health for every one of you, and am so sorry you're going through this as well.
It's comforting to know others have felt whay you have, but it's also horrible to know it hasn't really improved for anyone. I've lived with chronic pain from endometriosis most of my life now, and with this added on it truly is zapping the will to keep going. I feel so young to say that, and my partner and I wanted to have children in the next two years, but I can't imagine living life constantly like this. I can't imagine starting a family and just having this pain constantly keep me from being apart of my kids life. I can't even focus on tv or conversation half the time, the pain just makes everything else become white noise.
Im scheduled for an ultrasound tomorrow and a GI specialist in a week or so, but I don't have much hope right now.
"I am yet another with the same situation hitting me hard. It's been over 2 months now without being able to eat anything without pain or discomfort. I've been to urgent care several times, my GP as well, had blood, fecal, urin, xrays all done and all came back negative. I've been put on a total of 8 new medications to see what works with no noteworthy success. Wearing a bra, tight shirts, or buttoning up jeans are all out of the question, and the nausea/pain doesn't fade with any particular way or sitting or Laying or standing or pills or what I eat/what I dont. It just fades to a flu like sickness, before increasing every few hours to unbearable.
I have a type of autoimmune disease where my body killed all my hydrochloric acid productions beta cells so I have severe Gastritis symptoms. Besides taking the pills, I have had to go off all foods except protein and veggies- all in small amounts. Funny thing is though, I keep gaining weight! It’s really discouraging. Anyways, if you see this I hope you are better!
"Hi jenny. I have had a similar condition for 6 years with no diagnosis as yet. I had intermittent pain for weeks on end having to take strong painkillers which eventually made me ill. I feel sick everyday and have to take nausea tablets. This week I can only lay on the couch or to go to bed with a hot water bottle. I bought a electric one.I have been though manty tests over the last 6 years and still don't know what it is. I have had three stomach ulcers in the past and gastritis and duodenitis . I feel severe pain all the time too and can't help thinking the worse. I was recently diagnosed with diverticulitis, but its not that' pain in the wrong place. Other people don't realise how bad the pain is. I have had my appointment with the Gastroenterologist brought forward to October the 17th and it can't come soon enough.. I will probably have to have another camera down my stomach. Even though I don't like hospitals, I wish I could go in now and have the tests.
"Oh my goodness! Another person who knows what I experience!! I’ve had this exact problem for 2 years now, it’s been getting worse as time goes by, seeing a stomach specialist on Tuesday 3rd. My main concern is that I can’t carry on like this because I am in my final year of high school (I am 16 years old, and a boy) and the problem is taking such a strain on my education. I’ve had to go from having dairy to no dairy, and now turned vegan, this is due to ALL FOODS giving me a stomach ache, and tablets that don’t do anything for me! How’s your problem now, I got diagnosed with gastritis age 10, but became a massive problem after I got back from France in 2015! Hope you are doing better, and wonder if you have any tips because I can’t carry on like this
"Hi everyone. Just another person living with this horrible illness. Mine started out as a flu/sore throat (an infection which I still interestingly have today) in which I was prescribed antibiotics. Halfway through the course I began experiencing bloating and painful stomach gurgling which came on all of a sudden. This continued on for a few weeks so I ceased the antibiotics because I was convinced it was giving me the terrible pain (knowing full well the implications of not finishing the pack). I then started experience severe upper abdominal pain that was just below my sternum and would creep under my left rib cage (when it got really bad). When it was really bad my stomach would spasm just with my rib pressing on it when expanding to breathe. It also would make awful gurgling/spasming noises which made me very anxious at work knowing people could hear it! (And my pants unzipped at work because of the bloating wasn't a good look) i self diagnosed myself with a lot of gas and starting taking de-gas along with other over the counter meds like buscopan to no avail. I finally went back to the gp to have my stomach looked at and he made me do a stool test (which was pos for Aeromonas and blastocystis hominis). He then started me on more antibiotics, ciprofloxacin and promised me my symptoms would subside! Phew I thought!! Well..... unfortunately my symptoms didn't subside and I was referred to have an upper ultrasound done to test liver function, gall bladder and pancreas - results ALL CLEAR as were my blood tests. I was then referred to a gastro specialist that told me that my symptoms were quite ""vague"" - my bowel movements were normal at this stage and he would need to investigate further with an endoscopy/colonoscopy. The procedure came back fine- only a single erosion ulcer on my terminal ileum but no evidence of crohns, U/C etc. h pylori biopsy also negative. Following this test I began to have some strange bowel movements- a blood globule in my stool and often white mucous (booked into my specialist straight away but couldn't get in for a few weeks) I was convinced that my problems were also diet related, not that I was unhealthy beforehand but thought with all my doctor google research, cutting gluten and dairy out could help. I followed the low FODMAPS diet and further the auto immune paleo diet for about 2 months (with a nutritionists support) along with some omega ease and high strength probiotics which she prescribed but didn't see any improvement unfortunately. I continued living in pain and desperation for another month until I decided to make another appointment despite the surgeon saying I was ""fine"". He is now suggesting a pill cam test to rule out small bowel Crohn's disease (family history) and in the meantime start on colofax to soothe the symptoms. Interestingly enough he also suggested I start taking a small dose of an anti depressant that has worked ""miracles"" for those suffering with chronic pain and IBS. He seems to think that this whole thing has been brought on my anxiety or stress (which I must admit I am quite a worryer and have started a new job in the last 6 months so it is possible) however I can't help but think something is really wrong with my health. Just wondering if anyone else has experienced symptoms like these or has a way to manage the pain? It almost seems like the unknown is just as bad as the illness itself.
"Wow, definitely seems that I'm not the only one that's having these problems! As you can see my username is July 19. That's when I first started with this pain as well. Yes, it's been pretty tough and still going though it as we speak. Have a docs appointment this morning as he gave me meds for the ulcers, infection etc..: hasn't worked and I did forget to mention he did referred me for a ultrasound for my liver and gallbladder: results negative, as well as blood work negative. Changed my diet, did lose weight of course! But when I lay down is when it bothers me the most. I'm at work and I get flare ups and yes it's very frustrating! I will have my doctor to do a full blood count to check other organs and a endoscope. I did try baking soda with lemons and for some reason it made me burp and pass gas a lot more. Did feel good for at least 8 hours and then the pain re- surfaces again😩
"Hi Jenny I am wondering if you ever got to the bottom of this.i am in hospital at the moment. I am in severe pain after eating which leads me to feel very sick and no longer dare to touch another food.
"Had insomina for three night , I suffer with aniexty and panic attacks, so I got aniexty because of lack of sleep , with anxiety I get aCid reflux so now that I felt like sleeping I could not because of the acid reflux and aniexty , it was not going and got worst even after natural methods , like ginger tea and baking soda , so I decided to take make aloes Juice, well I believe I did not follow with the methos to mix it and made it very strong and felt weak , oh before taking aloes my lower stomach felt heated as well, any ways I took pills for the acid refluxs that same day an hour apart and it helped a lot , must say I took nexium some days before and it never helped. So because I normally get aCid reflux from aniexty , and it normally goes away and I can eat anything when it goes , I ate anything for two day and it came back worst than before, took the tablets I took that helped and it was not much help , began drinking coconut water , and ginger tea through out the day and it helped a bit , ended up drinking an alcoholic beverage and just a sip burned right through me , it got worst , my aniexty give me headaches and I got light headed, took the same tablet and nothing , next '2 day felt light headed and my stomach felt raw , could not walk to far and it burned , decided to follow instructions on how to use the aloes, the last time I felt weak and the aloes made me itchy , this time I made it and put cucumber, and coconut water and not an aloes and that same day the burning in my lower abdomen stopped , second day I'm not holding my stomach while I walk , I plan to take it for atleast a month to see what happens . StI'll gonna check a doctor though. Also felt dull pains on and off in my lower stomach and once in a while a little movement while my stomach burned
I have reduced to 20mg and for the last week I have taken a 20 billion probiotic along with a small probiotic drink every morning. Since taking the probiotics I have seen a marked improvement in the symptoms ( not gone but 75% better). I shall continue this with fingers crossed
My problem is that my upper stomach was still very sore to touch with repeated burping and chest pain. I asked if the PPI could cause this and the gastrologist said it's possible and suggested changing to another type or reducing them.
I was also given an upper GI and pelvic scan which was clear.
The repeat endoscopy found the gastritis almost cleared and the polyp almost gone.
This found erosive gastritis and a small polyp. I was prescribed a 3 month course of a PPI 40mg and had a repeat endoscopy 2 weeks ago.
Recently my symptoms have returned but testing this time proved negative. Due to a family history of stomach cancer and the connection to it with H-Pylori my GP referred me for an endoscopy.
My symptoms are very similar to yours and I have had 3 bouts of this over the years.
I am so glad I am not alone. About 3 month ago this pain started. So debilitating. Some days are more severe than others. Pain is like a band around my upper stomach and back. If I had to pinpoint the pain, it is in the upper center. Been to GP and ER. Had endoscope, colonosopy, CT with dye, and xray. Endoscope came back with diverticulosis, and scar from ulcer, as well as bile reflux (gallbladder removed in 2013). Colonoscopy came back with some thinning of intestine but no polyps. CT showed nothing other than constipation and Xray just showed air (gas). I was given Diludad (sp?) but did nothing for the pain. 2nd ER gave me Fentinal (sp?) did nothing except hallucinate-ick! Just had parathyroidectomy a week ago. Was hoping to find relief as abdominal pain is one of the many symptoms. But no-still am getting the pain. Eating, not eating doesn't make a difference. Can't find triggers for the pain. Sometimes Norco with help but other times it will not make a dent in the pain. Tried beet juice, and aloe juice, but do not notice a difference. Same with peppermint tea and ginger tea. I am quitting my job as I do not know when I will feel ok to work. I feel so discouraged and overwhlemed. Why can't anyone help us or care to? I have to keep trying. I have found massaging my colon helpful for bloat. I try to do it for 20 minutes. If anything helps, even for a bit, I will post it. Good luck.
"I've got gastritis also. I wake up nauseous almost everyday. I read that raw honey, if you take it before you eat, it helps. I'm going to try that. My endoscopy showed slight inflammation in my stomach. If I don't keep something on my stomach about every 2 hours in the morning I get very nauseous.
"WOW IM SO RELIEVED TO SEE OTHERS I CAN RELATE TOO IVE BEEN SO MISERABLE AND BREAKING DOWN CRYING IVE BEEN DEALING WITH THE SAME THING FOR A YEAR NOW THIS YEAR HAS GOTTEN WORST THE PAIN AND BURNING NAUSEOUS VOMITING ALWAYS FEELING SICK NOW I HAVE SHOOTING PAINS IN MY LEGS AND ARMS CHEST PAINS AND LOWER BACK PAIN ON MY RIGHT SIDE SOMETIMES IVE BEEN TO HOSPITAL AFTER HOSPITAL DOCTORS AFTER DOCTORS IVE HAD NUMEROUS OF TEST DONE ENDO AND COLON CAT SCANS BLOOD WORK X RAYS AND NOTHING IM ONLY 30 AND THEY KEEP GIVING ME DIFFERENT MEDS TO TRY LIKE IM A GENIE PIG I JUST WANT MY LIFE BACK I HATE THIS HAS ANYBODY FOUND ANYTHING OUT YET MY LOWER INTESTINE WAS SWOLLEN AND THEY DIDNT ELABORATE ON IT IS THAT BAD ?
"Demand a ulta sound or mri, ct scan, my doctors fobed me of for years saying i had reflux and gave me lanzrapol not they done any good, i had exact same syptoms as you, finaly got a ultra sound done they showed gal-bladder stones, went for a camera and they removed some stones from my bile duct, the very next morning rushed back into hospital diagnosed with pancreatitius, stayed in hospital for week then they removed my gal bladder but again got panreatitus, then said i sycst on the pancreas sent home after few weeks now been for anohter ct scan and now awaiting the resluts regarding the sycsts to see what is happenign with them, but i must say i do not get any pain for now since the removal, I do get a cramp that lasts for about 30 seconds thats it tho i can live with that
"Thanks jess diet change is defo helping it's just hard to accept you have to eat little and stuff that you don't really want but I'm taking movicol it helps me go poo every day I just wish I could sleep better still on lots of pillows
"Hi Jenny my name is Jessica and I've been going through what you've been going through for almost 3 years when I first started I was about 250 lb and now I'm about 140 lb would mind first started and started with a lump in the very top of my stomach that made me get very nauseous and feel like I had to poop and it happened every single day all day long I threw up everything I was eating couldn't keep anything down and when I went to the hospital all they do was drug me out and I'd wake up 8 hours later mad because the whole day was gone this happened for maybe two years before I went online and tried to find other people who are going through the same thing that I was going through I finally found a form on gastritis that implemented some of the things that you should be eating in the things that you should stay away from and would that last I compiled a diet that worked for me basically I don't know if you guys have those smart one meals at Kroger's or the Weight Watcher meals but basically I would eat two of those a day I would have a banana and yogurt in the morning and then fill in my snack times with fruits and vegetables and that seemed to work with me I've actually broken my diet and my symptoms are starting to come back almost every day so I believe the diet really does help and I think if you want to start feeling better it starts with going on a diet it sucks but that's the solution to this problem.
"Had no idea how many people have all my symptoms. I am going to try the acidophilus plus you mentioned. I have had this crummy pain since last August. Had the Xrays, ultrasound, CT abdominal scan. Finally I had a surgeon go in, laparoscopicly and look around. NOTHING! My gut is so sore, almost feels numb! Hard to ride in the car because i feel all the bumps. Thanks for your post. Very helpful. Misery loves company.
"I have been suffering so bad get 3 hours sleep then the pain comes on so strong in my abdominal it feels deep inside if I lay on tummy it radiates through to back laying on my side hurts I breath out hard and I can feel my sides hurting sometimes I go poo it feels better I've been on nexium 6 years for feeling acid had to sleep sitting up 6 years recently stopped nexium for barium was ok but 2 weeks later I'm in agony in my abdominal got a small amount of blood in poo protein in wee borderline irritable bowel I've had too lots of antibiotics recently and nothing have helped I've had camera down throats over and over and they found mild gastritis then nothing but nexium gave heart palpertations sweats in night and still pain im getting to point I want to die but I have to young children
"My doctor prescribe me rantidine, you could try that, he said take it for two weeks twice a day half an hour before eating, not sure if that's helpful but it's worth a try.
"Hi Jenny your symptoms are very much like mine although I get very bad acid reflux too I was in a&he a couple of nights due to the pain in my stomach I had an appointment with a specialist the following day so the a&be department let me go so I could go to the appointment when I went there and described my symptoms they said it could be an ulcer or inflammation due to the amount of medication I take I am having an endoscopy done this Monday coming so hopefully I will get the results the same day I have not long had my dinner and my stomach is in so much pain I feel for you I really do I think your docter should have sent you for further investigations if you have got a diagnosis could you please let me know out of interest and if you haven't I will tell you my results after my camera too all the best to you just realised your post was over a year ago
"I literally was just diagnosed with a ""bacterial overgrowth"" in my small intestine. This was done by having a breath test, which was super easy to do. I've been sick since October 2016. It's been a nightmare of gut pain every day, especially since they couldn't find any h-pylori in my stomach after my endoscopy in December. But due to my symptoms they scheduled the test and it looks like they've been hiding in my intestines. I'm wondering if that's normal? Anyways they're putting me on biaxin for two weeks. I can't wait to heal up, and I'm especially happy to know I'm not crazy! Keep following up with your doctors folks-no matter how long you've been sick or how bleak your pain makes your situation seem. May we all start to feel better soon!
I feel your sorrow and I would just love to share because I was in the same shoes and thought my life was ending so i would love to help.
If you had figured out what you had? I have the same symptoms for 3 years!!! It's ruining my life. Doctors say I have nothing. But it's uncomfortable pain. Please let me know any information
"Hi Jenny , I was wondering if there has been anymore developments with your stomach. I have been having severe pains in mine and find it difficult to breathe. I've put it down to anxiety as well . I feel everything is bruised inside. My back and ribs are sore too. Doctors say it's IBS but I feel it's something else. I've taken xanax to see if it will calm my stomach down but no joy I'm also on pantoprazole 40mg , but I don't feel any better. It is draining and I feel tired all of the time. Please let me know if anything worked or helped you.
I am feeling the same right now. I was told by my doctor that I have gastritis and gave my prescription Lansoprazole Actavis 30 mg once daily for 4 weeks. I am taking the prescription religiously 30/60 before meal. But pain in my stomach never go away and it is more painful at night tine. I am so sore.
I have been have the stomach pain since last week and I went to the hospital. They did a bunch of tests and found nothing. I don't know what to do. It bothers me so much and I have an appointment on Wednesday. It is very upsetting that I have no answers. Someone please help!!!
"Yeah this has happened to me too.
"Jenny did you ever get this resolved or find the name of your illness? This is Donna in Edmonton Alberta Canada. Ive been sick since August of last year and in November it took a turn for the worse. I had to cut out all sugar fats and ate next to nothing just bottles of water all day long. I dont see a gastrointestinal internal specialist till Feb 8th. I lost 20 lbs in 30 days. They too gave me lansoprazole but it does not stop the pain. I think its pancreatitis as my pancreas enzyme levels were too high for awhile. No dr. I see seems to care or want to help.
"Thanks Shannon, I think kefir is coconut yoghurt, is that correct? My wife has tried that an she did enjoy it. The most beneficial thing for her has been the slippery elm bark whenever she strays off her diet. Hope you and your mom feel better. Cheers Gipsy
My mom seems to have to exact symptoms as your wife. Although she hasn't been 'cured', as well as following a diet like your wife, since she started drinking Kefir every morning she found that this helped settle her stomach a lot more. I am also having stomach problems and I find kefir to be really soothing, and puts my day off to a good start. I really recommend it! Hope your wife's feeling a lot better.
After years of difficulty my wife has gradually got better to the extent she is mostly free of trouble until she strays off the diet and she's back there again. A couple of years ago she had accute pancreatitis and the docs and I were very worried, they said alcohol is about 80% the cause (but she never has alcohol) and the other 20% is unknown cause. That doesn't mean she is not sick... just the docs don't know why, so try the dietry changes and see if that helps. She has gone off Lipitor (cholesterol lowering drug) and has had a remarkable turnaround.
"Hi Jenny, hope you are feeling better but my wife has had a horrible process of doctors, tests and the like with nothing conclusive over 10 years now. Just a couple of ideas: get your doc to test for helicobactor pelori, (causes ulcers), try gluten free, ond lactose free for a while (at least a month), look up the fodmap diet (some foods are really bad for this) and the best first aid is to use slippery elm bark for a few weeks and see if that helps... it puts a lining on your stomach.
I also have a friend that was diagnosed with celiacs disease in her late 20s. Severe stomach pains and stomach swelling were one of her symptoms. It took her almost a year to figure it out. Anyway, I hope you've found an answer and have started feeling better.
I don't know if you're still checking these posts, but I thought I'd share my experiences. I'd had severe stomach pains, stomach swelling, and similiar symptoms to what you've experienced. I dealt with it for about 3 years and saw dozens of doctors and specialists before I got a diagnosis. Turns out I have insulin sensitivity. Although I'm not diabetic, my body doesn't agree with higher levels of insulin. I was put on a low sugar diet (max 50 gram of sugar a day) for 6 months, and after that I was able to gradually increase my sugar intake (to something a little more reasonable). After 2 weeks of the new diet, I started feeling marginally better. By 2 months I felt significantly better, and by 6 months I felt normal again. I've always eaten healthy in general, so this diagnosis seemed like bullsh*t when I got. But its the only thing that worked. Genetics just dealt me a bad hand, I guess. Anyway, I follow the diet plan that people with Type II Diabetes follow. Unlike diabetics, someone with Insulin Sensitivity can get away with cheating on the diet once or twice a week. I just don't do it regularly. I also found out that soy irritates my stomach. But that's a totally separate issue. But anyway, the symptoms were similiar though less severe.
"Jenny! I hope you read this message because I have had the exact symptoms as you for more than I year now. Its gotten to the point where I feel like I'm starving myself but I can rarely get food down. As you said I'm sick of this and can't deal with it any longer. Did any of the suggestion work for you or have you found another solution ?? All my fingers and toes crossed
"Yes Jenny I have had constant stomach pain for two yrs it never goes I go to bed with it and get up with it had eleven colonoscopy sin fifteen yrs as well as numerous other tests just seems there is no hope just constant suffering hope you fare better than me Just keep hoping regards Shirley
"Jenny do you have a diet list although I went wheat,gluten and dairy free for three months and it made no difference Regards Shrley
"You have to be your own advocate and demand certain test be done...that's my experience anyway and shop around for a good GI doctor, there are some lousy ones. And I will say...diet is HUGE when it comes to this, along with staying away from alcohol.
she is set for ct scan now and this daily pain already braught our family to a standstill.
"Scary to see that problem started to my wife 14 days ago can go for several yrs.
"Yes Jenny I've had trouble for twenty years and still having trouble had tests and they say nothing showing up had eleven colonoscopy sin sixteen yrs just seems no end to it.I have diverticulosis and hiatus hernia constant medication including lanasaprole but still no relief hope you do better regards Shirley
"Thanks Jenny but I've had 11colonoscopies in the last 16 yrs and I have among other complaints diverticulitis been suffering for twenty yrs nothing helps I'm now on morphine patches for my back so I wish u all the best Shirley
"I see you wrote this a long time ago so I hope by now you're ok. You're doctor stinks and you need to get a new one. I've been dealing with GI problems for 13 years and I've learned you have to be your own advocate, put your foot down and demand an endoscopy. Some doctors just like to throw pills at people and tell them to come back in a month, meanwhile , the patient is still suffering damaging their insides. Stress, alcohol, smoking, diet, and anti inflammatory drugs can cause gastritis and make it worse. I hope this helps a bit. Oh and you can't really diagnose gastritis without the proper testing so not only does your doctor stink, she sounds very lazy.
I'm not implying that this IS all in your head and the doctors are right but I personally needed harsh truthful eye opening words to wake me up from the dark cloak I had that I kept feeding. I'm being open about personal things only to help, this isn't easy for me but you matter. The world needs you. It takes the same amount of energy to think positive. It's not easy, it's a journey. I'm not there myself, or anywhere close to it. I am my own worst enemy. Imagine if we obsessed over the things we loved about ourselves instead.
I've been in and out of the ER for the past 2 weeks. I'm a changed bird. I've reached my limit but when I hear myself beating myself up for my life/illnesses/situation/the unfair shortened life; I stop. Breathe and remeber there's a reason I'm given this challenge. Pitting yourself isn't the answer. Take it from someone who has already tried suicide. It is NOT the answer. And I'm not saying you are thinking such thoughts but pain makes you into a person you don't even recognize. Especially when no one can give you at least an answer or the time to think of anything else but the obvious.
"Hi, I'm sorry your are going trough so much. I'm a 27 yr old survivor. I've lost most of my family due to other people's actions. I've had pulmonary embolisms, died once, stokes, ulcerative colitis, hair loss, debilitating pain, unable to keep a job and so much more. Sheer pain does crazy things to the mind. It has cause me not only actual pain but phantom pain too because once the mind can't handle the pain in begs your body to do something. Sometimes a small dose of an antidepressant helps. I'm on a child dose. Took a while to find the proper drug and dose but it has helped with many anxiety, fear, depression, pain and other things I never thought I had or could be helped with. I know being told ""you're crazy"" and it's all in your head is like a knife to the heart when you feel physical pain. I've heard it so so so many times! Like you're just talking to walls when you're desperate.
"Have had constant stomach pain for two years have had eleven colonoscopies and nothing is being found I have diverticulosis,hiatus hernia,arthritis,cysts on kidneys. I have been going to my GPevery week who has given me lots of different pain killers and nothing is working l suffer with constipation and laxatives make it worse.I am awaiting latest CT COLONOSCOPY RESULTS but expect them to tell me I have diverticulitis . I am eighty yrs old and feel my life is over as I lay on the bed all day every day,cannot go out due to the pain. can anyone please help me I am desperate Have even been to psychiatrist who said it was a mental problem and now everyone I see keeps harping on this fact I think they don't really listen to me and just think it's a mental condition I have depression through the pain it's driving me mad.went on a wheat gluten and lactose free diet for three months which made no difference so I can know what you are going through If you find anything that helps please let me know
"Hi Jenny! I'm in my 3rd week with the same pain! Have you found anything new out? I'd love to hear from you if you have.
"Hello jenny I've been having the same set of symptoms and problems for the last 2-3weeks and was wondering if you found what the problem really was or anyways to calm the pain as i can not sleep at night due to my current condition...
"Hello Sarah after reading ur post I have to say I FEEL YOUR PAIN!!!! Literally. I have had stomach issues my whole life as far back as I can remember however over the years just got worse and worse eventually it got so bad I went to the Dr had colonoscopy and endoscopy and turns out I have gastritis with GERD (gastro esophageal reflux disorder) very painful I am on pantaprazole as well and I've been on it for about 3 months and finally I found RELIEF!!! Yes it took a while and did I think it was ever going to end NO! Also I found that taking tums and other antacids is not good especially if you have gastritis if I was you I would stop taking them so the pantaprazole has a chance to start working without other stuff messing with it so you can notice a difference. Good luck to you and I hope everything works out for you. If you have any questions feel free to ask I'm quite a bit older then you so I ha e a little more experience with LIFE.
"Omg I'm so glad I found this thread!...I'm 27 and I to have been having stomach issues....I have never had issues ever until two months ago at the end of summer I started having this clearing throat sensation... I had partied alot over summer..At first I thought it was my lungs as I was having heavy breathing it felt like someone was squeezing My chest and my back felt like it was on fire... Turns out it was a silent reflux so the doctor said .. within a week I was having burning pain iny upper left part of my stomach that would go into my back while still having the squeezing in my chest. I ended up in the er 7 times over a month in so much pain I didn't know what to do with myself...had ultrasound done another chest x-ray blood work all Came back fine no hpylori... The think it's gastritis, or ulcers, or a hiatal hernia... I have been waiting for a endoscopy for a month now finally in 6 days I will have one...been extremely stressed out as I'm worried I have stomach cancer..... Unlikely yes is what I've been told...but I am an anxious worries person in general when it comes to my health....lost my mom to bileduct cancer 3 years ago so it's very touchy subject... I also have three little girls whom I love more then anything and am scared something will happen to me... I have lost 20 pounds in the last two months from all this not wanting to eat because of pain or when I finally have an appetite I get more pain everyday has been a flare up. I have been on 80mg of pantaprazole a day and 300mg of zantac a day plus Tums and or gaviscon.. I hate taking meds and have read up on how bad they can be for your gut.. honestly the internet can be a scary thing when googling your symptoms...I am hoping they will find the cause of all this and I can get back to feeling like me again..I have changed everything in my diet trying to feel better so far nothing is working . I quit smoking,drinking and im eating super healthy. I am staying away from gluten just to see of it helps. Made and apt with a naturopath bit that isn't till Feb I really hope this clears up by then.. I'm tired of people thinking I'm crazy because all my tests have come back normal yet this burning stomach pain will put me in tears . They say calm down an don't stress it's kinda hard not to when you don't know what's wrong. Really hoping for some answers reading this thread has helped me knowing im not alone out there.
One night in bed I felt a slowly growing ache in my stomach to the point I thought I was going to vomit, but never did. Since then I have had a fairly constant ache everywhere in my abdomen including under my ribs, my hips, groin, lower back, and upper stomach. The pain is hard to explain because while there is a bit of nausea, it is mainly dull aches with some sharper pains in the areas I mentioned. The back aches are like when you get the flu, or when you wake up in the morning and you've really have to urinate so bad that've your lower back aches. I am guessing it's the kidneys? The pain moves around randomly and with different intensity. I have started the process of tests but it is scary. MY mind races with the fear of some cancer.
I have a similar situation, but it has only gone on for about 5 weeks.
I do not know if I will ever get better but I still have positive mind and have faith in God. keep praying, you may never know... miracles do happen...
Anyway for the last one year I have completely stopped all kind of medicine as I am quite positive that prolonged medicine consumption had infact worsened my condition. Though I am still having this problem but I do have some comfort knowing that I do not depends on tablets anymore, in reality problem persist with or without. I too has completely removed spicy food from my diet and stopped consuming alcohol. I have reduced overseas and oustation trip drastically, this somehow affected my business but I don't have a choice, guess people like us have to make alot of sacrifices to adjust our lifestyle. Sometimes I do envy those who are able to eat/drink anything they like or travel wherever they want to.
"Hi Olga, your condition appears to be very similiar to mine and truly i too at times do have the same feeling.. I do understand what you are going through. Sometimes I pray hard to make this problem disappear completely but sadly it does not work. I have been suffering from this 'mysterious' gastritis for almost 30 years now. I have seen 4 GE, done endo and colono few times but only end up consuming more and more medicine but never improve in long term, only temperorary relief. Imagine detected and treated with H Pylori 3 times through out. I have gone for yoga classess, breathing exercise, meditation etc. but yet to recover from this cursed problem.
"Hello I have had this exact same problem over the last year and I finally went to the Dr and found out I too have gastritis and I was prescribed pantaprazole and it helps have not experienced any stomach discomfort from it and the only down side is it causes a little drowsiness even more so when I first began taking it. Maybe you should talk to ur Dr about it.
"Jenny, did your doctor ever do a breath test for fructose, lactose & gluten? I have had the same problem and they have found out that I am fructose intolerance and I have to stay away from anything that has corn syrup in it. You might want to ask the doctor about that test. Also have you tried any probiatics?
"I know it has been a long time since you wrote this, but I am having the same pain, and I live in Oregon. I am open to anything! Please tell me how you are ingesting it... Candy, drinks... Etc.. I would love to know. Is it just cbd, or thc as well. Thank you!
"Hi Jenny, and guys, i have similar constant dull aches when i specifically ate chilli, highy processed potato chips, certain or too much vegetables like spinich, peanut and milk. My only relieve is by eating (Red) Dragon Fruit, lots of it. And by the way i dont take any western medicine at any cost. I dont recommend eating fruits too acidic like pineapple to much or watermelon as some may have allergic. Dragon fruit (red) which i found to be the best for clearing my system and relieve my pains. My 2 cents guys. Thanks.
"I used to have the same symptoms you're describing. Mine seemed to be related to coffee consumption. I found out because I had to go a week without coffee when camping with my family. After stopping drinking coffee my stomach swelling and aching diminished. I still get flare ups if I eat something dense like a breakfast sandwich or any type of sausage. Don't understand it myself but not sure if you were still in the dark or not. Hoping maybe my experience helps.
"Hello, do you know when ultrasound is not enough to find the cause of stomach pain ? They didn't find anything, so maybe I should put the camera inside ? I'm just worried to do it for no reason, it seems to often happen that they don't find anything even with the camera ? Please help <3
"I have the same problem I'm wondering if maybe u had a c section or tubal or any stomach surgeries I feel as though I'm being stabbed in the same place constant pressure really hurts to sit up or lay on my back I'm losing my mind I'm so tired I passed out making our bed this morning when I go to the restroom to its pressure I haven't been hungry I try to eat as I am breastfeeding
"Wow, I have almost the same issues that you all have been discussing. To add on, I do have an umbillical hernia which gets really sore during flare-ups! My story is similar to Jenny's and some others. I have had these flare-ups for the last 9-10 months. I've had an ultrasound, endoscopy and colonoscopy and all three were clear. The episodes have been long (lasting a week) or short a day or so. I've varied the types of food (greasy, fatty, spicy, bland, etc) and there is rhyme or reason as to when ""it"" wants to flare-up. I did get a prescription for hyocyamine that dissolves under your tongue. I'm supposed to take it 3 times a day. I really don't see much improvement. I thought it was working and I had no flare-ups for 4-5 weeks, and then ""bam"", I had the worse one yet that lasted about a week. BTW, its swolen abdomen, rolling waves of cramps & pain and eating makes it worse. All I can say is, keep up the fight and hopefully and prayerfully there is a cure that will arise!
"Know I'm bumping an old thread but a lot of your symptoms sound similar to mine. Any update on how you're doing now?
"I have a 3 year old that has been dealing with this gastritis for quite some time.. . There's a lot of food she cannot eat. I tell everybody that she's allergic to food because of how much food that she cannot take in. But she takes a probiotic that helps the stomach with the gastritis. So to the people that do you have gastritis that is a very good things to take in as a probiotic. I have a 2 month old that is taking a probiotic too. I would like to see that from other people that have it with their children??
I have the similar complaints as you do? How are you now and did you find any recovery?
Also, I have realized that at the end of july every year since about middle school I have gotten a lot of stomach and bowel issues during the end of july. I was wondering if you experienced anything similar to that. I havent found a solution yet but I am taking probiotics which help a little bit, I also have prescription strength anti nauseau pills and I am still searching for an answer. I was wondering if you have ever had the chicken pox, since I got them when I was in 4th grade and I feel like that is when all of my stomach problems started.
I have literally the same story as you. I started having acid reflux symptoms in about 4th grade after I developed the chicken pox. My stomach has not been the same since. I have been diagnosed with celiacs and lactose intolerance as well as IBS and put on loads of different ant acids and still I havent improved. I also got an endoscopy where nothing was found. I was wondering if you had found any solutions that helped you?
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
"I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
"Glad I found this thread, I've had similar symptoms leading up to today where I had the biggest flareup so far which has left my left abdomen sore and bruised. I've had the h.ployi, bloods and stools back negative, waiting on endoscopy and colonoscopy now. However I'm being to think it may be crohns given my history with ibs. My flare up today was from oatmeal, which I've eaten successfully throughout my ordeal so no clues
"I started off like this same tablets for over 3 months they didnt help at all so came off them now when i eat i get side and back pain that lasts for few days this happens every time i eat
I have no appetite and I sweat uncontrollably, yet I'm freezing
My stomach is super tight feeling, as well as extremely inflamed. I believe I have ulcers as well.. Hence why I'm in so much pain
I can't even go to work, can barely stand.
I'm in severe pain and I went to the dr- I got no medicine- he said I can't help u here and sent me away
I'm literally crying non stop
I've had this problem for years but it's never been as bad as it is now
"Im literally about to freak out
I'm stuggling to look after my kiddies .. Some days I feel not to bad
I've had h pylori test bloods scan on kidneys nothing founds.. The pain moves around from one side to the other.. could this be gastritis???
I do suffer with anxiety which I think makes me worse.
But a few days later it seemed to move to my stomach I generally don't feel sick and don't have any burning or reflux but a uncomfortable stomach lots of trapped gas in upper stomach and ribs.. sometimes like im holding my stomach in and a little constipated.
I am 5 half months post partum and about 8 weeks ago I started with a kidney infection i was on antibiotics for 8 days ..
I have some similar symptoms
"Hi. Could it be ibs? I'm having pain in my back an in my belly sharp pains constant! For days hospital dun blood tests urine tests..my stomach bloated ..he said in end it maybe ibs an to go docs...Iv cum home an everytime I eat it send sharp pains in my tummy the pain is so severe!! . No sickness jus worse pain like contractions! I took buscipone an it did help! But I need to go dctrs ..Jus can't at mo coz I'm e haste with the pain. Try buscipone c if it helps x
"Everyone, for temporary relief get a heavy duty vibrating massager. Mine works wonders when i have to get to sleep! At least something while we figure out long.term solutions...
"Hello, I thought as a fellow suffer in pain I would add my thoughts. I have a hernia hiatus which is caused by my fat belly. It causes acid to be pushed up into my esophagal at night, especially if I sleep in my right. This leaves the tube raw and swollen- but after some water /antacids I can get on with life. Now this brings me to my next set of symptoms. I recently had pneumonia and 3 lots of antibiotics - which has killed any good bacteria in my stomach as well. Found out this causes inflammation and pain in top rightish area of stomach- a lot of pain that no amount of antacids would relieve. So if I'm already raw from my hernia- this isn't going to help. So eating sauerkraut and bio yougurts and miso to build my good bacteria and bring g the inflammation down. Also took 1000mgof paracetamol to deal with pain ( hospital told me when I had pneumonia this was best way to take it- every 8hrs instead of 4- more effective). Also was taking ibuprofen for pneumonia - and it really hurts the lining of your stomach. Lastly I know that antacids and proton inhibitors actually back fire and make the body produce more acid after time, and also too low acid is bad as bacteria need it and we need it to properly digest. So when I lost weight a few months ago ( sadly put it back on) my acid reflux completely disappeared just like when I was younger and never has problems. These are my observations, take from them what you will.
"Hi jenny just reading all this after my attack with my stomach at 3am in the morning haha. Reading all what you say most of you have hit the nail on the head everytime i get in a car i feel sick and need a bathroom but it doesnt stop there it gets upset when i eat too i cant go 10 mins without needing a bathroom or feeling sick but i dont throw up its just diarrhea whats wrong with me i always cry i have to go to bathroom cause just cant hold on anxiety and pressure and i breathe like im pregnant i gained so much weight yet i eat close to nothing i eat one meal a day dinner thats it no fruit no tea nothing but that because im afraid to need the bathroom its devastating because o cant spend time with my husband. I was hoping a specialist would help but readin what you all said it sounds ill be waisting my time but i do need help but i wish and bless you well i wish us all well soon
"Thanks Terry. It sure does hurt especially when losing 30 pounds you didn't want to lose! I sure hope and pray again, that some one finds s cure for this type of pain! Well to the sergeon on Monday to see if he has any answers to which I doubt being that I have had all tests possible.
One drink I have been taking for last couple of months is a tumeric and almond milk drink. Because I have cut out tea I like a hot drink of a night. It has been really good in helping me up until this week. Almost like body gets immune to anything that helps after few months. So frustrating.
"Terry, sounds just like me! I am in my late 60 and it just hit me 4 mts go. Talk about tests, wow, I am drained of blood!! They have done everything possible except one right now, the colon test. I'm waiting on that one. For pain, and although they found no cancer, they put me on percocet, great to relieve pain. I lost 30 pounds in those months and little more. I hope one of these Doctors can find out what our problem is. I need a new stomach! Can they replace that??
I'm 33 year old male of small build and no other ilnesses.
My symptoms are symply feeling quite tender around middle of abdomen and also feeling quite sick. I can go few weeks with feeling quite good and very active but when it does hit me I really don't want to do much at all. I work shift work but keep my eating very simple now and quite plane. I like a beer but do not drink much and when I'm feeling good can have few beers without it changing this. I have cut out tea almost completely and only have one cup a day now. I have tried a lot of different midication, currently back on Lansoprazole in morning and amitriptylene before bed but like today feeling rather rubbish And so fed up with it ruining my life!!
"Hi Jenny. Hope this finds you feeling better? Just wondered if you ever got to the bottom of what was causing you to feel unwell? I have had very similar symptoms, and also mine has been on going for 3 years now!! I have had a number of cameras both endoscopy and colonoscopy I've had ultrasounds X-Ray's, blood tests urine and stool samples etc everything has come back pretty much fine slight inflammation here and there it nothing much. I have been under a specialist for the last year or two but again all results ok although did hear I have calcification on my prostate which I am seeing my GP about as this is not the area the specialist deals with.
"Hey Jenny! I see you posted this a year ago but I am curious to know if u are better or if they ever figured it out?! I've had the exact same thing u are describing for over 3 weeks now everyday and Drs and Gi has no clue what it is. It mind boggles me so I feel like I have to try and diagnosis myself Almost. Reading this discussion has actually made me feel a whole lot better knowing that I'm not alone but pain is awful and doesn't go away with flare ups as well. I've been taking tumeric and probiotics as well as kefir hoping it might help but so far nothing is working and they told me to not take Advil it Tylenol too but prescribed me oxy in which only covers it up. Anywhoo if ur still there and u get this I would love to know how you are coming along these days!!! Thank u and I do hope ur better
"i know this was listed a while ago but I hope you're still active. i have had the same problems except less frequent and no swelling of the stomach (at least, I had never checked). my stomach would hurt extremely bad and it took everything in me not to scream and then maybe an hour later I would just throw up so much. this happens very inconsistently and at the most random times.
go worse I just couldn't try to live with it anymore I went do stairs and cut up some cucumbers and put them in a boul and ate them I felt so much better after that so that leads of to right now when I am typing this down Evan though I have school in about 7 hours so Maybe it's just lack of greens ?
my name is Maddie and I'm a tween so you don't have to take me seriously is you don't want to but I want to tell you a story so here goes yesterday for brecfast I had mini muffens and swerly bread and for lunch I had pizza and then after that we went to a grad party and I didn't eat much because I had a big lunch ( of pizza ) and so after the party we got home and it was alredy past 7:00 so I had a Popsicle and went to be bed ""SNAP"" I woke up just like that at first I went to and don't get grossed out but I Tryed to go to the bathroom but I couldn't so I went back to my room with the comeing of time the pain just got worse I went to my moms room and told her how bad my stomach hurt and she said that it was propable because I didn't have any greens today and I was like OHHHH you are so right and she gave me some crackers and water and went back to bed I nibble on the crackers after that I tried to go to the bathroom 2 more times and nothing and it
"Hi...I am so thankful for all of the advice and chatting. My daughter who is just 16 is having this issue. She is adopted (has been here 2 years) and I do not want to run her through a bunch of tests. She has even been on the floor in tears in a ball position. She seems to wake up with pain gone and then it creeps on throughout the day. I am going to start logging her diet. I have been gluten free for 3 years and then I found out I couldn't tolerate dairy...so my diet changes has literally changed me. I hate that for a kid as I get it. I am very picky and eat like a kid....so just wanted to follow this chat line to get great tips. I am going to look into the alo vera as I know nothing about that. Thanks again for everyone's input and I am going to pray for those of you on here that are in pain.
Now i have had the same attack but no sickness i have been feeling sick though plus the other day i had bloody diarrhoea i have been four a ultra sound scan they say i have loads of little stones in my gallbladder also the other day i have had blood test done and doctors phone up to say come in a day early than my appointment is my partner is really worried would say its similar to yours many thanks
I have read your advert just wondering if I have a similar problem i had a problem with. vomting and stomach pains right across the bottom of my stomach and also my upper. abdomen on my right side and sometimes all over my stomach the pain hurts this happened the middle of march 2016 .
"Hey have you found out anything? I've been have stomach problems for 2 months now and I'm thinking it's my anxiety I have it bad
"Dear Jenny, I Have IBS & Acid Reflux for which I take Mebeverine & Omeprazole. I Had My ENT Appt Recently & I was Prescribed Lansoprazole by the ENT Consultant, to Try to Eleviate My Reflux Symptoms, So I Took it & the First Day My Stomach was Stinging, But I Thought, I Have to Give it a Chance as it Seemed to Help My Throat a Bit So for 1 Wk I Took it, But, the Lansoprazole Made My Pain & Symptoms 10 Times Worse, I wish I never used the Wretched Stuff. And Now I'm Scared to Eat Nearly Everything I Eat Disagrees with Me, I get Belly Burn which I Never had B4, Except Whilst Taking Ibuprofen, Which I Haven't Touched Since, But the Allergic Reaction I Got from That, Didn't, Last as Long as This! My Insides are Hyper Sensitive Since I Took it, it Should be Banned! I Shall be Returning to My GP Pronto to Ask for Some Kind of Ante Dote Reversal to These Awful Life Changing Symptoms. I Tried Drinking Lots of Milk Which Seemed to Help, But Sadly the Relieving Effect of the Milk was Only Temporary. I Feel Like Suing. As I'm Already Pretty Poorly, I've Got So Much Health Problems, I Could Write a Book. But with My Fybromyalgia, Vertigo, Goitre, Arthritis, Sciatica. None of These Are More Debilitating Than This, My Meds Keep Things Ticking Over Nicely, But This! I Eat Things Fine for Me for Years & End Up in Agony, Doubled Up in Pain with Either Diarrhoea or Constipation!!!
"Hi jenny33426, I am 16 years old and on the pill for various reasons, I have also been experiencing tummy pain for about 4 months now I have had blood tests and ultrasounds and been given A load of med's however none have worked and no one knows what it is, I have also been having serious back pain and my ribs have been hurting, so I'm not sure if this is anything like yours or you know what this is?
"Jenny, I know it has been a while since you posted this information, and hopefully you have found a soultion. My mother has been going through this very thing for the past two years. What we FINALLY found is that the blood vessels that are supplying blood to her stomach were colluded. Out of three major vessels that supply the stomach, one is completely closed and the other two were very diseased. They placed a stent in the major vessel. Since my mother is elderly, they want to do the second one in a few months. THE RESULTS were miraculous! She can now eat and does not have ANY pain. I hope this is something that you haven't had checked and they can do the contrast CT and MRA (artery) to find the results for your own stomach. Best of luck!
I currently have the exact same symptoms and basically went through the exact same experience (as far as going to the hospital and having all my tesr results be perfectly fine) as you. I know it has been years since this post but I really hope you or someone who's been in the same position can help because I desperately need help. I've been experiencing this pain for about a month and now I'm scared on the daily bases that I'll forever feep this way. So if you or anyone reading this have overcome their gastritis, please share with me how you did so.
I have severe upper abdominal pain everyday, from coughing to sneezing any sudden movement gives me pain. I can only describe it as if there is a vice twisting and turning inside. I lost my appetite for a while and as a result ended up losing a stone in weight, this added to my depression and anxiety as I hate the way I look now, I'm basically 8st and feel so unattractive at the moment. But anyway my appetite is slowly coming back, but I also get feelings of sickness out the blue, and sometimes I am sick, and is known as bile, a yellow coloured fluid. So I went back to my doctor and he referred me to get an endoscopy which showed I have inflammation in the stomach, and the hpylori virus (I think that's how you spell it) I find out next Friday. They also took 4 biopsies which I'll find the results for that in 4 weeks time. I'm hoping and praying it comes back ok. We know when our bodies are not right, keep on pushing your doctor for the endoscopy, don't just keep taking the tablets, that could just be prolonging the problem. Good luck x
I've been dealing with this pain also for way over a year a now. My doctor started me off on lanzoprazole for a few months the he put me on omeprazol, neither have helped with my symptoms or pain.
I have severe upper abdominal pain everyday, from coughing to sneezing any sudden movement gives me pain. I can only describe it as if there is a vice twisting and turning inside. I lost my appetite for a while and as a result ended up losing a stone in weight, this added to my depression and anxiety as I hate the way I look now, I'm basically 8st and feel so unattractive at the moment. But anyway my appetite is slowly coming back, but I also get feelings of sickness out the blue, and sometimes I am sick, and is known as bile, a yellow coloured fluid. So I went back to my doctor and he referred me to get an endosc
I've been dealing with this pain also for way over a year a now. My doctor started me off on lanzoprazole for a few months the he put me on omeprazol, neither have helped with my symptoms or pain.
"Glad to know I'm not the only one with these same stomach issues. I'm 34 now and I've had all these symptoms since I was about 3 or 4 years old and no one has been able to figure out what the cause is or how to help me. Up until 2 years ago the flares of pain (like razor blades swimming in my stomach) and the constant nausea would happen maybe once a month but since then it's almost every day. The worst episode i had lasted a full month and was even causing me so much dizziness from the pain that i was always on the verge of passing out and still they can't find a cause. Going next week for another gastroscope to see if anything new has come up but I doubt it. I am going to look into the Aloe Vera, L-glutamine and Acidophilus Plus that some others on here mentioned and hopefully those can provide a bit of relief cause at this point I can barelly function.
"having the same problems in the usa ugh been through it all a Gastroscopy and colonoscopy nothing showing anyrthings wrong was eeling better than bamm pain back not sure why maybe the smoking idk but man the pain hurts got a doctors apointment wed will see but like you i going through the same bs with every doctor telling me to deal with it theres nothing you can do stop smoking drink just water take pills no pain killers blan diet yoga my problem is its in the same fing spot
"i had laporoscopy mine hurt like hell felt like someone was stabbing me with a knife
Please look into having a laporoscopy as Endometriosis effects thousands of women every day. It is such a strange and varied disease and at present takes a minimum of 8 years to diagnose. All of my examinations except the laporoscopy came back clear and normal. If what I have was classed as MILD Endometriosis I would hate to feel what severe feels like.
They found what they described as MILD Endometriosis. And removed it with lasers. It will come back but my symptoms have not completely gone but have improved 90% and I am able to work out which foods to avoid at which times.
Something in me was telling me that this is what I had. The only test that I hadn't had which is the was they find it for definite. Was something called a laporoscopy. This is where they make small incisions in your abdomen and go in with a camera. After months of fighting the doctors who would not except that I wanted a laporoscopy because my symptoms did not match I finally with the help of my GP got my way and went in for a laporoscopy.
I started researching it but the general symptoms didn't match mine. The only thing I noticed was that my stomach tended to be at its worst when I was fertile and around my periods.
Last year I finally had enough. My friend had completely different symptoms to me but had recently been diagnosed with something called Endometriosis. (The lining of the womb grows outside of the womb on other organs)
I took loads of different prescribed and over the counter Meds over the years nothing touched it.
I paid to have colonic hydrotherapy didn't do anything.
Blood tests - normal and clear for years but eventually developed B12 deficiency which I now receive 3 monthly injections for but didn't stop my issues.
After 15 years of suffering with your symptoms and being palmed off with IBM over and over I feel your pain. I had the following tests
"I am having the same stomach problem and found this thred while searching for a reason of my stomach ache. The pain comes atleast once in a week and it is so severe. This thread is now older than one year so i am eager to know if somebody found any solution for this.
I went to many doctors I found out I am LACTOSE INTOLERANT, as soon as I stopped lactose products the misrable pain stopped I hope this helps others with this, I spent years in pain make sure you don't have food intolerances
"I made an account just to write my story I hope it helps others I looked for years for relief on forums and finally found the problem, I suffered daily with bad stomach pains mainly just above the belly button the pains was daily and constant most times I couldn't sleep the pain was so bad I thought I had an ulcer, the only thing that helped was mylanta,
"hi, i too suffer with this pain to the point im on my hands and knees,last year i had the anti biotics for the infection which seem to clear it but for passed few months has come back with avengence,im currently on lansaprozole but it as ni effect,im to the point where i dont want to eat as the pain worsens after food im at my wits end awaiting more gp appointments
"A couple days ago I was searching online about gastritis medication and how long it takes to work. I was researching this for my mother who has been experiencing the same symptoms that you and many others on this thread have been experiencing. My mother too had tests done, blood tests urine tests ect...when we were at the hospital, doctors couldn't figure out what could be causing the pain, she was given every drug the hospital had and the only one that took the pain away was morphine, in exchange for the pain subsiding, she was throwing up excessively from the morphine. My mother suggested it might be gastritis, so they sent her home with a prescription of Prilosec, with hope this would relieve all this pain she's been in. 3 days later, with the pain not subsiding or getting better we went to another hospital and waited 7 hours to be seen by a doctor. She had more tests done including a ct scan and luckily we had an answer to all her suffering. It was a swollen pancreas due to a stone blocking her pancreas. Apparently gall stones can still form even without a gall bladder. (My mom had hers removed several years ago) eating food brings on more pain because the stone is lodged in the way of food passing through. I hope my post may help someone. I literally read every post on this thread and felt for everyone of you, as soon as we found an answer I immediately thought about coming on here and posting about it. Take care All!
I'm fighting through it but taking IBS tablets and having colonics but nothing helps
I'm having a very similar pain.
i have even done endoscopy two times during the last year, I'm still in pain all day and night, , ,I don't know what causing it, now I have been given drug for anti depression, ofcourse if I be in pain for this long I will get depressed,,,. I am going to try it anyways, maybe I am depressed and I don't know myself and that's all into it. I really can't find answer for this pain.
"It's very frustrating, I have done all sort of test, and doctors can't really help.
"Hi Jenny, I am glad you started this discussion. It seems many have the same symptoms. I have it too, all of it, the pain, sometimes nauzea, at times feels like a bruised stomach, pain got so intense once I thought I was having a heart attack. I have had many tests as well. Many medications have been tried and not succeeded. It seems the Aloe Vera is the most common treatment among all here, I will try it. Anything is worth a try. I too am tired of the pain. I have lost much weight (45 lbs.) without trying and am still losing. I have other medical problems including ulcerative colitis and asthma and arthritis. I am 54. Perhaps there were no recent responses but I am wondering how you are doing now? Have you found anything that works? Warm water seems to work for a short period of time, relieves the pain. Nothing else works except, of course, not eating. Any food (although I eat very little and nothing to irritate stomach) still hurts my stomach. The Dr's are not God and obviously do their best but sometimes do not find answers. These conversations are good, perhaps we can learn from one another. I live in Canada. How are things going for everyone now?
"You may want to have your gal bladder checked. I recently (3mths ago) had severe pains in my stomach which was unbearable. A lot of the time it would come about at night when trying to sleep. Or even eating or drinking anything. I always ended up vomiting from the pain.But I finally went to the E.R. one night and they ran a CT/CAT scan on my stomach. My gal bladder was severely twice the size it should have been. I HAD GAL STONES!! It was making my liver sick as well and I was turning yellowish,like jondice.Thankfully I have no more worries after undergoing surgery to remove my gal bladder and all the stones.I am happy to say I have no more pain. ..hope this helps you all in any way. God Bless!
"Wow I have had these symptoms since summer 2013...I am a senior in college now and I can barely function in school because I am up half the night with excruciating stomach pain that makes me throw up usually in the early morning-4-5 am. I have tried EVERYTHING from prescribed medications, lifestyle changes ((((FODMAPS made it worse, and it seems only carbs help)))))), and homeopathic remedies-none of which have helped. I do not smoke, hardly drink, and have been doing yoga for years and meditating, nothing puts it to ease. I am in result completely exhausted, mentally and physically, and extremely frustrated that I cannot find the answer. I have been diagnosed with many things including IBS, gastrotitis, inflammation, etc etc etc. These are all ways of doctors saying ""i dont know"". Hopefully someone soon can help us....
"I know this is an old post but I've been going thru these symptoms for over a year now. I have bouts of pain after eating, drinking and at times when my stomach is empty....so pretty much constant. I have been diagnosed with ulcerative colitis whic is under control and gastritis, gerd, and small hiatal hernia. My doctor said the hernia shouldn't be causing the problem so that leaves me with the gerd and gastritis. I am taking a high dose of Prilosec ttwice a day and Carafate.i don't drink, smoke, or eat acidic or spicy food. The only things I drink are water or almond milk.i don't know what else to do. I know that for me coffee, chocolate, and peppermint ate definite no-nos. right now I am havivivg pretty bad pains but I'm hoping the Carafate stops it. It usually takes about a week for it to kick in. My doctor wants me to take all that is basically Prilosec with bicarbonate added. They are expensive so I may try to just add a little bicarbonate soda when I take my Prilosec. When having the pain, the only thing I can eat is plain rice, baked chicken, and white potatoes. Stomach still has pain but could be worse. My gall bladder was removed 2 years ago and I believe my problem may be from bile in my stomach and not just regular acid. I will probably call my doc in a few days. He told me if it didn't get better he wanted to do a CAT scan. Not sure why as I think another endoscopy is what I need. I may try aloe juice. Will repost if I do.
"Hi my names michael haigh im 39 years old..3 weeks ago i started getting really bad stomach pain...so went to the docs...she guessed at gastritis...and told me to keep taking omeprazole which dident have any affect..and the pain worsend to the point i went to a&e...they did all blood tests...urine sampel and a few other tests that all came back clear...they arranged for an appointment for me to have the camera down my throat and a scan..which im worried about having...scared to death if im honest of the outcome...im still waiting for these tests and recently visited my doc again as im now feeling ill and still got pain that will not go...did you ever get over this problem..and can anyone give me any idea what this could be..or a way to relieve feeling like this? Xxx
I take tecta on a daily basis.
When I dont eat I feel sick. ..when I do eat I feel sick....no matter what it's an issue. ....
I too am experiencing the same symptoms unfortunately.....however I do suffer from extreme anxiety and panic attacks. I have been on and off antidepressants over the past 15 years.....I refuse to go on them as I believe they are making my conditions worse. They cause alot of gastrointestinal issues....
I too am experiencing the same symptoms unfortunately.....however I do suffer from extreme anxiety and panic attacks. I have been on and off antidepressants over the past 15 years.....I refuse to go on them as I believe they are making my conditions worse. They cause alot of gastrointestinal issues....
Anyway, this is my little story about stomach pains, I feel what you feel, and I really hope that your pain will go away very soon because it's not something you can live with forever...
I'm amazed reading you, its as if i had written it myself!
Could not believe, how similar symptoms are. I have dealt with it since twenties. Now i'm 60. It has gotten worse with years. The only thing that does help me is a very strong and expensive probiotic pill which I take every morning.
I have also gained weight that its hard to get rid off. Its a negative circle, since the more wait you gain and the more sick you become, the more tired and less energy to exercise you are.
i have been diagnosed w: IBS, lactose intolerance, etc, etc. but no treatment has been successful.
I know it's been quite some time since you posted this, but as my (actually my husband's) issue is more current, I thought I'd take the chance and see if you're still around and posting.
I cannot believe how identical your stomach aches are to mine. Word for word it could have been written by me.
My husband (read above.post) is so discouraged over this whole thing and I can't really blame him. But I keep making him try, I know there's a solution out there somewhere. From reading this thread, it seems like with so many people with these issues, the gastroenterology field.would be working a little harder with us all. Oh well.
Hello I found your post on your husbands stomach pain while one of my desperately attempts to get to the bottom of my own stomach issues through the Internet anyways he sounds like he's did suffering from turbo same exact thing Iam even down to the appendix and c diff bug I realize that this post is older but I was curious if he has gotten any better if you found help or a diagnosis?? I'm a 30 year old mother of two and I'm sad to say that some days I don't want to be here because of this stomach pain I just want some answers and a doctor who will do the work to find out what's wrong! Thank you so much for your time!
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
It's amazing to read that I am not the only one who is struggling with daily stomach pains. I feel so bad for each and every one of you because I know how terrible and frustrating it is to be in pain every day and not be able to figure out why it's happening.
I am 28 years old, I don't smoke, I don't drink, I don't drink coffee or soda, I eat healthy and only drink water, I am not overweight either. I should not be having such problems and yet I am in pain more days than I am not. I have noticed that my stomach started to get upset in 2007 when I started to drink coffee more regularly, but it wasn't nearly as bad as it is now....almost 7 years later (I don't drink cofee anymore though). I have cut out so many foods already out of my diet and already eat very basic foods such as rice and chicken
I feel like I am at the point where I do not care what I have to do in order to feel better. I have no other health issues. When my stomach doesn't hurt, I feel great! Such a difference! But when it does, I have no energy, my stomach is bloated and I don't feel like doing anything, I feel disgusting and in pain. I don't care if I have to get a surgery or stop eating bread or dairy, whatever I need to do! This may sound terrible and of course I would never do it, but sometimes I feel like I just want to stab myself in the stomach because I'm just so tired of dealing with this every single day of my life and there's no one that can help me. Every time I call to make an appointment with my GI, he's always booked and I have to wait a months...how much longer will this go on!?
I am sorry about the rant, I'm sure you can sense how frustrated I am with this, as I'm sure you are as well. I really hope that we could be fixed so that we could go on having happy and healthy lives with no pain (I can't imagine what that will be like! It's been so long since I felt good). Let's keep our fingers crossed. I will run by my doctors some of the suggestions that I read on here..such as aloe vera and acidophilus, we'll see what she says.
Your stomach problems sound a lot like mine, I don't know what to do and I have been dealing with this for so long my anxiety has picked up about it and the doctor is running out of options let me know if you have found some relief. Not only to let my doctor know but just so I know there is a light at the end of the tunnel
Hi I know this post his old but I cannot believe how similar thoughts I have at this moment in time. I had terrible pains 3 or so years ago for months on end. I was so down. I then found one probiotic in the morning and aloe Vera at night worked wonders and my bought severely reduced to about once a quarter and the longest being 2 weeks. That was however until 5 weeks ago when I had a sudden flare for no reason. I too just want to stab my stomach and see what's going on. It may go off for an hour and I'm totally different and positive. It's like a light switch. I'm now getting very depressed and emotional (I'm a 44 year old man!) and it's starting to affect my family as I'm very irritable. I just hope I can get back to how I was but I'm not helping with getting stressed. Going back to Dr's as feel this cannot just be IBS. Hope you got sorted.
Just to let you know, i am yet to make any progress as yet, after 2 months of waiting my consultation with the stomach specialist is finally tomorrow morning! It can't come quick enough!
Nothing has changed with me if I am honest, i have been keeping a food diary (nothing is standing out that could be causing my stomach problems can happen one week but not the next if i have eaten the same things). I have been taking my spoon full of Onken Natural yogurt 3 x a day for over a month now, I have also been drinking 2 x peppermint tea a day too (apparently good for your digestive system) unfortunately still not cured.
Every day that goes by I am just getting used to the fact that this is going to be with me forever, it makes me miserable and things that i should enjoy aren't enjoyable, I had my friends wedding for example last Friday, Thursday my stomach flared up terribly again ALL DAY! luckily it went down by Friday however i was sitting on the edge of my seat all day worrying it was going to flare again .
its interesting how you say that your husband got these sympthoms after getting ill on holiday as that is exactly what happened to me! I went on holiday September 2012 got really ill (extrememly bad diorea for 24+ hours) ever since this holiday my problems started, intermitantly at first till October last year where i have it every day!
I am lucky that i am strong minder and no matter what i power through and live my every day life, I continue to go to work with the pain and out with friends, however some days its torture but I am determind not to let this get the better of me!
my husband was back at hospital this morning and has come away feeling a bit more optimistic. he saw a different consultant who is doing some more blood tests and stool samples. He said that he will check again for the h.pylori bacteria as despite my husband having already taken two courses of the treatment for the bacteria following his illness on holiday in Feb 2013, some forms of it can be resistant to particular antibiotics. He is also going to get his Gp to prescribe some different medications so I will keep you posted. He mentioned as well that there is a part of the stomach which still cannot be seen from either an endoscopy or a colonoscopy so he is looking into this as well.
I will keep you posted how I get on tomorrow
My name is leticia and I started having stomach pain and I thought it was because of my back diet. Because I don't eat very much and it's the pain it's right in the middle of my stomach and it goes to my shoulder blades. And I also have fibromyalgia and that doesn't help but I can't take the pain anymore it hurts so bad in the makes me throw up sometimes especially if I eat something. I don't like to eat so it makes it harder on me and I'm getting scared because this is the first time I'm reading that a lot of women and men have the same problem. I feel your pain because my pain makes me cry😪 I haven't gone to the doctor for the stomach pain I'm scared he's going to tell me I have something bad and then I feel like I did it to myself for trying to being a crazy diet! I'm 50 years old and sometimes I feel like I'm definitely not going to wake up. I just can't believe all the people that have the stomach pain just like mine I thought I was in makes me feel good reading and trying to find an answer!I pray you're doing better and you don't have the pain no more hopefully they fixed two maybe you could give me the answer? You friend Lettie Davis Cali
I've no idea if you're still using this site but I'm in the exact same boat as you.
I've just been diagnosed with chronic gastritis , H pylori negative, no vomiting or passing blood, the PPI's I've been put on seem to aggravate my stomach.
My stomach is incredibly inflamed, I'm beside myself with pain and can only take water and extremely plain food at the moment.
On Friday 25/04 - had an appt with my stomach specialist, explained that i am still getting upset stomach every morning, occassional bouts of my stomach bloating excessively (once a month or so) and the odd days weekly that i just generally don't feel well.
Even though i have already had the Endoscope and Colonoscope this goes through your small intestines to see if there is any kind of disease there (the others can't go through your small intestines.
I found your post very interesting. I too have been suffering from the exact same symptoms you have. It's been going on for nearly a year and so far the docs are no help.
About 2 weeks ago I had enough and took myself to emergency. They did an ultrasound and said everything looked fine over than the fact that I have gallstones. The doctor said however that my symptoms are not likely caused by that and that I probably have an ulcer. She prescribed me Pantoloc and said to keep taking it 2x a day until I feel better. Then stop, see if the symptoms return, go do the breathe test for h.pylori and we'll go from there. Ugh.
I really didn't feel great about her ""diagnoses"" so I went to see my family doc. He suggested that it's the gallstones and that I should see a surgeon. He put in a refferal for me but says it could take months to get in. Not to mention that I'm not sure my symptoms match that of gallstones. Sigh.
Im so lost. This is really ruining my quality of life. I hate living in pain and I have no clue what to do about it.
No I have tried aloe yet to be honest, at the moment I am not taking any medication, and my stomach just goes in waves of feeling ok and then bad other days! I just take each day as it comes until my next appt for the capsule camera.
I have had the same problem now for over a couple years. I have had my esophagus stretched 3 times and not helped. The only think that releives the pain is drinking down a bottle of water until the pain is gone. I have problems and unable to burp making the pain even more unbearable. I have been under a lot of stress in the last well all my life. I am happier now but as I was growing up, if I got stressed out, my stomach would knot up and I couldn't eat. Anyway I have had the burium swallow and all that but I think I am going to go see a chiropractor. I know my neck is out and well, it wouldn't hurt to see if that could help.
i read recently that piched nerves in neck or back can cause excess acid to be released into stomach causing ulcer type problems, my neck is out right now and am having real trouble with my stomach
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
It sure isn't pleasant as I have recently experienced something similar but not all the symptoms everyone's mentioned.
A couple of weeks ago, I had not eaten for a couple of days due to work and laziness and the only thing i had was a manky mango that afternoon. That night the stomach started to get uncomfortable and remained the same the next day. The next two nights was unbearable pains from ribs to waist, all over. Bloated, nausea, pain, farting (sorry passing wind), for the first week. Attended the doctors 3 times that week, to be told food poisoning to trapped wind. I am a bad eater, so I started to have 3 meals a day, then i had an ultra scan, I had been given pain killers to digestion tablets, to bacteria killing tablets, allsorts. Nothing was working not even the injection to kill instant pain.
I had mentioned before that my sister had intestine problems and they have only left her with 10% intestine, in her stomach, but after my scan I brought up the fact that she was born with organs in the wrong place. That is when they then realised that my pancreas is above my stomach and not below.
Now I am awaiting their next advice, as they wanted to go through the scans again. My pains have gone, and maybe i am thinking it was a bactrial virus, that took it's time getting out
same problems recently found out that I have food intolarences check the above link as its really helped.
four years on from taking lazoperazole for acid reflux I find out through my own research that lanzoperaloze is not that good for us ,, we need acid in our stomachs but lanzoperaloze not only reducing the stomach making acid it also stops vital vitamins and minerals from entering the body just like a sponge..
im currently on a seclusion diet basically preteen shakes and I introduce certain foods and keep a diary and I have to be honest wheat makes me really I'll gluten makes me I'll msg in Chinese food and certain fruit and veg.
i have lost two stone but what I have found out really helps me build a benchmark, for years I have dealt with stress ( food related I now believe) I also have panick attacks and feel like I'm choking on food so if it does not digest I'm usually sick..
ive had a long list of symptoms including fatigue sickness stress dizziness foggy brain generally run down and I'm putting this all down to what my body accepts or does not accept as its fuel..
Yes I get acid reflux but only from certain foods also I have intolarences .
im on the same boat , but all my problems start after a broadspectrum antibiotics , cipro and levoquin . is i lot better now but , scary , atill have stomach problems after 8 months and some anxiety
I have also been feeling ill and trouble with bowels and stomach fullness. It's been a month and a half and driving me insane.
Thank you for messaging, I have been tested for coeliac disease which came back negative.
Thank you very much for your reply. Please tell me if you have ever come across this. My problem began after I had eaten some raw garlic, I was totally fine before that.
Then bam my stomach was in constant agony which just went on and on. I was treated for stomach ulcer and after a few months was better. But then it was iffy here and there and bam. It went again when I had some probiotics.
I do not have stress, the only thing I am stressed about is this.
i have the same simptoms try and read about natural cure like cabbage juice ,DGL , ALOE VERA and PROBIOTICS
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
I am in a very similar situatino to what you were saying here, it would be good to talik.
I've experienced basically same thing after getting permanent diabetes after having it w all 3 of my boys! I started with really bad stomach pains so bad that I was doubled over and went to the ER for the first time many years ago.I was told that I had good news and bad news one that was diabetic n 2 I have really bad gastritis! which is usually activated they said when my sugar is really high over 300 which it does all the times it also drops really low and I'm hypoglycemic also.I spent almost seven have eight years in gymnastics for about 8 hours a day. I've and got hit by a car back in 2001actually it was a 4x4 truck Toyota 4runnerwith a big,black grade steel guard on the front. so the only thing I suggest is that you can go to a pain clinic.They are the only one I can write you pain medicine for what you're going through.a doctor can only write so many prescriptions for pain before the have to send you to a pain clinic.it seems you have insurance I do too through Ford Motor Company so I don't know how different it would be for you to go but 13 years ago it was hard to find one there is only two in my state now they're like Starbucks, thier on every corner!
I have gone through the exact problems you have. I was diagnosed with IBS. I went through the ultrasound and endoscopy also everything came back normal.
I thought I'd let you know what has helped me. I stopped drinking pop. I went to juice that doesnt have much sugar in it, water and tea. I know everyone is different. It could be worth a shot though.
I hope you feel better soon. I hated not knowing what was happening to my body. The pain was unbearable and all I could do was cry. I was always afraid that I would get sick of I left the house. It controlled my life terribly bad. Ever since I stopped drinking pop I go out without having to worry! My doctors here in the US put me on a GI relaxer called rubnil (not sure if I spelt it right.) Let me know what you find out maybe it could help me also!
Basically to let you know where i am now with it all I decided I couldn't go through with the Capsule Camera at the moment so have come away from seeing doctors etc for the time being as to be honest I felt as if I was going around in circles and thought i would keep a ANOTHER diary and see if i notice any patterns myself.
Thankfully I am currently not getting the horrific sypthoms i was getting on a daily basis (diroea, horrific swollen stomach and feeling sick) however now I am getting it a couple of times a week which generally lasts 2 - 3 days depending on how bad it is.
Last time I went to see my GP he just said ""its IBS"" however I found hard to accept such a flippent diagnosis considering IBS is undiagnosable?
It was almost everyday I was getting sick and would last 2-3 days at a time feel better one day then I'd get sick again. It is definitely worth a shot! let me know if it helps you!
How intersting, yes as you say pretty much the same as me!
For the past 2 months I have been in complete agony with stomach pains. I have been to the ER a number of times and they have done blood work and ultra sounds and have came up with nothing.
I forgot to list another one of my symptoms, I have low back pain which also radiates into my thighs. Ughhhh. Again any help would be appreciated so much!!!!
3 years later (I know) but I have bloated sore stomach all the times. Tired of the pain and fear of eating and feeling malnourished.
i had the same pain and i cried majority of the night i couldnt sleep or hang out with friends i went to the doctor they didnt know what was going on i went to a GYN and they started me on birth control thinking it was cramps but the pain was still there finally i went to the emergency room when the pain was at its peek and the gave me medecine i stopped taking it for a while and the pain just dissappeard and then not too long ago about a week ago it came back and i already stopped eating me and drinking dairy i went gluten free for awhile and im still in a constant pain even if its minimal it still hurt i drink only water and hot tea and its really unbearable sometimes. have you figured out what it is yet ?
I was having burning pains in my upper abdomen daily, I also excessively burped and had LPR (silent reflux). I couldn't prevent these symptoms and they were so persistent I genuinely thought I was dying of stomach cancer for months and I thought nobody was taking me seriously and that I was going to be dead within the year. Googling your symptoms is some scary stuff. I think the stress itself is what made it worse. Now the symptoms will only appear if I drink alcohol or fizzy drinks. I still had to avoid many spicy types of food too which sucks I guess but anything is better than cancer
i was told i had lazy bowel abour 18month ago,told to eat lots of fibre everything calmed down,but about 3wks ago i would wake up in a morning with pain in the left side of my tummy,it would go after about 3 mins,but now its all day long all over my tummy and i feel sick,i think the worry is worse than the syptom going to ring docs for appoint in morning,but very worried.hope you have sorted your problem out
So sorry your going through something so smiliar to my problem. I thought I was the only one. Our sysmptoms are so similiar expect that my stomach is so huge and my weight is going crazy. One day I have a perfect regular flat stomach and suddenly I start swelling I go super huge people even ask me if im pregnant. My stomach gets supper huge, hard, and heavy. Ive had numerous of tests done like; upper endoscopys, colonoscpopys, thousands of blood tests, collected urine to have it tested, numerous of cts scans, ultrasounds, and xrays. Weve pretty much have done everything in the book. Im close to almost 3 months with this condition now. Its super diffucult to sleep, eat and sometimes even breath. I havent worked in a long time now due to all of these sysmptoms. None of the hydrocodine pills work any more. They first diagnosed me with IBS but none of the treatments worked for me. Ive done these crazy diets where I cant eat anything and only drink water and my stomach still seems to get bigger. I can't fit in any of my clothes. I feel like i'm going insane with all of these tests results being completly normal. Have you gotten any better? Any results?
So glad your finally getting some relief. Ive pretty much have tried everything and nothing seems to work I only get worse. I have an upcoming MRI and i'm hoping we could finally find an answer.
I have been suffering from the same symptoms for about 3 weeks now. Doctors have taken blood and stool samples and everything has come back as normal. Every morning my body wakes me up at around 8-9 and I am very ill for about 3-4 hours and then I am back to my normal self. The pain is very excruciating and I am more just annoyed that i havent slept in past 8 for 3 weeks. Doctors have ruled out a couple things, they say it could be IBS but i dont meet all the symptoms that IBS sufferers have. Anyways I was just woundering if you have heard anything new as of late. By the way I am 17 years old and this condition is ruining my social life and making me very depressed. I just wish there was somthing that i could do to make it go away
I have a 17yo daughter whonsuffers daily from nausea and stomach pain. She is afraid to eat anything and has lost alot of weight. She has had an upper gi and lower gi test and both are fine. Ahe was hospitalized for a week with extensive testing and all came back normal. She has seem a GI doctor and meds make her sick. She skips social gatherings and school ALOT! HAVE YOU FOUND ANY RELIEF? Any help would help. So worried.
I'm 20 years old and was suffering with exactly what you have described for more than 13 months, trying various medications, etc, before realising that I have had anxiety for a number of years, and it is what causer my stomach problems (crazy, I know). It turned into a vicious cycle because I (just like your daughter) was so afraid to eat anything in case it made me feel sick and in turn that made the anxiety worse, and so on. Although this might be a special case, maybe you should ask your daughter about this, because I was told that its more common than you would think . a few days after realising the cause, and after going to a councikker, I learned that deep breathing is a major help, and in the last 2 weeks my appetite is back to normal and my stomach is much more settled. I'm not 100% better but its getting there! I really hope this helps because I truely feel her pain, it was a nightmare.
I've had similar problems for the past 4 years. I've been to so many doctors and no one knows what's wrong with me and all the tests would come back negative. For me I had a lot of acid reflux where it would go to my chest throat and ears. It was constant 24/7 and many days because of it I cannot go to sleep. I have quit working because I just can't function with the pain and the sleepless nights. Eventually a doctor diagnosed me with gastroparesis which is the food not clearing fast enough from your stomach to your intestine therefore it could cause a plethora of problems. However I don't think that is what is causing all of my pain. The only thing that I really helped me was magnesium supplements. When I take it my body is just calm but it also caused soo much side effects that I just cannot be on it. I think my real problem is that my stomach muscles are in constant spasm. Recently my doctor prescribed a calcium channel blocker and that also seem to help, they are suppose to dialate the blood vessels so that your muscles can relax usually prescribed for people who have high blood pressure.
I started having this problem in my late 20s and because I look young and healthy, no one took me seriously, the only thing they ever related my problem to would be an eating disorder which I've never had! I am Asian and naturally thin and since I have had the stomach problems I've lost about another 10 pounds (I normally weigh 107 and I am 5'7) so that's a lot of weight to loose. And of course after hearing that all the specialist would again bring up anorexia as a potential cause.
I've literally tried pretty much everything, from aloe to zinc l-carnosine etc etc and by trial and error found that my problem has to be related to smooth muscle spasms and perhaps with neurotransmitters and hormones that are regulating the actions of the stomach.
I found this thread while trying to figure out what is wrong with my 10 year old son. He has had similar stomach issues for almost 3 weeks now. It seems to always be bad in the morning and evening, we have been eating healthier but that hasn't changed much for his stomach issues. We have been to the doctor and had a bunch of tests run and everything is coming back clear. Did you ever figure out what was causing your issues? I am inclined to get him some Acidophilus supplements since that seemed to help a few people on here.
One common cause to these syptoms could be H.Pylori ask the doc to test him for that - its a simple stool sample they send away - easy to test for and least you can rule that out straight away.
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
"Thanku so much for your reply, however I was tested for h pylori virus two weeks ago my results came back last Friday saying negative for h pylori. Pain is worse than ever before today so have had to leave work and come home, I have docs appt at 4 and will ask to be referred as I thankfully have bupa ins, managed to get an appt with stomach specialist for tomorrow. Terrified it's something serious :-s
I went to the doctors on Friday 25/10 and got referred to a private hospital THANKFULLY (finding the nhs doctors not very helpful at all if im honest). So Saturday 26/10 I went and saw a stomach specialist, he listened to all my symptoms and what I had been going through and how long, I also told him about the Lansoprazole which wasn't working at all (which he said if its not working, stop taking it which I did), he examined my stomach (felt it) and booked me in for an Ultrasound which was on Wednesday 30/10 and an Endsocopy on Wednesday 06/11, he didn't comment on what it could be as he said he needed to run these tests first. I asked him what I could do for the pain in the mean time, he said he didn't know as he didn't know what was wrong, which is a fair comment but to maybe try paracetmol and see if that helps.
So the pain in my stomach was still feeling horrendous, flaring up general mornings and afternoons to the point it would make me get extremely upset and not knowing what to do with myself, on Sunday 27/10 so much so I just said to my other half pls just look online and see what I can do to cope! I seriously didn't think I was going to make it to either of the coming appointments. I get upset stomach a couple of times a day too which added to the worry.
He looked online and said it sounds like I have an ulcer so basically said to me to eat every 2 hours (little and often), stop drinking tea (I only have 4 a day anyway) so I have exchanged it for 3 green teas a day, I used to have 1 can of sprite in the evening with my dinner which I have stopped as you shouldn't drink fizzy drinks, I have stopped eating spicy foods, I used to smoke 5 cigarettes a day which I have reduced by 1 so now smoke 4 a day and only have one after eating... Long story short it this seems to of stopped my stomach flaring into mega pain however the pain is still there but luckily it enabled me to go to work etc.
So I had the ultrasound, ALL CLEAR! which was a massive relief as I was petrified they was going to pick up something bad... he checked ALL my organs and said it all looks absolutely fine, which was a huge relief however they don't pick up stomach ulcers on an ultrasound so I still needed an endoscopy to see what was going on inside my stomach however the relief I had that the scan was all clear.
So it felt like a week took forever to roll round until the Endoscopy, Wednesday 6th November was finally here, which I was extremely nervous about as the thought of having a camera down my throat into my stomach which was sooooooo painful was terrifying, my apt was at 3.15 and I wasn't allowed to eat for 6 hours before hand.
I had the endoscopy under Sedation (which didn't fully work) however it didn't take them long to do it and the doctor and nurses were amazing and really put me at ease. To be honest I was just glad when it was all over, however my results were ALL CLEAR! No ulcer and from what he said my stomach all looked fine!
Well in a way it was lovely to hear however what is this pain I have been getting! So as you can imagine I am no further forward really, my stomach is still extremely tender I feel sick all of the time, I have a lump in my throat I am eating and drinking all the right things (as far as im concerned) I have had the all clear on all tests so far WHAT DO I DO ?
The consultant didn't have time to see me after the endoscopy, so now im booked in to see him on Monday 25/11 yes another two weeks away I am pinning so much on this apt, I can't surely live with this pain for the rest of my life, I don't want to go out or do anything its a struggle to come to work and I am just sick of not feeling well.
The one thing that I have changed in my life since xmas is I started taking Asda's own A-Z Vitamins and Minerals, could I per allergic maybe? I stopped taking these on Thursday 07/11 however to date haven't noticed a difference in how I feel, how long should I leave it for to see if it is them?
I know, I thought the exact thing, how can I have so much pain yet nothing be there? As I say the consultant didn't see me after like he was meant to and I have an apt with him Monday week, however I would of thought he would of told me something after the endoscopy?
I haven't lost or gained any weight I am exactly the same, as much as I feel sick I have been eating regularly (I am a creature of habbit anyway!)
Well I went privately and when the I saw the consultant he said that I would have the endoscopy (by him) and then he would see me afterwards to tell me what he saw... however on the day the apt before me over over ran so I think that's why he had to shoot off hence why he booked me in to see him Monday week.
I'm not sure what is going on with you, but a few years ago I had unexplained gastritis that the doctors did not take seriously. Everything I ate caused nausea than diarrhea. I was losing a lot of weight and since I am already naturally underweight, I didn't have much to spare. I finally was prescribed marinol, which helped with keeping food down, but if I didnt take it the symptoms returned.. I eventually completely modified my diet and did a yeast cleanse (no sugar (grains) and certain yeast friendly foods) for 2 weeks. Then I went on the Paleo diet. My symptoms disappeared.. I don’t know if this works for you.. but it sounds like you’ve tried a lot of the harder stuff already.
Thank you for writing, How long did your gastritis go on for in total? Luckily I haven't been sick as yet even though I feel on the edge of being sick all the time, however I do get a constant upset stomach.
I am finding that since I have been eating every two hours (little and often) it has helped, however I still get upset stomach in the mornings and every early evening, strange as its generally always the same sort of time and mixing up what I eat doesnt' seem to change that either.
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
I stayed on the Paleo diet for 6 months. I had to stop because I got married, and my husband was not as supportive of my diet. It became too hard to continue it when the other person in the house continued questioning its effectiveness. I really believed that it helped though and always recommend it to anyone with stomach problems. When I stopped doing it, I was okay for about 4 months, then the symptoms started to come back.I struggle with gastritis occasionally now... So that would be 3 years now.. but of those three years I spent 18 months of it pregnant and 6 months of it on the diet. I did not have the symptoms when I was pregnant.
My wife has twice had a similar problem to you. First time she was admitted to hospital and like you had all the tests. Nothing found t account for the pain. I suggested that she take Aloe Vera and after a few weeks it worked. When she had a follow up appointment the consultant was non committal about her remedy.
Three years ago my wife had the same symptoms again and went through the same tests plus a CT scan. Again nothing was found. She has been taking Aloe Vera every day since. She has stopped it a few times when on holiday etc but has been glad to get back on to it so now takes capsules away with her.
Just to give an update on me, since last writing I received confirmation from my consultant that the Endoscopy results were all clear, I since had blood tests testing me for pretty much everything which came back all clear, toilet sample tests all clear, and a colonoscopy which 4 biopsy's were taken again ALL CLEAR! My consultant didn't want to put me in for a CT scan as he is confident with the tests that he has done (he said if it gets worse that would be next but to go away and see how I get on)
I will have to look into Aloe Vera Capsules, out of interest, what was your reasoning to suggest for her to take the Aloe Vera Capsules? I wonder what is in them that is helping her stomach?
I have to be a little careful regarding spicy food still however I am trying to have it now and again just so my stomach gets used to it.
Hi I'm from the US .. I'm dealing with the sane things now ... Nothing worked ... Was taking Prilosec I mean everything lol.. The doc said I might she. Pylori so they put me on antibiotics that I hate. Just waiting on another endoscopy. I'm also waiting for my stool test. I keep hearing ppl say to try Bragg's apple cider vinegar. I put a capful in my water and felt better. Aloe Vera did help me in the past but I think I need to try another brand. I cut out eating everything. I can only tolerate chicken mainly now. I hope we do get better. The stress is killing me. I feel your pain Jenny... I hope they find a cure soon
Since last writing I feel like I am getting somewhere (well my stomach isn't a daily nightmare, at the moment anyway), as I said I am still taking the Acidophilus Plus capsules which I think are my savour! Since taking these it seems to of made a massive impact on my stomach, In 5 1/2 weeks I have just had 3 flare ups! which is amazing compared to having it daily for 3 1/2 MONTHS!
Last week (due to the flare ups I had again - which all happened in the same week) I decided to go to a nutritionist and have a food allergy test done. It didn't show that I had any sever food allergies however there was about 8 things that showed up that ""stressed"" my digestive system if eaten, so now I have changed my diet again so I only have those items in small amounts on occasion. I hope this is the cure!
Very interesting and definately sounds like a posibility as all my sypthoms are listed! i will mention to my stomach specialist when I next see him.
I am curious to find out what food you are avoiding. I have had the EXACT same symptoms. 2 years ago, I went to my doctor, and she suggested that I may have an intolerance to gluten. She suggested I remove all gluten from my diet, and take probiotics. I did that, and felt so much better after 10 days. I still have flare-ups now and then, and have been wondering if I have an intolerance to other foods as well. So far, I think it may be nuts, egg yolks, brocolli, and aspartame. This week, I have had severe flare-ups, and have become very nervous in what I can eat. I am wondering if I also have an intolerance to dairy products.
I went to see my doctor (unfortunately not the same one that recommended going gluten-free) and she has ordered an ultrasound for tomorrow. She thinks it is my appendix. My 'gut' feeling is that she is wrong, and do not want to go through a bunch of tests.
I have the same thing. We have an over the counter medicine called mylanta and I drink that all the time all it is is an antacid it helps sort of.
I have been in and out of doctors also blood test ultrasound x rays all come up perfectly fine.
But I'm kind of at a standstill I don't know what to do stage of the game also
I do have known food allergies
I'm allergic to nuts berries sulfites nitrates nitrites processed meats of any kind
I should add my particular symptoms get better with food
If I don't eat is when it actually hurts but I get very very cold
I feel my best first thing in the morning I usually start to feel sick 2 o'clock in the afternoon not really sure what significant about that time 2 o'clock in the afternoon is when everything rears its ugly head
The one I went to was done by holding a silver tube in one hand and then on my other hand the lady put on and off a silver point to the tip of my finger, not sure if it pierced the skin or not if im honest, but the computer took readings from it.
in Nov of 2009 i had a Nissen fundoplication, its a surgery where they wrap the top of my esophagus with a mesh to keep stomach acids from splashing up and causing extreme pain. it reduced my pain dramatically for about 2 years, and in 2011 the pain came back, i was checked for another hernia, ulcers, h pylori, celiacs disease, and many others. all results came back negative. I began just to live with the pain as a part of day to day life. about 4 months ago it got so bad that i had completely stopped eating and if i did eat i became very sick and dizzy. i again went to the doctor had much of the same tests done and again no results that would indicate a reason why it hurts. I have quit smoking, drinking alcohol and soda pop, spicy foods are unfortunately no longer a part of my life, and i am now no longer able to bend over and pick things up as it causes stomach pain. reading through your messages it sounds very similar to where i am at as well. Aloe Vera seems to help somewhat, however there is one thing i have tried that assists with helping subdue the pain so that i can eat, and that is the ingestion of cannabis.
Now i no this is always a sensitive topic, and is still illegal in most states in the US to include the state that i live in. but there is some medical research done into the effects of cannabis on stomach pain such as what i have and seemingly what you have as well. ""smoking"" of it DOES NOT HELP ME, in fact it almost makes it worse at times, however my mother lives in a state where it is legal to use for medical purposes, and i have been ingesting it for roughly a month and have been able to eat and maintain my lifestyle. I thought that i would share this with you as it seems like you have exhausted many resources and although its not the most ""professional and desirable"" way of treating this, it is working for me. I Hope that this helps you out.
Hi. I was wondering if I could have some Help with the same problem. I'm 17 years old and usually a very healthy girl. With no problems what so ever. Nearly 3 weeks ago, on a Thursday. I got up and did my usual routine, things that I would usually do and went out for food with my friends that night. I went to bed completely fine that night with no problems. at 2am the next morning I was woken up with unreal
Very good idea also, I just recently received my medicinal marijuana card back in April 2014.my girlfriend said that there's capsules for gastro problems. And she wants to get them and have her mom try themso of course the s bother thingsame idea popped into my head also.today being the third daythat I'm in so much pain I'm ready to go back to the ER like I did years ago when I found out my diagnosis as really bad acute gastritis.
although I don't see that happening considering my shoulder is dilapidated,/ing now effecting my elbow! It just hurts so bad knowing that I spent years for 8 hours a day to train my body to do things normal people cant do, to get hit by a car,find out I have degenerative disc disease among MANY OTHER THINGS.I Also had Kawasaki disease as a child and because it's such a rare disease I figured maybe they should have followed me my whole life to see how it effects you 30 years later.I wish much luck to all of youmany prayers and much love God bless Sincerely
I wish my doctors at my pain clinic would use the same common sense.all they do is mask the real problems, shots on my knees shots on my shoulders shots in my elbowsback procedures rhyzotomy they go in and burn off 13 pinched nerve give me a walking epidural gram and do a facet joint block,they did the same thing to my neck twice it didn't work so now they did the rhyzotomy on my neck w 4 herniated disc and one bulging herniated discs.I just recently received my medicine medical marijuana card back in AprilI went to a dr and got his approval for chronic painso I haven't tried much but the hash seems to work out and I know they have stomach pills also in little capsules that I might try also!
I am also having gastritis.its been a year.. Really tired of the dull pain in upper abdomen and medicines also not working. Had done endoscopy also.. Really worried, what is happening with me : (
Unfortunately I am know further forward. Still get the same syptoms swollen upper stomach and bad upset stomach regularly, not every day like it was however guaranteed minimum once a week I really don't know what is causing it as is the same whatever I eat, if I am stressed or not!
The only thing I can think may be causing it is run down/tiredness ? Which I am all the time! lol
Thank you so much for your post, unfortunately as much as I wish i had I have not yet got round to trying Yoga, however I am extremely keen still to do so!
Unfotunately I lead a very hectic lifestyle and am finding it difficult to fit anything else in, however new years resolution is to start
I am from the United states and like you have been experiencing the same exact thing as you. Spent alot of time in and out of doctors and emergency rooms only to find out that nobody knows what was wrong with me. I finally found a doctor in my town who is also a younger one and he told me it was caused by anxiety. He ended up putting me on an anti depressant which eventually stopped the pain
I have nearly all the same symptoms as you except I use to just feel like getting sick all the time where now I do. At first they thought it was ulsers then H pylori but they haven't got a clue really my stomach pains are starting to get out of hand now and all the tests are coming back clear any advise .?
It's amazing that stomachs can behave like this with no known cause. It's my story, too, so my heart goes out to those who suffer with like issues. I've had gobs of tests, endoscopies, CTs, blood tests, etc etc. My doctor cannot tell me why my stomach hurts at the very top, sometimes burns, sometimes a dull ache. This time it has been ongoing, not constant (comes and goes) for 16 months. More frequent and small meals help. I do have a reflux problem and IBS. I have been taking Nexium for years but try to take it only 3 times a week instead of every day. I also use Kefir at least several times a week. Still, I wish I knew what causes this. One of my docs told me a lot of people have this problem and no cause is discovered. Frustrating at best.
I am at my wits end as well, such a mystery and I wish I could find some answers. With me, my pain comes in cycles/flares, I can have a constant pain which is achey/twinges in the upper central abdomen, about 2 inches above my belly button. My pain will last anywhere from a few weeks to a few months, then magically disappears, this is why I call it flares. Have had all the tests a few years back. Ultrasound, endoscopy, colonoscopy, tested for celiac etc... My pain is constant, it does very in intensity through the day, but it's always there, smack dab in the middle of my upper abdomen. Nothing I eat makes it worse or better, bowels are soft than hard, so i was told it's ibs. But why would ibs come and go like this? I can sometimes go months and be fine, but when it does happen, I have it for weeks/months and it is relentless. The only thing my ultrasound ever showed was a fatty liver (which I have been told is not the source of my pain) and if even I did think it was this, my pain is central, not to the right (where your liver is) My endocopy a few years back only showed mild inflammation, could these be gastritis attacks? Any info/input would be greatly appreciated...thanks
I had your symptoms years ago and it took 2.1/2 years for doctors to tell me I had Mucous Colitis! I was put on three different drugs which did help but never put it away. I changed my life style/diet and that helped. I came off the medication because of the worry of all the dude affects! I was then tested positive for H-Pylori and was put on triple therapy antibiotics and felt better. But have gone on vicious cycle of infections v antibiotics and lots of inflammation!
Hi Pam, i can relate to your Flares as thats exactly what i have. I had an attack 3 weeks ago and all my stomach felt on fire and swollen, it was excruciating. My doctors said my stomach felt swollen as i told her i thought the swelling was affecting my bladder as i could feel pressure on it making me need to wee more often. I too was told i had a small patch of inflammation after an endoscopy, also a small hiatus hernia. I am really scared of it becoming a regular thing as i am worried what damage it can do to my stomach. Ihave had 2 ultrasounds this year and also told i have slightly fatty liver. Hope someone can come up with a way to help us all cure this painful condition.
All I can say is that reading all of these has been a HUGE releif for me. I have been dealing with the same symptoms discussed on this board for close to 4 years now. Utrasound, endoscopy, cat scans all check out normal. I have seen 4 doctors, digestion specialists. Everyone says ""there is nothing wrong with you."" I questions if it could be anxiety related, but have been told it is not (even though is causes it) The last thing I was told was thast I must have gotten a bacterial infection that still lingers. I have been on pro-biotics and am currently taking panterprozale for stomach acid and slight inlfmation in my esophagus. I have vowed to find a ""cure"" for myself. Andi, I will. Knowing that you all are out there helps me know I am not in this alone. Anything I find, I will share. I have tried to describe it to other people, but they simpy cannot understand what it is to live with this day in and day out. It is constantly on my mind and I am sure all of yours. If anyone has heard of any new remedies please share.
Thank you all so much for the information. I'm about 6 months into this problem, but I get severe pain in the middle of my chest too. My stomach hurts all the time and sometimes it's so bad I'm close to doubling over. I'm also nauseaus all the time, but don't vomit. The pain in my chest gets that bad too and will hurt into my back. Most times I feel hungry even after I've eaten a full meal, so I will try to eat something mild thinking it will help and then I'm really full and feel worse than when I started.
Hi great to find this.my symptoms started suddenly on my birthday
It looks like I'm in the same boat. About 3 years ago I began having stomach aches, dull pain in my stomach, like someone put a brick in there for fun. After about 2 weeks of constant pain I went through all the usual tests, from blood, scans, endo/colonoscopy, h-pylori, etc etc.
3 months later, Docs said it was stress related and IBS was main diagnosis. I didn't lose weight, or had bathroom problems.
I thought I was truly doomed, then one day it went away like magic, literally magic. Haven't had the pain since until last week after a spicy meal. I thought it was just the food, but I'm a week in and quite honestly terrified. I don't know if I can go through another few months of this day in and day out.
good luck. I would like to know what you're told. I have been having the same symptoms for 4 years. All tests show nothing, thankfully. Been on pantaprozol for a year. Trying to come off now. Need to find the source not just cover it up.
yes, I've had them both, not on this occasion as I'm only a week and 1 day into the pain again, and the thought of doing them again is not pleasant to be honest!
I have been suffering with severe pain and diarrhea for years now. 2 weeks ago I was hospitalized and did all the tests (colonoscopy, endoscopy, ultra sound, Xray, CT scan, MRI, stool and blood testing for bugs) EVERYTHING CAME OUT FINE. I am so frustrated as I am a college student trying to do well in school and being woken up by intense pain. I tried going paleo, now I'm just dairy free, they put me on anti biotics but I'm going to stop them because truthfully at this point I have little faith in western ""classic"" treatments and feel as if the answer lies in something more homeopathic. Have you had any luck? Thank you. This is such a struggle and so so frustrating.
I had to give up tea coffee fruit juices all I drink is boiled water and I had to stay away from sugar all I eat is salmon with all purpose seasoning in over with boiled rice salad tuna steak
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
thank you so much for your message, very interesting and could definitely be a possibility! I had an ultrasound of my organs but nothing came up however maybe they wasn't thorough around my uterus?
I am due to go to the doctors for a smear over the next could of weeks so will speak to the nurse then.
I had stomach pain, bloating , nausea and really bad periods. The pain would vary from really bad to just like cramps. My last fibroid got so big it was affecting my kidney. I had trouble going to the bathroom because it go so big. Small fibroids can just make you uncomfortable. There are two types of ultrasounds, the first is one where they put the gel on you and move it around over your uterus. The other is that they put wand with a camera in side of your uterus and see if there is any fibroids and the location of them. I hope this helps
Thanks Amy, the only symptom that I don't have is really bad periods however the others are the same.
Last year (6 months ago) I was diagnosed with CIN 3 cervical cells which I had to have removed I wonder if it could all be linked maybe....
My symptoms have been exactly like yours but over a few years. More frequent now but all clear everywhere like you. I am having ct scan for closer look at upper abdomen and pancreas now. Did you take a few supplements each day or any other meds we could have in common that could cause it? What does the aloe Vera do? Do you get upper abdominal pain in middle of night?
Hey I'm from Canada and iv been experiencing the exact same problems for the past 3years! Everyday is a struggle constant nausea, direahha, constipation, major stomach aches, feeling like total crap. Iv had so many tests run on me and everything cams back negative which is so frustrating cause there's gotta be a reason as to why many of us feel this way. When I was pregnant with my daughter all the problems had gone even for 2 months after she was born I thought it had finally gone away but I was wrong it came back full throttle! Hope someone figures this out soon
Hi everyone! I have similar symptoms for about 6 yrs now. I've been in and out of hospitals trying to figure out what's wrong, my last visit was last week and I was in the hospital for 2 days. I had an ultrasound, and tons of blood tests and a stool sample test. They wanted to do an endoscopy but they decided it wasn't the best time since I'm 27 weeks pregnant. Blood work came out great and I'm still waiting to hear on the stool sample plus a separate blood test to check for an auto immune disease. My pain starts below the rib cage and extends to my right backside. The ultrasound came back normal. Gallbladder, lived, and pancreas looked fine but I'm still having this extreme pain. They think it could be a number of things...possibly microscopic gallstones, possibly an auto immune disease, possibly celiac disease, or even the pancreas but can only be sure until I have that endoscopy. I'm due in June so I can't wait! I also wanted to mention that the only thing that seems to take the pain away for small amounts of time is a heating pad. They prescribed me Zantac 150 mg and some lidocaine patches which haven't helped. I just want answers and soon.
I am having similar symptoms as well.
I also have been having stomach pains. I've been to hospital 3 different times. And everything cam back normal. It doesn't make since to me to be in so much pain and it be nothing. I have pains all throughout my stomach.. My sides, and my back. Even a little lower then my stomach. Some pains are sharp, shooting, radiating, cramping. Right now I'm having pains in my right ribs. And lower back. There were days I would feel like something is in my throat, and some nausea. The pains are getting more consistent. I have not gone to the doctor yet, but as bad as it is getting guess I will have to soon. What kind of dr. Should I even go to? My primary doctor, my ob? After reading everyone's posts, I'm thinking of looking into the aloe Vera capsules or some probiotics. Bt I need something!! And what pain medicine should I take? Advil, Tylenol, alieve? I need help!!
I pray by now you have found relief from your GI symptoms. For many years, I also have suffered with all kinds of persistant abdominal pain and discomfort. Three different doctors, Gastroenterologist, could not come up with anything more than IBS (Irritated Bowel Syndrom). If you have not been able to find the etiology of your pain, you might try getting off all dairy products. A drug named Bentyl helps with my cramps along with a heating pad.
have you had your CT Scan Yet? I went back to the doctors last week absolutely useless! The doctor I saw said ""you have ibs"" and prescribed me laxatives! (I do not need laxitives to say the least!) anyway, I went to my chemist (he is fantastic I would say better than I doctor) He said ""don't take this prescription - yes it is a laxitve and I don't think you have ibs!"" he said to go to the supermarket and buy ""ONKEN NATURAL YOGURT"" and take a tablespoon morning, lunch and night, basically this has live good bacteria in (acidiphilu in particular which is what I have been taking in tablet form) he said the live yogurt is better and the tablets are processed ect.
So I have been doing just that for just under a week now, only time will tell, my chemist thinks that its an imbalance of bacteria in my stomach which is causing this and by having this yogurt after time it should even itself out again and become normal! I have stopped my Acidiphilus tablets and just having the yogurt.... only time will tell.
Meanwhile one good thing about going to the doctors, I asked to be referred to see the stomach specialist again, so I am now booked in to see my specialist end of April (nhs is a waiting game) so hopefully he will refer me for a CT scan as that was what he said last time!
I haven't tried the aloe vera yet, im going to see how I get on with the yogurt and take it from there.
Anyway my wife has been taking it for about 19 years and is still here to tell the tale.
Very interesting! sounds like im going through what she did!
Well I will see how I get on when I see the consultant / CT Scan (if he still agrees I need this) if that's all clear and there is another silence I will definitely try the aloe vera!
For years because of not being good at getting up in the morning my breakfast consisted of two ginger biscuits and a cup of tea. I ate several apples a day as our house at that time had been built on the site of an orchard.
Recently, I’ve had two incidences of positive feedback (yes - it’s amazing!) regarding treatment advice I gave for nausea. In both cases, I had advised eating a humble ginger biscuit and in both cases the feedback was it worked surprisingly well. One patient was shocked that a young-ish doctor like myself would suggest ginger over a prescribed anti-emetic. From personal experience of being on a boat pre- scuba diving, ginger was a great cure for my sea-sickness.
Had ct scan back. All clear but they are saying probably pancreatitis as had that 13 years ago for a year. No ssymptoms of this at all though. I have got cysts on one kidney but they mean nothing. Now they are looking to see if maybe some kind of bowel issue slthough i have no symotoms there at all! Basically no idea still
Thanks Jenny for sharing your story here. I am Aman Chopra from India and i have very similar symptoms as you have. I have this stomach ache since Sep 2013. All test including CT Scan, Endoscopy, Colonoscopy are done but all reports suggest i am fine.
Doctors have diagnosed it with IBS and i am not sure it's helping me either. I am going to try Aloe Vera Supplements as suggested above or Acidophilus tablets to check if it works for me. Keep sharing!
Hi, Jenny, my husband has had the same symptoms for over a year. We went to Domnican Republic and many of our group were ill with sickness diarroheah. My husband wasn't ill at the time but got ill when we got home. He was diagnosed with h pylori and took two courses of the three treatments (2 antibiotics and one gastro medicine). He didn't get any better and now having had two endoscopies, a colonoscopy, a CT scan, including putting dye into his body, two ultrasound scans, numerous blood tests, stool samples etc everything is coming back clear. He too was given laxatives despite not being constipated. He was told by one doctor that it was probably (!) IBS but he has none of the usual IBS symptoms. At the last appointment he was given a further blood test to look for coealic disease. We are due back to see consultant on 24 April. I (we) are almost positive it is not coealiac as he is not sick, does not have diarrohea. His symptoms are constant nausea coupled with stomach pain and the feeling of being stabbed between shoulder blades.
Had the same thing was put on omeprazole 20mg after2 weeks ok now just flares up when stressed , so I take them when needed only for few weeks untill feeling better , endoscopy last time showed inflammation gastritis first 2 endoscopy showed nothing , because the omeprazole had cleared it up before I had them , I know how depressing it can be , been on going on and off for last 15 yrs
Hi Maria, I see that your post is very old but I have to try at least. My mom has been suffering from the same symptoms as your husband. An excruciating pain in her stomach or pancreatic area, she has gone through all the tests - endoscopie, a colonoscopy, a CT scan, two ultrasound scans, numerous blood tests, stool samples etc and everything comes out good. Based on her results she should be the healthiest person on Earth but she's in so much pain anytime she eats anything or drinks anything. Now she's basically not eating to prevent the pain, but she's loosing tons of weight and we are worried how much longer can she live like this. I see you wrote that some doctor said that there is some part of a stomach that is hard to see from any kind of test . Have you had any luck figuring out what was the problem with your husband? I really hope that you have already figured it out and that your husband is feeling better now. Please let me know if you have any update or any information that could help us. Thank you! Martina
Hi, how is your Mother doing now? She sounds just like me. I went 3 weeks without eating due to fear of the pain. Then I eased back into eating for 1 week, now I'm back in the same pain. I have appt with gastro dr this week, am praying for answers.
I found your story interesting as I have a similar problem in the past 6 YEARS
It all started in 2008 when I was diagnosed with pancreatitis.
After a couple of days of hospitalisation and diet I was free to go home however I had to go back for blood tests to check if my pancreas is all good
The blood test came back, pancreas is good but my thrombocyts (red blood cells) are waaaay to low (Normally you'd have 250 000, I had 30 000) which is causing bleeding. Everywhere. Anytime. Internal as well. So I was hospitalised again, for weeks.
I had a blood condition which I was prescribed STEROIDS for.. (Medrol).
In the hospital all they said to me was: ""Be careful with the steroids, the can cause you stomach pain""... Well, appareantly I wasn't careful enough because I've been living with this unexplainable pain in the past 6 YEARS!!!!!
I was told that your body needs about 5 years to get rid of the traces of steroids which was last year and nothing happened....
I was taking probiotics and different tablets for stomach care but nothing worked.
I've been trying to find out what causes the pain for 5-6 years now, with no success
So I usually associate the pain with hunger.... If i eat, it gets better, if not, it just gets worse
I've done all sorts of tests, tried gastroscopy, tablets, vitamins and nothing seemed to ease my pain.
When I had my tests done, the doctor came to me saying that the good news is that everything is fine, and the bad news is that everything is fine... So it's very good that there are no visible symptoms of some serious condition, but it doesn't help me and I can't have a good quality of life at the age of 24.
I always have to make sure I've got some snacks in my bag otherwise I panic and become agitated again.
I can't really lose weight, but I can gain kilos very quickly and easily..
It's hard to explain to my mind for example that I'm not hungry and I do not need those carbs, but my body tells me otherwise and in order to keep my body happy and to be able to work, I have to give my body what it ""needs"" otherwise i can't function...
I've tried to settle my stomach pain with fruits, nuts, good fats and healthy stuff but I've got a feeling that I'm now addicted to carbohydrates and if I don't have it, the pain will kill me.........it's a vicious circle, because I need to stop eating so much carbs for the pain the go away, but if I don't have it I feel hungry ALL THE TIME.
"Hi, Just looking for some reassurance/support. I was on mirtazapine for about 6months. I went up to 45mg and decided to taper down as I felt they were making me worse and the weight gain was nasty. I felt fab tapering down and generally, its been better than I anticipated however, I'm approaching the 3rd week off of mirtazapine and have started to feel a bit anxious the last few days. I've read withdrawal peaks around the 3/4week mark, so I'm trying to stay positive that it will pass.
I was on Mirtazapine for over 2 years, 30mg.
I have been off the medicine since almost three months now, and still suffer some withdrawal issues.
I also take some Omega 3 supplements.
"Hey....just wanted to know what you think withdrawal would be like for a person (me) if he was on 15mg mirtazipine for about a year?
"Was on mirt at 15mg for 3/4 months, tapered off by going 7.5 for 2 weeks, 3.5 for ten days. 18 days off it now, and fine. I mean we are some of us, put on mirt for anxiety, so when coming off it, can't always attribute the withdrawal to the mirt, it could be of course, but to be fair, most of us on this sort of thing coz we are anxious and suffer from anxiety! That's just the way we are
"I agree about the anxiety and the insomnia, I would almost expect that to come back. I didnt however have vomiting diarrhea panic attacks three urinary infections with in four weeks internal trembling night sweats and being extremely cold when the when it was warm in the room. Some people get withdrawls some get some and some get none. If it was just my anxiety and insomnia back...I'd be ok with it, but if you get severe withdrawals from mirt, your gonna be sick for three months and it ain't pretty. That's not even the full list ...muscle and joint pain...hmmm..yeah right...never had a problem with that, cause that's not the way I am. I was spared the migraines ...not sure how or why.
"I know it's been quite some time since you originally posted but thought to put my status out there because your experience sounds very much what i am going through now. i was put on 45mg years ago. i had no problems but my doctor thought to take it down to 30mg. that was june and these last few months have been horrible. night sweats so bad i have to change clothes in the middle of the night. zero appetite, nearly puke trying to eat most times. ensure the liquid nutrition supplement has kept me going on the worst days. sleep is terrible, exhausted always. i had my colon removed, not related, but i have sm bowel cramps, stomach pain. during the day my body temp, how it feels, can go from ice cold to hot flash for no reason other than this. anxiety through the roof at times. very shaky, weak, inability to concentrate, trouble communicating with others, good God how could any physcian put us on these meds knowing what it is like to stop? nobody ever warned me?
my withdrawal from tapering 45mg to 30mg has been like this nearly four months. are you or anyone reading this able to give me a bit of hope? or should i just throw in the towel and go back to 45mg for life? i just can't imagine going through this for much longer. Thanks and i do hope your situation turned out for the best.
There is hope. I've gone from 45mg to 15mg.
I'm struggling a bit to ditch them altogether but to be honest my gp is loath to stop them altogether as she believes they help my sleep.
I dropped my dose pretty quickly but that didn't work out so well for me so I went from 45 to 40 then 35 & so on until I got to 15mg. Do each drop over 3-4 weeks.
I had night sweats & stomach cramps but they have stopped now.
I'm going to drop to 7.5mg shortly & then after about a month try taking 7.5mg every other day and so on until I can finally get off this awful drug.
I've found taking magnesium supplements helps at night with leg cramps etc.
"Hello Mike, I can't imagine being on 45mg!!! I have been taking Klonopin - 4 four or five years - & cut that down in Sept. 2017. My GP put me on only 7.5mg Sept 16 this year. The ""side effects"" didn't set in until about a month ago. AND I HAVE EVERY SIDE EFFECT EXCEPTING CONSTIPATION!!!
SO - I started going OFF Mirtazapine one week ago 11/15/16 - taking only
half a pill every night. I feel EVEN WORSE EVERY DAY NOW. My body
aches everywhere (like flu ache) and I want to sleep 18 hours a day!!! You did not mention your age - I am 80 next month - and perhaps my age is
just less accepting of any drug but I advise every patient to TALK ABOUT ALL THE EFFECTS/SIDE EFFECTS WITH YOUR PHYSICIAN. I relate to you saying....why would any Dr prescribe this drug? My depression is supposed to get better after gaining 13 lbs and feeling like Hell?
"Hi I am new on here and just thought I would let you know that I have just come off mirtazapine from 30mg down to 15mg a few weeks ago and 15mg every other night for 4 nights now nothing for the last 3days ,apart from really awful nightmares and feeling a bit anxious ,and today having no energy so far so good .I am 65 and been on them a few years but started getting palpitations so doc said to drop to 15mg as they are more sedative. So I thought I would share this with you oh also doc gave me a few diazapam to help with anxiety that you get for a little while when your coming off mirtazapine .so I wish you well you can do it x
"i was left on Mirtazapine for more than 8 years without any support or check ups. I recently decided to stop as the Mirtazapine eventually gave me really bad psoriasis and other side effects. I reduced the dose over half a year and have been off them about 2 weeks now with only minor side effects .it can be done so dont give up people.
"Hi Mark , I'm the same but been on 45mg mirtizapine for over 9 years and looking to come off soon but scared really as reading all the horror stories on here but my gp reckons they are one of the easier antidepressants to come off .
"Hi Shaun, dont worry to much. ive just come off 45mg. i tapered down to 35mg on the first night, couldnt sleep so took it. second night did it again but came down to 35mg, third night 35mg, fourth night 22.5mg, fifth night 10mg, then had a difficult night on 6th night, so stuck to 10 mg. 7th night onwards totally off it with no side effects at all. been 10 days now off it and i feel fine.
"If you look Me up on Facebook my name is Craig short and live in the U.K., then I can add you
"Hi Shaun. im good. no problems. still on olanzapine 5mg though. i think thats why im okay
I've been on Mirt for 7 years and the doc got me to go cold turkey 4 weeks ago. He started me on another anti depressant straight away as well.
It's not been pretty but last week was the worst ( I Hope)
I only found this forum yesterday and didn't realize it was the Mirt withdrawal cause my symptoms and was blaming the new meds. Although I think some of it is the new meds as well.
It's all so frustrating and worrying to feel like this and the Doc never once mentioned withdrawals or anything. The chemist questioned him but he told them he'd researched it and knew what he was doing.
The reason I was put on Mirt was because my last anti depressant had given me an ulsa and Mirt is the kindest one for your stomach.
My stomach is now burning even though I'm on meds to stop it. Worried now that this new med will do the same and I'll have to change again. Augh!!!!
I was taking 7.5 mg mirtzapine for
6 months and then stopped as I was feeling I am not getting cured now it's almost 5/ weeks as still getting internal shaking and panic attacks when I am out . Seems imbalance . Vomiting sensation is not there now but body itching is there. CAn you tell when your panic attacks or internal shaking stopped ? Wbatu done
"Hi Denis not sure if you'll see this as it's 3 months on but il try anyway. I'm tapering from 15mg to 7.5 and having huge problems, can you remember anything your doctor said about why not to taper from 15 as I'm desperate and don't know what to do? Thank you it'd be a big help
"i am one week tapering 15 to 7.5 and having horrendous time.vomiting,diarrhea high temp. Cant face even water. What can i do my heart rate is 120
I was wondering if you could help me. I been on Escitalopram Oxalate 10 mg for over 4 year now and I been having very bad stomach pains for the past 4 months and been in and out of the doctor office and hopstial over 10 times and no one knows what is wrong with me. Turns out i had colon infection and had to go to a GI Specialist to find out,. Well at first the doctor told me I had depression and put me on Mirtazapine 30 mg and Venlafaxine 75 mg and i took it for over 2 months, He Switched me to those without weaning me off the Escitalopram! Which i read you suppose to be at least 4 weeks weaning yourself off to switch. well i started having financial problems to where i couldn't afford the Mirtazapine 30 mg because my medicade was droped. So I stop taken that and cant afford to go to the doctor, but now I cant sleep, but now last few months have been horrible. I also have night sweats so bad i have to change clothes in the middle of the night. zero appetite, nearly puke trying to eat most times, When i was on it, i ate ate ate, i use to weigh 98 pounds, now i only weight 92. sleep is terrible, exhausted always. I have sm bowel cramps, stomach pain. during the day my body temp is crazy, I can go from ice cold to hot flash for no reason, sweat pores from me and im not even hot but i can have my hand a few inches away from my face and feel the heat. It like i have a fever but dont. very shaky, weak, inability to concentrate, trouble communicating with others. migraines all day and everything pss me off so bad, head feels numb and pressure, ears and eyes are killing me, the lights are terrible!. If you found a way to help me pls let me know. I need to know how you cover came this.
"Hi Mike, I've been on Mirtrazapine 45mg for just over 3months now and the side affects that I'm going through are horrendous.
Severe pain in my gallbladder but the worst so far is the weight gain, in the 3 months that I've been taking these pills I've put on nearly 4 stone!!!!,
I'm going to see my Dr on Monday and ask to be taken off them, if I had known the side affects of Mirtrazapine I would never of went on.
They have helpt with the insomnia and depression but the cons weigh out the pros.
I'll really worrying about the withdrawal symptoms and the effect that this will have on my family
I stopped taking it a week ago, I've had the worst nausea. I was taking it for four months and gained 34lbs in the first four weeks. Then gained 20 more until I stopped it. I have never been over weight. I want to sue my doctor for giving me this horrible meds. Granted they made me sleep but I would rather not sleep then be overweight.
"Hi I wanted to coming off mirt because all it did was make me like a zombie and nothing else. I contacted my surgery and was advised take the last 15mg mirt Sunday nothing the next day then start 10mg Citalopram That was two weeks ago I am in a living hell wake at 5am immediately my inside are doing cartwheels, can't think straight ,wrenching ,diarrhoea,they have given me 2mg diazepam but have double it to 4mg three times a day.I agree with you I wish I had been advised of the possible side effect when trying to come off these demons
I had to do a swap from 30mg Mirt to 20mg Escitalopram the next day...I took 10mg as the effects were terrible...never again..I will do a slow taper next time..
I had to use Diaz to get through it too and am now trying to wean off that without upsetting my body again..easier this way.
"I am getting off mirtazapine. Do you think escitalopram is any better, do you feel it is working? I am weighing up my options as i am feeling very down and anxiety still there
I find Escitalopram totally different..to anything I've been on before.
I have terrible anxiety and panic attacks so have to stay on something. Would be lovely to not have to take something..
Escitalopram seems to block or stop the worrying and thoughts like I am really claustrophobic and this has settled also...it is suppose to to very good for OCD etc which I can imagine it would be. It also doesn't put on weight..a huge thing for me..
I do find I have trouble remembering things and have taken ages to get the brain fog to disappear...unfortunately, it could partly be due to the Mirt withdrawals..you would never know.
I would certainly try it. You will never know if you don't and most seem to love it. Just start on a low dose first. It is better than living in constant anxiety..an awefully way to live hey.
I seen your post. You have successfully taken down mirtazapine. Do you have insommia problem. I am having insommia and am on 7.5 mg mirtazapine per night. I wonder this medicine can really help insommia. Having some side effect now. Please advise. Thanks
I went cold turkey and couldn't sleep for days. Got zzquil and that helped. Now I'm like a month off and I sleep on my own most of the nights!
Been off Mirt since May 5. Unfortunately, now feel terrible, and at my lowest ebb. I've already posted symptoms, which haven't changed, just a million times worse.
I'm going back to Doc this week to ask for further assessment by neurologist. For record these are overwhelmingly physical and consist
Excruciating nerve pains-emanating from spine but then affecting arms and legs.
Unbearable muscular stiffness, weakness and exhaustion.
Eye fatigue and sensitivity to light.
I know we all react differently to withdrawal, and not certain whether this is withdrawal, original anxiety or new symptom precipitated by stopping Mirt?? However, would be good to tell Doc that canvassed others and these symptoms untypical etc.
I was on lamotragine keppra amytriptalyne and depakote for 6 years. I also dabbled in topomax cymbalta and numerous anti anxiety meds. The next 6 years I was on mirtazapine 45mg and lamotragine 100mg. I received the diagnosis of fatty liver and found an all natural remedy for my nerve pain... Coming off 12 years of heavy meds has been a nightmare version of mr. toads wild ride. I thought I was dying, I thought I was loosing my mind, I could not eat or sleep for weeks and was in the ER panicking with horrible symptoms. I'm starting week 3 of withdrawals and I've decided to take time off work until I recover. Lot of rest, lots of water, healthy diet and walks.
i am replying to you as, after two years on 7.5 couldnt get it higher, i want off. I have done what the books say, lower very slowly. 5mg for a month, now 3.75 for a couple of weeks and the situation is dire.
nausea - dr gave me pills for this
diaerhoea - have had it on and off during med
waking every 2 hours in anxiety
dr doesnt think these are result of lowering I know how bad i feel, never felt really well on it anyway, just all worse now.
dr did give me extra diazepam for discontinuation so must know anxiety will get worse
"wow youve tried almost as many of these meds as me over the years.
I ended up,on mirtaz for two plus years as itmgave me a sleep. Never really worked otherwise as i couldnt stand high dose, was only on 7.5. I am very sensitive to any meds.
coming down now i have got to 3.75 and want to drop again but the side effects are bad. I thought i was losing my mind woke one night with that. Taking lots of water, eating very little. Ache in ibs area nausea. How long will this last i wonder. Dont even feel like going out. Depression will hit if im not careful.
Sorry I can't offer any tips as it seems no matter what dose you try to come off results in endless nightmares..I was started on mirt last yr 15mg to 45mg over a period of 4 months felt worse on them, reduced dose overnight by my doc to 15mg (awful time) but no long short been on 15mg for a yr told my mental health team that I felt worse from I started taking these Meds, told 3wks ago to double up again to 30mg stuck that 3wks had to get in touch with mental health team again who has now told me to drop down to 15mg for 1wk then I have to change onto douslpin which I was before doc changed me to these....doc didn't tell me what a hell of a time I would have getting of these meds... I have felt unwell from I started mirt but I dread what the road ahead will be like for me as the WD from 30mg to 15mg has been awful.... reading lots of sites I have not saw anyone come of this med easy it's all been a nightmare ....yet doc says there is NO withdrawals.... wish my doc could feel how I'm feeling today !!!!
"Yes, same here. Am trying so hard to live with the withdrawal symptoms, its not easy, in the hope of a better day. My dr says withdrawals are hardly noticeable, maybe a bit of anxiety!! Whats ahead for me also i dont know, tried so many which didnt work.
Docs really make me so mad..im of for a weeks holiday tonight which to be honest i dread but its been booked from last so forcing myself to go.. i will drop down to 7.5mg next wk when i return home and dear only knows what will be ahead of me but the way im feeling now i really dont plan to switch to another tab anytime soon...What dose are you now taking ? are you feeling any better ?
"Im new to this forum, dont no how to work it propper or comment I have been on 45 dose and looking at all these im thinking why has the doctor put me on this!
Tryed coming off it and get muscle aches and pains and tingling and sorness in joins and feeling sick and panic and anxiety, looking at comments I must be mad going cold turkey!! Started a week ago then looked it up, should have done it other way round! But guess what I got from a health shop CBD oil, its legal in small doses in england apparently, so I stopped then took the oil, its good for anxiety, depression, nausea, pain, ms, adhd, cancer ect doctors are not allowed to suggest it for anything, I accidently came across it in a shop 20quid, its helped! I only started takeing a few drops 3 times a day then you work your way up, its up2 you if you want to try it, your not allowed to take other or sertain medication because it works like grapefruit, stops you body from absorbing it normal and medication I think build up in your body over time which is not good. I would take cbd over any medication, thc is not in there just the good oil.
Been taking 15 mg for 4 months. I started skipping doses to every other nite. I am armed with melatonin and benadryl. Am scared to taper to 7.5mg. I may just keep skipping doses. Seems its rough to taper down. Any thoughts? BTW gained 40lbs. since May. Hope you are doing well.
Saw your post about taper problems below 15mg. Been on 15mg only for 4 months. I started skipping doses. Do you think that is a good approach to get off of this vs. Tapering to 7.5mg? My Dr. isnt saying a whole lot. I armed myself with lots of melatonin and benadryl. Sure glad i checked this before I went all out cold turkey. Thanks so much. I hope you are well.
"Hi, i am going over as many posts as I can to see how people have fared getting off mirtazapine and onto something better for anxiety and depression. I think you have done this and would like if you could tell me your story so far, i am expecting a change when see psych next week as mirtaz isnt working and my anxiety is higher the lower i go. I just want a med which will make me feel,normal again, waking with anxiety is awful. Thank you.
"Interested in your post. Does cbd oil really work? I take diazepam and warfarin and i bet dr would say no. Where would i buy it, health food store?
"2 weeks @ 15mg of mirt every other nite....managable but miserable. Starting 15mg every 2 nites or every other other nite. Will post again
Hope this finds you well. I appreciate all the info. I am about 2 weeks into stopping mirt 15mg. Im down to 7.5mg everyother nite. So far...ok. curious to see how others are faring. Thankyou.
Wondering how its going. I am at the 7.5mg every other nite mark. Been on 15mg for 4 mos. Gained 45 lbs. Curious to see how you are doing.
"Its still,up,and down. 7.5 for months,,then 3.75 now about 2 and sleep gone a bit awry, feel miserable a lot, anxiety still needs diazepam. Hoping to keep going. Weight still increasing though drug decreasing, cant understand that.
"Ive been off for 2 nights. Insomnia, anxiety, hot flashes, nausea so far. Will see how it goes. Will keep posting. No weight loss during, got my eye on the scale, lol.
"I have been suffering muscle aches and pains all over my body and I have to been awful! If you have body aches and stuff go to the doctors, I had my vitamin D tested and it's extremely low, before the aches and stuff I had tingling in my fingers and hospital tested me in October 4th after that day I got worse, didn't no I was until hospital told me go doctors last week, the doctors apologised, I identify idiot no identify identifies true but matazapine can cause vitamin D difficiency, if anyone is getting muscle aches go to docs ASAP! Let me know. Theres a long list of symptoms for it, docs probably disagree, but depression, anxiety, sick, bad muscle aches/pains, chills, hair loss, dry skin ect
That's very interesting as I too had a Vit d deficiency last year and took a course of vit d for a while
"Do you mean the mirtazapine causes the a hes and pains and depression and anxiety, or does it deplete your vitamin d? I asked dr for vit d and she gave me it, but not sure its a very therapeutic dose. Also,heard magnesium good for anxiety, hope someone can advise if theyve taken it.
"Hi...wondering how u are doing. I was on 7.5 x one year. Taper over a month and have been off a week. Having increased anxiety or just general feeling of unease, difficulty concentrating and insomnia. Have Ativan to help but hate to take that too long. When I wake in the morning I sometimes have gripping anxiety and have to just breath and tell myself I’m ok. Will this pass??
"Thank you...this is hard and a few times I just wanted to go back on. But I’ve made it a week. Trying to stay busy but hate feeling so lousy. Have you been through this? Anything that helped?
"You are further on than me, i have still to drop from 3.75 after xmas. Last drop just had nausea, the runs a bit and a migraine, settled reasonably quickly so hoping next drop will be similar. The anxiety got better slowly too, but still on diazepam for bad times.
"Thanks for the support...sometimes I feel alone because it seems know one understands how I feel.
Hope withdrawal not too bad for you. I’m almost suicidal now. Been off for 7 months now and symptoms utterly unbearable. Head tremors, muscular stiffness (all over, but worse around neck, jaw, cheeks and face), eye fatigue and sensitivity to light, exhaustion and some mental confusion. Having to take more and more time off work, so job on line. Bloods normal, but Doc finally referred me to local hospital for further neurology assessments. Will have to wait ages for that, and unable to tolerate for a second longer. Apart from that feel ok.
"I am going through a period of nausea and bouts of diarhhoea since i had my gallbladder out. Seems this can happen but with the added bonus of trying to get off mirtazapine i feel so ill. It has been weeks since i cut down to 3.75 and frankly im scared to reduce any while all,this stomach disturbance is going on. I cant ascertain if its the mirtazapine not helping it or something completely different. GP of course been telling me ibs etc down to anxiety. I am on 5mg diazepam at night too which i would like to discontinue some day. Feeling sickly and trying to live as normal a life as i can but not easy
do you have any problems with your digestion at all, i can empathise with the sensitivity to light and exhaustion. I am waking feeling so sickly and a sort of juddering inside. I have not had muscular stiffness vut i am still on 3.75. I am petrified of lowering again in case my symptoms crash.
Thanks for concern. No, not sure the symptoms entirely down to withdrawal, especially after such a long period, and when they are getting more severe.
Could also be return of anxiety, a new problem precipitated by coming off? Either way, both scenarios would seem to be devastating for nerve endings, neurotransmitters blah blah.
"Yes, i agree. When it has gone on too long it makes you wonder if the neural pathways have been altered permanently. I know i have anxiety, it has been diagnosed and they have fiven me a med for it. Still the other symptoms prevail so what tests can they do, i dont know. I know i am isolating myself as i am not seeing friends so much as i feel so grotty.
sorry you are having such rough ride.what dose were you on?and how did you taper?over what time?I was on 45mg,and have tapered down to 15mg (will hold until after new year then taper down the rest) I like a lot of us suffered all the withdrawels,been spared insomnia so far thankfully.I too had severe muscle spasm and ridgitity in upper back and neck,so bad that it completely trapped up nerve and all down my arm,reinstated dose I had previously dropped from,but took 10 days and very strong analgesia and muscle relaxant diazepam for this to resolve.when I tried drop again,same happened,but didn't trap nerve but.straight away halved the previous reduction,and that went OK as far as muscles concerned.stil had migraines sweats nausea tinnitus etc though.this is not an easy road to tread,but keep faith,that you will get there.very best of wishes that you get some relief soon
Thanks for interest. I realise I probably tapered too quickly. (30-15mg for two years and then 7.5 for a few weeks then zilch. This was agreed by Doc)
However, going on for 7 months now and symptoms getting worse. Can’t prove but certain damage done to nerves, which is probably irreversible. Problem is that medics subtly and conveniently say symptoms mirror damage without actual damage. At the moment feels like something between Parkinson’s, MS and MND😡.
I am 26 and have been on Mirtazapine for almost 4 years and have just recently come off it (hopefully for good). So far it is going quite well. I realise that it was a big change for my body and that it is just going to take some time to adjust. I started on 45mg for a couple of months, then went to 30mg for about 2 years then went to 15mg for the last year and a half. Something that NO ONE told me until recently is that the way that mirtazapine works is that the higher the dose is the higher the anti-anxiety/depressant effect, and the lower the dose is the higher the sleep-help effect. So as I dealt with my anxiety I mainly just needed it to help with sleep, hence the drop in mg over time. So you should be on a higher mg dose if it's treating anxiety and lower if it's mainly treating insomnia.
Anyway, something I've come to realise is that it was my doctor's best effort at trying to help me get better. They don't know how my body is or isn't going to react to this drug. All of the side effects I've experienced or read through on this site so far are listed in the drug information that is provided about mirtazapine. Something that has helped me get through is to set routine exercise. At the moment it is just walking or slow swimming as I'm pretty wiped out but it really does make a world of difference. It also promotes healthy blood flow in the brain, which by the sounds of it is just what we all need while dealing with this nasty med!
"You have done so well getting off this and getting some life back. I am lowering as per my dr advice as they havent found anything to help me. They say my main problem is anxiety, which i do have, so on small dose diazepam. I have yet to drop down from 3.75 mirtaz soon and wonder if you can give any advice on that? Seems some do it very very slowly, others, half, then quarter bits.
i did experience a hard time dropping from 7.5 and expect to get similar migraine, nausea, fatigue etc. When next drop comes. What i would like to know is, is this worse when you stop them? Does the fatigue become unbearable? What is the worst symptom?
i see you can now swim, i cant somthats out, but i do try to walk every day to keep the blood flowing. My social life is impeded due to all,of this and i just want to get back to normal. Cant believe i was fine till this hit in my sixties, i hope i dont have this for the rest of my life.
Have been referred to neurologist at hospital, but v long wait for that. Reality is that they will say not linked to central nervous system, so no tangible help. Still getting shakes, stiffness, nerve pain, muscular weakness blah blah. Other problem for me is BP. I was already being treated for mild hypertension, but notice that my resting pressure (diastolic) is up by 10 points and stays there. Systolic BP is ok and controlled by meds, but this change is worrying. Don’t know if the neuropathy is causing it directly, or just worrying about it??
That’s a v good question. These are mainly head, arms, leg tremors, fairly constant, visible in mirror, but not necessity to others. Would be good to hear how you differentiate.
"Hi Steve, I have internal tremors mainly in my chest and stomach but most days I shake externally and really cold
how you doing on your Mirtazapine withdrawel journey? and what dose are you now? I like to try to walk and slow swim,and stay as busy and distracted myself from withdrawels (doesn't always work),but helps.
i have dropped down to 2mg and still feeling down and not seeing friends.sleep with help of diazepam.
just wondering when or if i will feel any better, or if i come off this will dr give me more mind benders if i srill cant function. Wonder sometimes what it would be like to be on nothing as i was four years ago.
"Ann was originally on 45mg down to 22.5mg (tapering since last May).will drop to 18.75mg in a weeks time.every taper I get hit with withdrawels usually between weeks two to four,then they settle,but I have a long way to go.
although I sometimes don't feel like it,make myself go for walk,or meet friends for coffee,and try and keep busy,tv,listening radio,music,easy read magasines,anything to distract myself.
"Yes, you are right but i have tried so many meds which made me much worse, the psych is not sure where to go with it next. I seem to just be resistant to this type,of med, which leaves me in such a quandary.
i do try to walk each day, can watchntv at night, do a crossword but every morning i wake so depressed. Cant shift it, some days it lifts a bit, others it doesnt. Just cant meet for coffee, so anxious. Maybe this will go once off it but its been like this even at highest dose which i got to was 15 which made me like a zombie so going higher was awful.
i feel there is no,hope,out there for me.
"Toria how are you doing , I've been looking for your FB page , really had to stand back and take a good look at things , this mirtazapine really is the pits I've got from 30mg down to 7.5 mg which I've now been on for about 4 weeks , I really thought things were starting to come together but how wrong can you be . Yesterday I started to feel not well it's like I've crashed and need to up my dose but that isn't going to happen .Please let me have the FB link Toria , hopefully i'll speak to you soon x
"Hi again , if you know Toria could you please ask her to message me on FB shes got my details ask her to just look up dave barrington-ward thanks so much , I found our chats really helpful thanks again Gretel , Dave x
"Hi Steve, how are you now? I am also struggling with horrendous eye fatigue, dryness and soreness in my eyes and sensitivity. Has anything helped?
"Hi is. your symptoms improved .Im 5 weeks off remeron and have internal trembling anxiety dizziness itching. Im also very tired.im very scared.is this symptoms ever away.Please let me know.thanks.
"Hi teresa, im 15 weeks off and still a plethera of symptoms. Insomnia, anxiety and feverish chills are on top the list. Starting to have glimmers of light, but it seems to ebb and flow.
"Hi .did your symptoms go away ..it wiil be almost 6 weeks for me .i feel very sick.i have nousea dizziness trouble concentrating no energie woking up very early in the morning.anxiety.i feel that never ends.please let me know if you recover and how long it takes.
"Hi Teresa. I am 16 weeks off today. The symptoms wax and wane for me, so by the time im complaining the y have gone. Only to come back. The constants are the insomnia and persistant anxiety and intrusive negative thoughts. Hang in there it does get better.
"Could you tell me how many weeks takes for you to feel ok .looks like forever for me .i feel like i have bad flu but i dont.Thanks
"Teresa, wish i could. But at 16 weeks off i still feel pretty bad. I know one off over a year, still feels bad, i know one that stopped cold turkey 4 months ago and is fine. Its really hard to tell. Feel better soon
"How are you now with your withdrawals from mirtaz.? I am five weeks almost off and thr shaking and anxiety are awful. Any help please
"How are you getting on now? I find myself in your position, off the mirtaz and the anxiety is going crazy, so much somthat it feels like its now a permanent feature for me and i dont know how to deal with it as i didnt do well on several other a.d.s . Have you managed to come to any conclusion about your anxiety or have they put you onto something else, i think i headed that way if this doesnt stop, yet others say the anxiety does stop, mine is worsening.
"Hi Mikeyboy , just reading one of your posts from a yr ago an was wondering how you are coping now ?? Are you still off Mirtazapine? ? Im going thru Withdrawals from Zyprexa for past 10wks and i also reduced my Mirtazapine dose from 60mg to 30mg some 4-5mths ago and im not sure if some of my Withdrawals from Zyprexa are over lapping with the reduction of my Mirtazapine. I would like to get off Mirtazapine eventually but not till ive recovered from my Zyprexa Withdrawals. Hope you've been able to beat Mirtazapine? ? Take care an best wishes for the future mate. . Lloyd from Oz
"hi, who mentioned that Mirt can cause vitamin d deficiency? That interesting as my levels went from 70's to 60's then 40's while on Mirt. was even taking some
vit d at the time off and on. Now I'm taking it daily. Seems to help.
im third night without it and no sleep tonight at all now im feeling lightheaded this is horrible
"I tapered to 30mg from 45mg for 2 weeks, then to 22.5mg for a week, then 15mg, then 7.5mg and then nothing.
I had hardly any symptoms until about 4/5days in when I got a bad cold. I have had no trouble sleeping though which is reassuring as my anxiety was a result of insomnia.
sometimes people struggle stopping at 7.5mg so it could be withdrawals, but also something else I learned along my journey coming off Mirtazapine, is that if you get a cold or virus whilst coming off the drug, it will speed up with withdrawal process. So this could be happening to you too. I hope it doesn't last too long, keep posting and keeping us updated. Good luck x
"I forgot to add that it's great that your sleep is ok, I too went onto Mirtazapine for sleep as my anxiety was as a result of insomnia too. X
"Thanks I haven't got the cold anymore, just feeling sick in the mornings and experiencing some anxiety again. It does seem mad that I ended up like this from lack of sleep last October. I'm back at work now and really that's helped me the most after being stuck at home with a 3year old everyday constantly... Just need this last bit to disappear so I can truly enjoy every bit of life again.
"Thank you Rachael for mentioning the cold or virus. Last night I had a sore
throat and have had bad headaches for a week and thought surely this
isn't related to cutting my 7.5 mg Mirtazqpine in half but I guess it can be.
The body ache is the worse it has been the whole time. And my dose is
"That's so weird - I stopped taking Mirt approx a week ago, this coincided with a shocking cold/cough. I have been waiting for withdrawal effects to kick in but so far - nothing. I dropped straight from 30-15 as per my Dr's instructions and was expecting the worst - but touch wood, so far - nothing...wonder if the cold is taking the edge off the drug withdrawal?
I've been off for a week now and feel pretty rough:
I have been feeling *really* tired but put it down to my cold. Same with not feeling hungry...
My side effects from this drug have far outweighed the benefits I got from it. It took me ages to put all of the pieces together about what was causing all of the issues I had been having - weight gain was the least of my worries. My migraines went 1 a month to around 6 per month. Psoriasis flared up whereas I'd always had it under control - but the worst part for me - was the hair loss. I'm a hairdresser and thought at first it was just the normal stage that hair goes through but the falling out hasn't eased off. So, made the decision to come off mirtazapine and I will reassess my reasons for taking it in the first place - down the track.
Hope you're ok Steve. What country are you from? I'm in Australia.
I'm in Australia too and have simular symptoms but only since coming off Mirt which is odd.
I've never had Psoriasis before but now have patches of it and things popping up everywhere. I've had 5 things taken off because they suddenly popped up and were itchy. Starting to look like I've been through a war zone.
After being off 2 months, I now am loosing hand fulls of hair every day. I thought it was from all the stress. Been a nightmare.
I'm in UK. Was on 30mg for about 6 years, then dropped to 15mg about two years ago. (Intending to taper off at that time) Finally took the plunge and dropped to 7.5 about 3 weeks ago and stopped completely last week.
The symptoms are utterly devastating and don't know if it's withdrawal or return of illness??
I'm still taking 150mg Venlafaxine, as had been on this for much longer and considered to be more effective.
"Ohhh --- I would have thought the hair loss would stop once you were off it for a while. I feel your pain. My Dr disagreed with me - saying hair loss was not a side effect - so she insisted on me getting blood tests to check for thyroid. I'll get those results next week. With the psoriasis - I kept on thinking it was my soap/body wash that was triggering it --- it became so itchy at times that I scratched it until it bled - absolutely unbearable. It also was also itchy at night - all over - not just the psoriasis - I kept telling my partner i felt like I had spiders crawling on me
Anyway - glad I've found you guys.. it's hard to talk to people that haven't gone through all of this .
I had hair loss when I first started mirt and my psyc told me he couldn't find any supporting evidence, but my long lovely expensively balayged hair thinned quickly so he switched me to something else but I had a bad reaction. Now I have stopped the 15mg I was on for a year, 3 days ago. It is reassuring that I did not imagine this hair loss - my hair was fine when I went back on mirt but I cut like 4 inches off my hair because it was so scraggly - I feel quite angry with my psyc - why does know one explain how difficult it can be. I had to stop it because I got elevated liver levels and if its from my meds he said to stop the mirt immediately. I've got the itching, the tiredness, the panick attacks, restlessness, even been like convulsing in an anxiety type way.. just hoping it won't last more than a week!
The tangible side effects - handfuls of hair - are hard to dispute. I will be floored if my blood tests come back showing thyroid issues because my hair loss only started in the months following my increase from 15 to 30mgs a day. I'm not expert when it comes to my migraines or psoriasis or itching until I draw blood - but hair is my thing. I've seen so many clients over the years start losing hair - and it's generally one of 4 things - a reaction to a traumatic event, hormonal changes such as pregnancy or menopause, genetic hair loss such as alopecia or medication. Im interested to see how long it takes for my hair to go back to normal but I am shocked at how many of our Dr's are saying hair loss isn't a side effect to this med. I call BS. You only need to trawl through people's experiences on this forum and hair loss is a common side effect 😩.
I'm also in the UK and am several weeks off mirtazapine after just over a year. Have had awful insomnia followed by awful anxiety - feel like withdrawal is exacerbating the symptoms I'd be having anyway without any meds. Am also on venlafaxine, a higher dose than you, but want to come off that as well to find something actually helpful! Are you staying on venlafaxine? Have you found it better than mirtazapine?
Still on Ven (150mg) and, with devastating symptoms now experienced following stop of Mirt, not sure whether this was problem in first place. My main symptoms are physical- unbearable internal tremors that sort of reverberate through whole body, nerve pain, awful muscular rigidity, visual disturbance etc.
I'm seeing Doc on Friday, but need assurance that light at end of tunnel, if my symptoms associated with Mirtazapine withdrawal.
"I have dropped from 15 to 7.5 and am waking every day with nausea. Today it was diarrhoe and vomiting. I dont know if its the mirtaz or a bug? I have never felt so ill in my life. Cant even get a drink of water in. Please help me.
If you think it is withdrawals, you need to go back to the 15mg dose til you feel stable again and then reduce much slower..you poor thing.I had terrible symptoms too. Awful time of it.
"Thank you, i am trying to stick it out and hope it will pass in a few days. I cannot face hospital. I am using panadol for headache, and little sips of water for tummy. How lomg will this last? I am thinking of doing 7.5 to see how i go. How are drs allowed to give this out, its pure poison.
"by the way dr only put it up to 15 2 weeks ago! Then the problems began....
"Hi I come off about 2 months ago. I was a addict for twenty years I kept getting well then Re-lapse for years. I was finally coming off drugs for life as I was loosing both parents to cancer and seeing them fight for what I was throwing away (life). So I ask doctor if there was something I could go on to stop me going back into depression and self medicating and they used this Evil drug metazapen. It was ok at first but then started piling weight on until they finally got me up to 45mg then it levelled out. I was on it 7 years but that don't matter it's in your body after 2 weeks and after a month we will all suffer in some way/s. I come down myself slowly as didn't want to relapse as there is no one knows your body like u do. So do it as feels right for you and u won't get as anxious. I am off two month at first I was ok then it hit me like a sledgehammer. Didn't no where I wanted to be though my head was going to explode. Ended up in doctors after going on beach and didn't want to be there either. Doc reassured me it was withdrawing so I kept going I was ok next day just a bit rough but now I have lost 2 stone in 2 month which worried me. End up sent to AandE yesterday as have lost half stone in 6 days back at doctors to have tests arranged tomorrow I am hoping it is met but will keep u informed I am 42 so shouldn't be falling to bits yet I know I was addict but look really well u wouldn't know unless I told u. But all other stuff is great we all can do it keep positive people round u don't let people get u into negative thinking as light is at end of tunnel it will pass don't give up or it all starts again.
I been taken mirtazapine and venlafaxine for over2 months now and i suddenly stop taken the mirtazapine because i couldnt afford to keep buying it every month. Now my head feels like its full of water, ears are numb, I rub my hand over my hair and i just have hair falling out, i weighted over 98 pounds and being off of it i lost to 92 pounds. No appite at all, feel so sick but i dont have thick hair at all and, rubing my hand on my hair and just get like 8 hair come out each time, it worries me and i dont know if it is another illness or if it is due to not taken the mirtazapine anymore
Did you go cold turkey? I strongly urge a taper. Trust me.. I wen through all of that for 27 months!! Didn't know it was anti-depressant withdrawal though.
I just went through a 3 months taper from 30mgs and I was on it for 2+ yrs and a year before that long ass withdrawal.
Go back up to 7.5 and taper down by 10% every 2-3 weeks.
I felt horrible the second day off of the drug but the only symptom I've had this time is MAD INSOMNIA!! Knock on wood..
That's interesting g.. I'm still feeling terrible after 10 months ..went from Mirt to Lexapro with out any taper..thought I was going mad. Still not feeling good right and thought it was the new drug but possibly still Mirt withdrawal.In
"I've been on mirtazapine 6 years at 15mg up to 45mg. Yikes! All my thick beautiful hair fell out at 36. I thought it was hormones but no. Now reading everything else people have written here I see hair loss is common. Tried going off it on round one failed, but I'm down to 15mg and will titrate down every 3-4 months. F**K BIG PHARMA
"lowered mirtaz from 7.5 to 3.75. Feeling very rough. Nausea, diarrhea, ibs, fatigue, anxiety which spikes sometimes three or four times a night. Dr gave me diazepam extra so they must know these drugs are bad for withdrawal. Plan next 10% when this goes. Question is, how long till it stabilises?
"Just wondering what dose you started on?and how did you manage the 10percent taper.managed from 45mg to 30mg with side effects quite bad,but persevered then after few months felt good.so then went 22.5mg (by cutting 15mg table half with pill cutter) again side effects,but went over time.tried dropping to 15mg last 7 nights,severe pain in neck and shoulders,that decided to go back up to 22.5 and stabilise,then do a slower taper.dont think the 15mg tablets will cut into quarters very well,how did you manage your tapering
sorry your feeling rough,withdrawel not easy road from this terrible drug.how did you manage to taper,my tablets are 15mg which are easy to cut half with pill cutter,but don't really think it's possible to cut into a quarter.how did you work out and manage 10percent taper?
"I was shocked to see the change in the operated knee after the dressing came off. Is this because the knee is getting some air. It feels more uncomfortable as well.
"I have a continual, deep pain/ache in practically the whole of my leg. I use ice on it (frozen peas!) a great deal of the time and I take my pain killers. At night I cannot sleep because there is nowhere New I can put my leg which does not become become equally painful within a few seconds. Anybody else have this problem? Also, I had to stop taking Diclofenac a few days before the op. How long before I can take it again?
"I'm 6 weeks after my op .During the night I place a cushion between my knees and have an ice pack and take my meds . it's not easy but you will get there in the end.wish you good luck
All i can say is dont force your knee to do what is not comfortable, do things at you own pace but you must bend it just a little more every day and if there is any abnormal swelling or pain see your GP asap. Your next big pain in the butt is still to come. The wife and i love traveling and man going through security points is such a pain nowadays and not even your doctors letter or the scar is going to stop them frisking you every time.
My recommendation to you is to as much as you feel comfortable with and no more putting in just a little more effort every day. In the evening i would have a shower just before bed time and heat my knee up with the hot water, i would then sit on the edge of my bed with your foot on the floor and your knee bent to its max then keeping your feet on the floor slowly move your body forward thus bending your knee to a greater angle till you cannot take the pain anylonger but you must hold it there for at least 5 min, i know its painful but you will find the pain will start to faid as you get used to that pain. I also went for physio every day which did help but you can get away with it by rubbing voltaren in yourself from thigh down to ankle and i mean a good rub. I was off all meds by 6 weeks but at 12 weeks i was walking and felt a hooking sensation with a loud crack and unbelievable pain and that was the start to the pain i live with day to day.
"Hi Guys, i had my total knee replacement on the 16 May 2016 and im still in pain. I have been put in the 1 in 50 failed joint replacement and i am certain it was due to the pressure put on you to bend your knee as much as possible in the shortest period of time. If you have any sort of swelling after the op and abnormally high amount of pain go see you GP asap. I got a bad infection 3 weeks after surgery.The sleeping part is the pain in the butt part. What i found the best but dont recommend it is i took double the pain meds before i went to sleep and that would knock me out for a good part of the evening.
For anyone interested, I have the Conformis custom fit TKR.
This past season was my first time back. I skied 6 days in a row without ANY pain whatsoever. As a matter of fact my real knee hurt and was slightly swollen, but my new knee was never stiff or swollen in anyway shape or form! While skiing I ended up thinking of my real knee more than my artificial one!!!
"I had my surgery two years ago tomorrow! Other than the first 4 weeks of what I would call agony, the knee is great. I had 5º to 105º before the surgery. From the beginning I had great flexibility. Within a week I had improved to 0º and 120º and now somewhere over 140º! Other than the home PT for the first 2 weeks, I saw my PT a total of 3 times! I asked why and he said I had already met all expected goals so there was no need for any PT. At my 6 week post op meeting with my surgeon, he said see you next year, but the only thing he wanted to know was how my knee did back my first day skiing!
"My bones ached and knee pain was terrible. I still do t sleep well at night due to pain. I thought the pain would be gone once the old knees were gone but that hasn't been the case. This is just the most painful and brutal thing we can do to our bodies, as far as surgery is concerned. Time is our friend! I have every faith that it will get better.
"Just nap and rest when your knee tells you too. I will be 3 weeks on Tuesday and some days better than others. Still can't be up for long periods with out knee talking to me.
"Hi im 6 days post op and know exactly what you mean. I cant take diclofenic so using dihydracodeiene someone has said it does get easier so hang in there. No consolation i know at 2am and not slept
"I know your pain. I had finger bruises on my thighs. I think they have to hold the leg /ankle so hard to get the replacement on but it should heal. This certainly wasn't the journey that I expected but I am told that it does get better. I never went to rehab because I heard such terrible things and I had been in pain for so many years that I thought I might just punch someone if they inflicted pain on me so I chose do do it myself. My Dr. Told me that if I did my 2 exercises I would be good. I really worked at It, in my time and I have pretty good range of motion. I used a Jacuzzi to help bend my knee, with good results. I am 3 months out from a double knee replacement and I am not pain free by any means. For me, I did what I could and my Rom came back. I have lots of swelling and pain. I also have a clicking sound when I walk. Bummer. Don't despair. Rest and elevate and listening ur own body. Everyone recovers differently. Take this time to just rest ur body. I believe it just takes time.
"Kim, I know just keep your knee moving. Rest and ice and elevate. I am going to look into a natural path to help with all the aches I get. I know each day and week will be different.
"I'm about 3wks out still can't comfortable,and my hip ,and lower back hurts now outside pt or horrible really hard & painful ,and my doctor only gives meds 3wks out of surgery. I started pt outside super painful .I went through alot at surgery I had caught the flu was sick the day I was released,during surgery the doctor did something to my ankle I had finger prints(bruising) on my ankle,calf.no other bruising so I couldn't step on my ankle for about a week in half . Now I can't bend only to 90 now he said I'm back to 80 and now he's focused on straightening still can't get comfortable it's like a dead leg know how you feel
"I also get a continuous deep muscle cramp starting from my butt cheek going all the way down my back leg. A muscle relaxant does help but I think it is the way we are compensating when we are walking.
"I had my 2nd tkr (left) two weeks ago today. My right leg tkr surgery was 11 months ago. it is wonderful! This time around is a little different more pain and swelling. I know how much better it will be so I work thru the pain. Both surgeries were outpatient. Had nerve block which controlled pain for first 48 hrs. 1000mg Tylenol and 800mg Advil taken at the same time every 8 hours -oxy when needed. Stopped oxy after 4 days. Staples pinched when removed but relief after! I start outpatient therapy today. I can bend to 90 and straighten -5. My confidence is getting better, my mind tells me to limp but I don't have too. Elevate, ice and move around every hour. Stay positive it only gets better!
I do hope I can get my proper life back the way it used to be before the ladder fall.
I did sleep ok in early days because I took strong painkillers. I came off those the second month end. Now on nothing.
I had a total knee replacement 6 months ago. I fell off a ladder into a laminate floor 7 years ago which caused one knee to deteriorate. I'm only 57. I was driving a 4 x 4 and returned to office work after 2.5 weeks. I'm self employed so had little choice. I was on one crutch after one week. However 6 months later I still have pain, limp a lot when I first move then it eases off but there's still a limp. I used to wear 4 inch heels but obviously can't now. Wearing Sketchers is easier but I have to wear heels for work so I can manage 1.5 inch ok for now. I'm hoping that in another 6 months I'm fully recovered. My knee will bend to 95° only but I'm way off straightening it. I'm getting private sports remedial massage to help but progress us slow. I can walk my dogs for 1.5 miles but only with resting on benches. I'm very disappointed but I live in hope it will recover.
"Ann02425. This seems.to be a fairly common experience. I am now 4 weeks post op and still waking at least once a night in pain. However it is much better that it was three weeks ago and I can now get comfortable in bed. For now nap when and where you can. Are you on any pain relief at all? Ask your doctor about the Dicofenac
"Still early mate, dont push it. Found ice packs hurt more than did good. Found the best was in the evening during your shower i let the hot water run on my knee till it was real hot. After you get out the shower sit on your bed with feet on the floor and knee bent as much as you can. Keep your feet flat on the floor and move your body forward till your knee cant take the pain anylonger. Hold it there and you will get used to the pain. Hold it like that for as long as possible and rub your knee with something like voltaren. Worked for me. Was bending my knee to 180 after 8 weeks.
I'm 4 weeks in too and struggling to get past 70 degree flexion, went to physio yesterday,she is concerned too. I think we are being too hard on ourselves at this early stage, my swelling and pain is really impeading any profess. I'm anxious though, we are bombarded with info regarding recovery milestones, this surgery has been horrific , trying to remain positive, my thoughts are with you hang in there.😃
"Hi Johnny- thanks for the advice , maybe l am expecting too much so soon after the operation
"I had a TKR 4 weeks ago - pain has got a bit easier but l am really struggling to bend the knee or complete my exercises - concerned that l will not be able to bend
"My knee surgery was 14 days ago. I had stayed in the hospital 2 nights. I was not ready to go home after my first night do to my pain med was not working. Once they found what meds I need to go home with . The next day I went home. My pain was mostly in the whole leg. I felt the pain mostly on the back side. I took my pain med every 4 hr and iced the swelling constantly. I could only sleep on my recliner with my leg up on a pillow. My pain was always worst after therapy. It like they had me do things with that knee that I was not prepared for. The therapy had started 3 days after the operation. I do some exercises at home to stench the knee. I still have pain in my leg and not taking my meds as often. I had started walking with a Cain after nine days of the surgery date. The leg is stiff and takes a while to loosen it up. I can not sit in a chair for any length of time. I believe this pain will slowly subside in do time . Every body different into how the healing process goes. I was told that every day gets better.
Having staples out on 5th oct , Physio on 6th I'll keep you posted
After many visits 2 my GP , I decided 2 go privately 4 a MRI scan which showed I had bad osteoarthritis!! I then paid 4 a private consultation within 1 hr I had been given a x ray , cortisone injection ( which is still working now 2 yrs later) on a visit back my consultant noticed that my other knee was inflamed and gave me a number of cortisone injections which did nothing he then advised me 2 have a arthroscopic op to acertaiin course of action key hole very painful 🙈🙈 he carried out a debridement and told me I needed a total knee 🙈🙈???? I have finally had it and am only 1 wk on I have looked on many websites some good and some bad but the only thing I have gleened is that it's the No Pain No gain sernario I am off my strong painkillers and sleeping ok u must push yourself and i ice every 20 mins including nightime ps forgot 2 say leading up 2 my op i cycled on my exercise bike 20 mins everyday
I had a TKR 1 wk ago I am 57 and play golf approximately 4 times per wk in my previous life I was involved in motorsport which included spending a great deal of time on my knees , after taking up golf I started getting knee problems and had a bakers cyst on my left a
I keep thinking I'm not making enough progress so this forum is helping me to realise I'm not alone.and reassures me that I'm doing OK for this early in the recovery process. Good luck with your recovery.
"Hi I have the same. I'm 10 days post op. It's a deep nagging ache all along the outside of my leg from ankle to groin. It keeps me awake at night. I get very sore pain on the inside of my knee and other various pains from sharp stabbing ones to what feels like something stinging. It also aches behind my knee a lot. I'm icing my knee regularly and trying to do the exercises, but no way can I raise my leg off the bed. I've been pottering about on crutches and going up and down stairs ok. I even managed a very quick shower the past two days, but it's quite unnerving with nothing to hold on to! I'm on my own in the day time as my husband is at work, so I have to be independent.
"Thank you Cheryl i felt a lot better after finding this site last night its so often the case that the Internet comes to your assistance i have took on board everything you have said and look forward to getting strong again i think i have been lucky that i dont think I have as much pain as others the surgeon who did it is very good he uses the aid of a computer to align the knee but after that i was struggling until i found the good advice here i will be watching for any more tips thanks once again for your help.
Come here often. You will learn so much! I know I did early on, and I am STILL getting tips from those who are further along in the process. For me this site provided me with friends around the world who KNEW what I was going through and truly could sympathize as well as provide ideas to try. That has been priceless!💟
Gentle squats while holding onto the kitchen counter are VERY GOOD thigh strengtheners. I continue to do them even now, a year after my surgeries, to keep my thigh muscles strong.
I don't know if you are a believer, but if you are, PRAYER certainly helps and is my main method for remaining calm during this whole process of healing and getting back to feeling good again.
You MAY notice the old ""three steps forward and two steps back"" method of progress. I know I did. No matter. Just keep believing in yourself! 🙌😊😁🙌 Keep as positive as you can. Positive feelings create endorphins which actually help with any pain you may have. LAUGH at every chance you can. I watched funny movies like ""Animal House"" with John Belushi and the ""National Lampoon Vacation"" movies with Chevy Chase to get me refocused on laughing and NOT worry or feelings of ""poor me"".
"Hi Cheryl and thanks for your reply everything you have been through i am going through now the surgery its self is a great thing i dont know if its just in my case but i have found the aftercare is non existent i was lucky that a colleague knew about the belt routine and gave me the tip i have been worried about the thigh muscle and its good to get your advice that it gets better in time i think this kind of advice from others who have been through the same is best i will keep you posted on my progress if thats ok thanks .
Stiffness is common, too. Anytime I sit too long or even lay in one position in bed, I am stiff. Rainy and snowy days bring ADDED stiffness as well. Try stretching in bed before you ever get out of bed. Stretch before getting up out of a chair or out of a car. It really is time well spent and provides more stability and better balance once you ARE up, as well.
When your quad muscles strengthen, the leg WILL lift. At first I was proud of myself when I could move my TOES.
"I had my knee replacement 5 days ago i 5hink i am like a lot of others in the forum lifting my leg straight up is very painful and im still swelled uo hopefully it will get easier with the exercises i do each day i have taken the mediation regularly and im sure this helps but my knee is still quite stiff in the morning i feel for anyone who is going through this it isnt easy but i am assured by others who have been through it it does get easier .
Agreed that sleeping is a major challenge. I can't go more than a couple hours without waking.
As mentioned, keep doing the exercises. It is so important to get the muscle strength back. I can do 12 inch up steps, balance on uneven surface and sqaut to almost a sitting position. I have never taken a day off.
"I had my TKA 31 days ago. The first 10 days were hell. I was only in the hospital for 1 night and started formal PT two days later. I just finished my 13th session (3 days a week) and am able to bend to 118 degrees. The swelling is what my biggest impediment is. It swells all the way to my foot. What I have found helpful is to use the ace wrap. I tried not doing that today and am paying dearly for it.
"These are all very good points. I'm 62 in November and had the op for pain reasons. I'm hoping that at the end of my recovery to walk further than I could without pain.
I assume things are better now 1 yr out. I'm 3 weeks post tkr and still reliant on 10 mg oxy plus 2 extra strength Tylenol 3x a day. Like everyone else, nights are a killer. Without medicating 1 hr prior to bed, it's a toss and turn game. I'm young, 55, and fit but this surgery knocked me on my butt in terms of pain and general sense of well being. How long till the swelling and stiffness abates?
"Im getting cramp in my foot everytime i put icepack on my calf,any idea y.im 5wk int tkr.x
"We all need to remember everyone is different. I carried on with Ibuprofen for a couple of days after the ant-acid Lanzoprolol had run out and ended up with the most severe stomach pains I had ever had. Ended up in A&E where they suspected my stomach lining had been irritated/damaged by the Ibuprofen. Iw on't go near the stuff again!
"Keep stretching. I get good results by stepping up on one step with one foot and leaning into my knee bend gently, holding for a count of 30 then resting. You can hold onto the railing for safety. I continue to do this several times a day.
Rashes and itching are SO annoying! Try using Ivory soap for awhile. Our school nurse suggested that to me, and it helped. It also does an excellent job on poison ivy, too!
After using Neosporin for years, I developed an itchy rash using it on my arm one day. Our son had a similar reaction. I figured they MAY have changed something in the medication.
"Thank you very much guess just have to be patient I also take oxycodone and hydrocodon also on ibuprofen yes the bumps are very itchy but I've had no fevers I will try the compression socks thanks for the tip ..
"Trouble I have now is my knee is still very sore stiff and hard! Having a time getting it bent enough for the therapist liking thanks for responding back have a great day!
The Oxycodone and Hydrocodone I took with Knee #1 and then Knee#2 didn't help me nearly as well as plain old WONDERFUL Ibuprophen! You may find it to be true as well.
I am doing fine now one year and nine months respectively from the two surgeries.
My second surgery (Right Knee) three and a half months later went so effortlessly that I could move my right leg all around even in the recovery room and was discharged after just two days.
I ran into a similar situation but in the opposite order. My first (Left Knee) had TERRIBLE SWELLING and felt so heavy that I thought they just MIGHT have put in a prosthesis made of IRON!??
"I had my first tkr in March and had no problems just the regular aches and pains but was driving and going up and down stairs just fine so I decided to do my other knee big mistake Iam in so much pain had done June 21st still can't bend my knee at all the swelling doesn't go down no matter what I try pt is so painful I cry everytime of course they always say it will get better my scare is so stiff I still use a walker I'm on 2 different pain pills so much of the time just lay around in pain I have like bumps on my incision that are very tender does anyone else have this problem and what can I do ..please help
"I have a continual, deep pain/ache in practically the whole of my leg. I use ice on it (frozen peas!) a great deal of the time and I take my pain killers. At night I cannot sleep because there is nowhere New I can put my leg which does not become become equally painful within a few seconds. Anybody else have this problem? Also, I had to stop taking Diclofenac a few days before the op. How long before I can take it again?
"I had mine done a week ago yesterday, my nights are the worse.I wish you a speedy recovery!
"Not sure if you can get your doctor to order a continuous motion machine for you or not, but if he will, you WILL sleep at night. The constant movement keeps the knee from swelling up during the night and sleep makes your recovery quicker. I also recommend an ice machine which has a wrap that alliws a constant COLD air around the knee during waking hours. This also aids in healing. I'm now almost 7 weeks post op and my knee feels like I never had surgery. Therapy is a MUST. At least twice a week and do your exercises 3 times a day!
The pain associated with TKR has been a shock to me as everyone that has had this surgery either forgot the pain or out and out lied! The only surgery that was more painful was plastic surgery to repair where they cut away my abdominal area due to MRSA infection. Pain does subside especially if you have therapy. The more you stretch the knee the less pain you'll have. Keep up the great work but, if you even think you have an infection DO NOT WAIT. GO TO EMERGENCY. Infections can kill you!
"I can't believe you're driving! It's my right knee so I was told 6 weeks! I live in the U.S.
this forum is fantastic, it is 3.30 a.m and I shall go back to non-sleep thinking I am fairly normal. Cab drive car round car parks etc, pressure on accelerator and brake helps pain! Thanks all
i havent seen physio since two minute session befone I left Hosp, 18 hours post-op, decided I am going to the hosp tomorrow and get someone to confirm it is ok, Bank Hol weekend Sunday but dont mind waiting.
"I am nine days post TKR, it is the lack of any sleep position that bugs me. I was great for first 72 hours then went berserk with pain, thought I might have infection. Dist Nurse came, changed dressing and thought it was 'a dit warm' so am on a weeks max dose Flucloxacillin. Thus feel ugh as well as pain. Walking gently, without crutches, is the one way to relieve pain. Feel as if I only had total of six hours sleep since the 72 hours.
Ask you doctor about getting one for you. My insurance covered the cost and I'm in the U.S. with terrible Obamacare, but that was covered.
I'm amazed that I haven't seen anyone that went home with a continuous movement machine. I don't know what I would have done without it. It moves the leg bending the knee all through the night which makes sleeping possible and the pain bearable.
"I was still having a hard time after 17 days. Everyone is going to have their own experience, but if you aren't perceiving improvement, contact your doctor.
"I had TKR 17 days ago and having the same problem sleeping. I also have extreme pain every time I get up from a chair or using the toilet. Is this normal at 17 days, or should I be past this pain level?
"Hello Ann, I am right in line with you as far as the time span of surgery. I had mine on April 18th. My knee is as swollen (and a little red) as the day it was first done. The pain comes and goes but really hurts during PT or if they want me to stretch it out strait and keep it like that so it will loosen the back part of the muscles. I guess anti iflammitories would help but I can't take them because of my stomach. But I do have the problem with sleeping under control. I try to elevate my leg and get it as comfortable as my body will allow it and take my sleeping pill. It's not foolproof because sometimes I wake in strange painful positions. But I just wanted to let you know I am right here if you want to share things that are going on with you too. So take care and good luck. Also, I will be taking advice from the people here because I'm sure they have good info.
Each week i see an improvement ,I take less painkillers get through the exercise regime easier ( less groaning and face pulling) My biggest hurdle is not getting enough sleep at night. So do not give up hope just keep on grinding it out Colinx
"Pam, you would not believe how much 2 weeks makes I was recently at a Physio session, another man had his op a wk before me and a lady a wk ltr so 3 wks in total . The difference in progress was huge, in mobility, flex pain management. the only common complaint was sleep deprevation
As well as removing metalwork to my lower knee.I though i would be up and back to driving by now,So very depressed at the moment,can just about get up stairs and down,Taking paracetamol,trying to bend and straighten knee but can just about manage 80d.I have no problem sleeping take tablet have a pillow under all of my lower leg,manage to sleep for about 5 hrs.
"Hi Colin, Like you i had a complete knee replacement on 15/1/16.
i wish to share 1 symptom , my constant moaning and groaning to my wife!!I have read lots of handy tips on positions of pillows, Alisons tip is one over my face to shut me up. i am on week 6 and thought by now other than a bit of discomfort all would be rainbows and buttercups.I have to to tell my self if this was a car accident we we all be in a poor state,We are all different and all experience the proceedure at different levels pain, mobility, sleep deprivation plus the whole emotional rollercoaster ride So for me when I can I smile a lttle, and tell my self this will not last for ever even the constipation from the pain killers.
"I had tkr on the 2 1 2016 and reading as many comments as I can it appears we all agree broadly on all the problems ie pain,heat in the joint, transferred pain to the shin and thigh, clicking and clunking in the joint and the overall pain and discomfort.
I noticed that you are using a bag of ice. I tried that number for several weeks and it was an incredible pain notably because I was pretty much taking care of myself. I HIGHLY recommend going through Amazon and purchasing a CryoCuff for your knee for icing and compression. It is very portable and I have even taken it in the car with me. The ice lasts for a good 6+ hrs and it is the size of a gallon picnic thermos. Check it out.
I have a friend that has an upcoming surgery for the same thing so I was like the guinea pig by going first. I wrote a spreadsheet for her of all the things to do pre op and post op that no one tells you about so that she could be fully prepared.
What I can tell you is that I started seeing a major shift at around 4 weeks with progress in the recovery. Was it huge? No but noticible enough to allow me to move forward knowing there was light at the end of the tunnel. You are still super early in your recovery.
It was validating to hear from others on this site in knowing that this is a very common complaint. I could not get comfortable because I could not lie on either side......only on my back which would start to hurt after awhile. They if I was really out and my body managed to slip to a side my knee would immediately let me know with blinding pain.
I am at 7 1/2 weeks and I can tell you that sleeping was a bitch.
"Hi Sue, I was advised by my Surgeon to not have both done at the same time. I had my left tkr done 10 days ago and have done very well. I am walking unaided. I left the hospital the day after surgery and negan home therapy 3 times a week. Today I walked 1/10 of a mile. Minimal pain, and minimal swelling. My Surgeon did not cut any muscle but moved it to the side. From what I am reading on this forum, I am glad he does this procedure. I have an appointment in 4 days to get my stitches out. I will continue therapy until I have the right done in 3 weeks. I hope that my right knee responds as my left has. Everyone does have different Rehab results. My tips are follow your PT exercises, ice as much as you can stand, keep up with pain management, and rest. Pray that you all have quick recoveries.
Many people aren't so fortunate. My mother-in-law was told by several surgeons that she NEEDED hips and knees replaced (severe RA) but that she was not in good enough health to survive any operation. She accepted the opinions but wished she had had options. She is now in a nursing home and unable to walk. I sure do wish we could run the clock back and get her into surgery a few decades ago!
I, too, am grateful that my surgery is completed and that I was a candidate FOR surgery. My X-RAYS prior to surgery were just pitiful. I knew surgery truly was my only option if I was to be able to live the rest of my life in a way that I wanted to live it.
I am three weeks post op with my right knee. Eighteen weeks ago I had my left knee done. Both individually were plenty challenging for me even though I was fortunate to suffer no complications. I think you and others who have had both knees done at the same time are INCREDIBLY BRAVE!
just wanted to say, everyone is different and recovery time is a long time. I can say I'm glad I had the operation and feel confident my new knees will be good for me. I have my first outing on a public bus this week and hoping I'll fair well. I think we all shouldn't be so hard on ourselves and We should marvel on the fact that we're able to have this operation.
id like to say I'm pain free now but of course, that's not the case. One knee as improved quicker than the other but they are both stiff and ache. Stairs are by far the worst. I was taken out for lunch today by my family. It was my first outing. I found sitting down on a normal height chair difficult and also, when I went to the bathroom the toilet seemed so far down. Id hired chairs for home. The walk around felt good but very slow.
i had bilateral knee replacements 3 weeks ago. I regretted having them done in the first week. I was in so much pain and didn't have a ""good"" leg to stand on. Physio got me up the day after my op and I used a walker where my elbows slotted into arm rests and sort of leaned into it to walk. I thought I would die. After 3 days, I walked on the aid to the gym and came back 45 minutes later on a walking stick. I cut out the use of crutches all together. I was amazed at my own determination. I used the stick for about 2 days and have been walking without any aid since.
Just watered my flowers outside and noticed I had forgotten my walker and/OR cane INSIDE! YOU will have this happen, too!
2 weeks post op from #2
"I had a total knee replacement 8 days ago and can identify with all of the posts regarding pain, swelling and in particular the difficulty of sleeping. I had my second therapy session today in home but had one on day 2 in the hospital. I went home from the hospital with a 95 bend and am now 105. I can walk stairs with pain. I have found the pain pills taken before and after therapy and the ice are lifesavers. Swelling is way down since yesterday. I am walking well with the walker. Cannot sleep because of the pain behind the knee but I doze off and nap in the recliner. Next knee replacement will take place in a little less than 4 weeks. Hope it goes well and the first is better by then.
"I also had knee replacement on the 2nd of October 2015. I could not sleep for the first two weeks after surgery as my knee would hurt so bad no matter what or where I postioned it. Week three is so much better I can walk around my house most days without my walker and my pain is very minimal compared to what it was.I would suggest you go back to your doctor if the pain continues, however keep in mind that each patient recovers at their own pace. Good Luck it will all be better soon.
I used my husband's belt looped around my foot to move my leg up and down, from side to side getting into bed, and getting it over the side of the tub while sitting on my shower stool. My physical therapist suggested this. I later discovered that she had had BOTH KNEES replaced four years ago when she was just 42. She moves so well know and you would never guess she had both knees replaced just a short time ago!
He is still in the very early stages at just one week post op. At that stage my left knee felt like a 1000 pound TREE TRUNK!
"Oh, YES! I had that same problem with my left knee total knee replacement this past June! When therapy came to work with me in the hospital the day after surgery I was unable to lift my leg, unable to move it side to side and felt NUMB from the nerve block for WEEKS after surgery!
"My Husband had a TKR one week ago he still can't lift his leg whilst sitting on the floor did anyone have this problem please apart from that he is doing pretty well I told him. It is still early but I would appreciate if someone who has had this problem could let me know for him thanks
I see my surgeon this coming Friday.
"The thought of using heat scares me. I don't want to take a chance on additional swelling at all! But I would live some relief!!
I'm a bit dubious about adding more heat though, seems plenty hot enough on its own - I love my ice pack, that's what's keeping me sane.
"Yeh, I was told to continue my pain meds for 2-3 days and the suggestion was it would start to get better after that... do they actually talk to their previous patients at all? It's definitely worse day 5 post op than it was day 3, plus my wound dressing is insanely itchy!!
"To everyone one who is struggling with post op pain following a knee replacement, maybe I can help. Today is postop day 11 and I have been to hell and back. By day three at home, I couldn't move, let alone exercise, because of the severity of the pain. Ice packs were helpful for the swelling and I was taking far more than the prescribed dose of pain killers to no avail. The solution? A heated wheat bag! Relief was instant. It's important not to have it too hot, so wrap it in a clean t towel before placing over the wound. I also sleep with a pillow under my back and shoulders, with my head resting on two pillows behind. I also sleep with a pillow lengthwise under my knee. This has allowed me to sleep comfortably on my back. The heat bag had been my saviour, may it be yours.
my physio told me to massage my scar line as I too find this seems to be getting tighter and inhibiting movement. It has really helped. I massage the scar every hour with Diprobase ointment and at night I have just started putting lots of cream on and then covering with knee support bandage. It has helped a little. Good luck with your progress, it is. A slow job!!!
I had my replacement 4 weeks ago and like you sleep is a nightmare. I think every time I move the leg it wakes me and then I am an hour or so before I get back to sleep.
I has my knee replacement Nov 2014 and still struggling with the bend
"I had my tkr 17\8\15 and it is still very stiff and painful. I di my excercises but am struggling with the bending. My scar also seems to be hardening and sleeping has been a nightmare, I am still in the spare room as my husband has to work and needs his rest.
Needless to say I am ecstatic with my new knee! It was very painful for the first 4 weeks with very little sleep. I worked out a lot getting stronger going into the surgery which both the PT and surgeon said helped a lot with my recovery. I also listened to my body after the surgery and did not do anything to agreviate it beyond what I felt comfortable with until the knee felt ready for it.
Finally, even after 6 months things are still improving. It use to hurt to fully flex my knee, but some time after 5 months even that pain is almost completely gone, and my flexion is probably maxed out now at the mechanical limit of the new joint at somewhere around 140º!
This past week I hiked a 6 mile trail with 2000 vertical feet. The knee never hurt at all but my natural knee and the sprained foot did! Looks like I ended up with a case of plantars fasciitis from spraining my foot back 2 months ago , but the new knee never blinked!
I know we're not suppose to run on it but I tried it out in 100 step units during a 3 mile walk to get my heart rate up. I had a GPS in my pocket and during one of the sections where I pushed it I hit 8.7 mph! Needless to say I probably won't be doing it again, but it was a great feeling to be able to run after 30 years of not being able!
It is really crazy how I am still learning to trust my TKR in places where I previously would of had to switch feet to protect that knee from pain for the past 30 years! What a relief!!!! An example is walking down a slope. Previously because of an ACL reconstrucion that got stretched, walking down a steep slope was impossible unless I went down sideways, now I can walk straight down it without any pain!
3 days later I hiked the same trail, but this time to the summit. It is a 3.3 mile round trip with 1500 vertical foot climb, some of it up fairly large boulder steps. I ended up doing the same hike 3x in the same week! I must say the surgeon was right, my natural knee hurt whereas the TKR knee was fine!
After 4 weeks recovery I did a fairly strenuous 1 mile hike up and back a mountainous trail, but kept it to a mile because my surgeon said to hold back on my first hike. The knee felt great, but my leg muscles were still and my aerobic fitness were the weak links!
4 months out I fell down a 1/2 flight of stairs and crunched by new knee and sprained my opposite foot. Luckily the knee was technically fine but did hurt and between the foot and the knee it set me back about 4 weeks.
Saw my surgeon at my 3 month appointment. He said my next appointment would be in a year, but asked that I text him to tell him how my knee did my first day back snow skiing! He also stated that my replacement knee would end up being my stronger knee because of the arthritis in my natural knee and that one would probably need to be replaced in 10 years.
I must say that I've been in the gym since the 4th week post op and I'm sure this has been the most important thing in my recovery.
I saw an in home PT for the first two weeks after the OP. By week 4 I could go without the heavy pain meds other than at night and used a combination of Ibuprofen and acetaminophen during the day so I could drive to the external PT. Saw him once one week than he scheduled me for 2 weeks later, and then 3 weeks after that! At the last appointment he said I was done with PT!!!??? I said I had my 2nd Dr's appointment in 6 weeks and asked if he thought I'd be ready, his reply was that I was already ready! I was already at 0º and 135º. PT said he wished all his patients did as well as me!
Pain was a killer until after 4 weeks when it finally started to subisde and basically got better every week. Every once in awhile I'd wake up to less pain.
First thing I have to correct was I said I was 57, that was wrong, I was 58 and had a birthday between then and now so I am now 59. I'll chalk the discrepancy up to the good meds!
"Now about 6 months post op.
not much new except slowly improving everyday. The most important thing is to stay up on the pain medication.
"I have a continual, deep pain/ache in practically the whole of my leg. I use ice on it (frozen peas!) a great deal of the time and I take my pain killers. At night I cannot sleep because there is nowhere New I can put my leg which does not become become equally painful within a few seconds. Anybody else have this problem? Also, I had to stop taking Diclofenac a few days before the op. How long before I can take it again?
Wish there was no pain but other than that extremely happy with results.
Originally had bouts of naseua but since taking medication with milk instead of ""food"" seems to really have helped.
Finished last morphene pill and only on Hydrocodone.
Pain seems to be a constant 3 up to 6 or more at times.
Swelling is noticebly better.
The terrible burning sensation from standing up appears to be gone.
Heat from underneath seems to help the soft tissue pain.
Flexion has gone up to 115º.
The PT just left. Did not measure flexion but appears to be 0º or better.
"7 days post op. 57 yres old.
"Hi Don...it's strange but all the people who I talked to before the TKR never mentioned the night pain. In my case I think having fine weather post OP has helped. It meant I could have my knee outside of the quilt. I've found, with my knee, that even the weight of a sheet was too much. In fact any material, including lightweight cotton PJs, touching the skin over the scar seemed to produce a static charge type of pain. I've found, in my case. Standing a chair cushion, wrapped in a pillow case. Upright between my legs while lying on my back. Created a tent space over my knee giving me much relief. Only waking if the 'tent' colapsed onto the knee.
I had taken the 2nd to last morpheme tablet an 1 hydrocodone last night before bed. I also applied ice while lying in bed. 4 hours later after tossing and turning in pain I got up and took 2 hydrocodone tablets and instead of ice I turned on the heating blanket. I know ice is good for swelling, but heat is good for relaxing muscles and soft tissues. That did the trick for another 4 hours when I woke again. Did the same thing again but climbed back into bed with an ice pack for 15 minutes then removed that and let the heating blanket do its thing. Seems to have worked. No additional swelling but the soft tissues and muscles seem quite a bit happier.
Last night I hit the wall again and could not get comfortable.
I've been doing pretty good with motion and strength and all of the little successes each day. Pain has still been an issue as we all know.
Strange how pain comes and goes with a TKR.
"just in case people are upset that they are not recovering as fast you have to remember that recovery is in the shape of the bell curve. Some will do better some of the worse and some will do average. I may been lucky that every step along the way my bell curve am hitting the upper end of it so everything is speeded up. I may of been doing just as well with a different knee implant, different surgeon, different surgical procedure into the knee, or different knee arthritic pattern. There are just so many variables that what is good for one person may not be so good for the next person. I'm just posting how my surgery went and what the results are for me. Not everyone will or can respond in the same fashion that I have. I'm also not out of the woods yet either as I don't know how it will continue to perform in the coming weeks months years.
"I forgot to say my surgeon used glue instead of sutures or staples so I was able to shower yesterday without fear of getting it wet since the entire area is covered in this clear plastic.
I am currently on morphine and Vicodin plus a blood thinner. Every day the swelling gets a little bit less, the pain a little bit less and my strength improves a little bit more. Only time will tell whether or not this new knee is as good as it seems and whether or not it would last as long as traditional knee replacements. Other than the ride home from the hospital I have been on my own preparing my own meals since coming home. I do have a freezer full of frozen food ready to go I wish you all the best hope you all keep improving.
Not sure if I should post that on a public forum. I think the best idea would be to go to conformis website and read everything on the site and watch all of the videos. My surgeon is one of the guys in one of the videos. I've always have been a cutting edge (no pun intended!!!) kind of guy so have no problem going with newer technology. The only thing is, I figure it is like any new technology, you never want the first generation. They are now on the second generation with some additional modifications added to it as some original issues had surfaced and haze been addressed. My surgeon is booked out 6 months in advance, does 5 TKR in a day and does it 2x a week that I am aware of. He also has people flying into New England from as far away as California that I am aware of. All I can say from what I'm reading, is recovery time for many seems to be way longer than what I am tracking for. I also know that I am putting in a lot of effort and pain to do it, but for now it is my full time job.
was operated on Monday released Wednesday and by Thursday was fully weight-bearing and gently walking on it without crutches. Friday I was going up and down stairs without crutches, one step at a time using my good leg. By the end of Friday I was finally able to do a couple of leg lifts without ant assist. Right now the most pain I get is from going flat to putting my legs down on the floor. It feels like battery acid is pouring into my veins. It takes about 3 minutes to slowly stand before I get over the pain. I max d out the CPM machine to 120 degrees on my 4th day post op. My extension is in the negative numbers (on the machine) but I really need to increase that as pre op I could not fully extend it. My knee is very rounded with inflammation so is difficult to bend on my own beyond 110 degrees. Starting last night I was able to roll over in bed without wincing in a lot of pain so my sleeping improved. A previous surgeon suggested I had an extremely high tolerance to pain as I had been bone on bone for the past 13 years yet still aggressively downhill skied on it. At the time I was 43 and he said I was a perfect candidate for a TKR replacement except for two problems, I was too young and I was too athletic. Fast forward 15 years and I started having issues with the knee again. Current surgeon looked at the new X-rays and read old report and said there's no reason any longer to wait. I went to the gym worked out hard with all the grinding going on and then just had surgery.
"I am an athletic 57-year-old male. I am five days postop left left TKR. I hit the wall the second day postop while in the hospital. The pain was just brutal! Since then it is steadily improving. I have one of the new Conformis iTotal knees. I have read there were some problems with some of the earlier ones which they have corrected. My surgeon did a minimally invasive procedure where the scar goes around the kneecap not across the top. The incision is about 5 inches long.
"Hi Ann, I had knee replacement 3 weeks ago , I was out after 6 days but within 3 days was back with an infection in my leg. I wonder how long your night pain went on for as I have the same thing , sleep almost impossible at minute when i do sleep I wake with a leg that feels so heavy and dead the only feeling in there is pain
"Thanks so much to those who've replied to me. I've just read them out to my husband and I think this has helped him to understand. I wish I had found this site earlier, it has helped me so much. I'll keep in touch.
"Oh dear mag we all know exactly how you feel. I also felt guilty about my husband doing everything but you have to just go with it at the moment. You are not able to do things for yourself and haven't hot the energy. The majority of us didn't do well I can assure you. The sleep is the main thing and the pain. I am still taking painkillers 8 weeks on. I think at 6 weeks things seemed to turn around, but that might have been just for me. It might happen for you a lot quicker. We all need the time to heal. I myself rested a lot, doing exercises when I felt able to do them. I didn't, like some people, exercise all the time. I myself thought it mor important to let my body do the talking. The nights were awful for me too, sleeping on the couch as I couldn't get comfortable in bed. I took NYtol for a while which seemed to help. Those first four weeks it is very hard to slerp eat snd exercise. You get plenty of rest Mags, let peopl wait on you and don't get down when you hear about others doing so well. Believe me things will get better for you. Everything seems to come together within a few days when you are ready. Keep us posted eith how you are feeling as we all will be able to sympathise and help you. Xxx
i think that we would all agree that nothing prepares you for the brutal nature of this op. Even our surgeons have not actually gone through it and everyone on this forum says the same. It is a long process and we all have different recoveries but the intense pain and sleepless nights are a constant
"I have been feeling so down, because I am a very independent 75year old. Now I have to rely on my husband and although he is very good to me, he comes home telling me how it is with people he has spoken to who are getting on so well. 2weeks on I'm still feeling very tired, (nights are horrendous). No one told me how difficult sleep would be. Also I didn't expect to be taking so many pain killers. The hospital gave me enough for a week. I am so thankful that I found this discussion and I have read out some of your accounts of pain after ops to my husband. It is so good to realise I am not on my own.
"I have a continual, deep pain/ache in practically the whole of my leg. I use ice on it (frozen peas!) a great deal of the time and I take my pain killers. At night I cannot sleep because there is nowhere New I can put my leg which does not become become equally painful within a few seconds. Anybody else have this problem? Also, I had to stop taking Diclofenac a few days before the op. How long before I can take it again?
i am on day 27 post op now.
the Best thing i have done is to buy a Cryo-cuff and tank like we had in hospital. I now have ice on tap 24 hours and its amazing. Money well spen and no peas in sight.
"Do get yourself a cuff for icing. It is a lot better than peas. Not too expensive either. Would have been lost without it. Nearly 6 weeks after Tkr.
"Hi Tracy thanks for your reply I think I am learning very quickly that it is a question of time. I had thought that once I had surgery that I would get good nights sleep with out pain. Never mind I will just keep napping. I hope that I can follow you progress.
"Hi Louse, my name is Tracy, I am a nurse and have just had 3 weeks ago a left TKR I had expectations of going back to 10 hr shifts within 6 weeks. This forum has helped me a lot. I have learnt to go with the flow don't expect too much in the first 6 weeks do the exercises and take plenty of pain relief and rest and ice. Good luck with your surgery.
"I am awaiting my tkr I am glad to have found this forum. I thought that I would have surgery and within few weeks be back to normal with no pain. I have watched the video of the op so felt I knew what to expect! I will add frozen peas to my list and make sure I have a good supply of pain relief ready. I hope all that have had theirs done are feeling a lot better. I look forward to reading your recoveries so that I am better informed for when my time comes !
"i am finding this also feels like there is a tight muscle stopping me from straightening my leg. I am ding the leg straightening exercise with the weight on my quads as the physio showed me but the pain is worse at night, especially the sciatica. My recliner rocke has become the place I sleep at the moment.
"Cold here in Essex but no snow, thank goodness. Don't go out in the ice that would be disastrous. Happy New Year 🍷
So I'll just have to walk up and down stairs more often and use my little pedal exerciser.
"It would be good to get some sleep. I wish it didn't take so long. Have had knee pain now for over two years, so am very fed up with it now! Let's hope we are all much better in 2015!!! It is a comfort to know I am not the only one.
I just think everyone heals at different rates and I guess my body is just taking a little longer than others but as I say
I'm constantly doing the knee straightening exercises My bend is fine
like you I'm not too bad during the day but I only manage to get 2 hours sleep at a time
"I. Had my knee replacement 16 weeks Go and still get the night time pain
"I had my knee replacement 11 weeks ago yesterday. Pain is more bearable during the day as am moving around and walking, but the nights are still awful. Pain all the time and just can't get comfortable. I think it's because the knee gets stiff when laying down. Pain in the back of knee still takes me by surprise. Can't believe this is all taking so long. Make sure you straighten your leg and do the knee clenching exercises to ensure you get good extension. My bend is good but the swelling is still 1 1/2 inches bigger than the other. Thank goodness my other knee is ok. Wishing you a good recovery.
"I had a tkr on 9th december 18 days ago and was doing ok. Nights are still pretty dreadfull with restless legs and pain. Just last night i woke up in agony with pain behind my knee and now i find it difficult to straighten my knee. It is like there is a strap around it pulling at my knee. It is incredibly stiff now. Has anyone else experienced this?
"I have a continual, deep pain/ache in practically the whole of my leg. I use ice on it (frozen peas!) a great deal of the time and I take my pain killers. At night I cannot sleep because there is nowhere New I can put my leg which does not become become equally painful within a few seconds. Anybody else have this problem? Also, I had to stop taking Diclofenac a few days before the op. How long before I can take it again?
I have a continual, deep pain/ache in practically the whole of my leg. I use ice on it (frozen peas!) a great deal of the time and I take my pain killers. At night I cannot sleep because there is nowhere New I can put my leg which does not become become equally painful within a few seconds. Anybody else have this problem? Also, I had to stop taking Diclofenac a few days before the op. How long before I can take it again?
I had mine 11 weeks ago now. I was seen at pre-op clinic, all info was given and an in depth booklet of information for before and after surgery answering 99% of the things that you might worry or ask about.
In early weeks like you I felt quite a lot of pain and it would go down my shin bone but mostly pain was around knee itself. I found it hard to sleep for long I was in/out bed at least three times a night not knowing where to put the leg for total comfort. I found taking my painkillers at regular times was a great help and doing last of physio exercises about an hour before bed and then sitting with the Ice Packs given from the hospital on the knee to cool it down after physio - to help sleep I would lie on my ""good side"" put a pillow between my knees so the bad knee was comfortable or lie on back, put a pillow under bad knee its just comfort for a while but as the weeks go on it gets better. I only started to sleep without pillow at 8 weeks and was sleeping for about 4 hours now I am sleeping for approx. 6+ still a little restless. Each morning I feel like the knee has seized up and takes a while to get going but I do exercises bending knee etc and its fine after about half hour. If I sit for too long it seizes up and I have to stand for a second or so before moving off. I am still going to Physio as I don't seem to have enough bend on the knee and its still really painful to do also I cant go down stairs easily yet too painful. It is a long process so don't despair you will get there.
I had a T KR in November of last year very painful and was in intensive care for 4 days, I then had many physio sessions....then in January of this year a had a manipulation as the knee was not bending sufficiently....in April I had two more manipulations and arthroscopic surgery thinking yes! This is finally going to be OK but no still having physio after in excess of 55 sessions........it is still only bending to just and I mean just 90 degrees still far from sufficient movement, I have been unable to drive also since last November .....so now we have had to change our car to accomodate my problem .....NOT. ON .....but had to be done....I am now waiting next week to have a nuclear scan on my knee to see why????? Insufficient movement.....and it is almost certain for another TKR which I can assure you I am not looking forward to.........has anyone else had this problem ? Thankyou for any help or replies .
not really had that kind of problem but have had 2 tkr s in 4 and a half months , and can say that the 2nd was much easier than the first , think a lot of it was in my mind that i was more possitive and had worked out easier things , like walking ,sleeping ,bathing and such , so didnt push my self the same but i did bend my knee all the time while watching telly ,each time i felt pain i took my time working on that pain ,i also found that after a shower i got a towel and rubbed my knee good and hard ,and oiled it rubbing the oil in my knee when ever i was sat even when i went to bed .hope it works out for you
I had TKR in February of 2014 and have nothing but problems. My knee is so swollen and very painfull and I can't sleep at night. What can I do? My doctor said he knows there is something wrong, but can;t figure it out. Please help!
I am still in so much pain after a year of surgery and my knee is so swollen. How did you know you needed surgery again? I am affraid to trust any doctors.
I had TKR right knee 4sept last year and still have pain swelling and bruising
i spent 9 days in hospital due to horrific bruising from the bottom half of my stomach to right underneath my foot and a fall the day after the op
physio was useless I only had 5 sessions which I truly think was nowhere near enough
I have to see my Surgeon again on the 25th this month and he said last time that if it was no different he would investigate further
i still don't sleep very well and wake every time I shift my knee to another position
I'm sure you will read, and have read, that every person is difference in their recovery. I am 5 and a half weeks post op. I started physical therapy 3 days after my surgery. It was so painful I cried the first couple of times but it does get easier. My best advice to you is to do the exercises, especially lifting the leg and bending It. I was driving after 2 and a half weeks but drive an automatic. I was off crutches also at 2 and a half weeks. I do physical therapy 3 times a week and am making great progress. I can bend the knee to 120, stand on just the surgery leg for 1 minute sessions, am going up and down steps but with pain going down. The first 12 days were hell for me as pain was so intense but it eased after that. I still have some pain and swelling but it's so much betier now. Currently I have an abscess where one of my stitches poked thru the skin and am treating that with peroxide and antibiotic ointment. Sleeping is still dufficult. In the early days I slept on my back with my foot elevated and ice off and on. Now I sleep I need my side with a pillow between my knees and can sleep for about 2 hours before I have to change positions. It DOES get easier but takes time. Don't get discouraged! This forum is a great place to compare recoveries, ask questions, get answers and for emotional support and encouragement. Hang in there. Take your pain med school regularly. I wish you luck!!
Wow! Your note here could not be more timely. I am one week post TKA and have a hundred questions and cautions going thru my mind. Ive experienced constant knee pain of varing degree depending on range of pain meds. I have experienced similar inability to get comfortable especially at night. Restful sleep has not happened. My #1 concern is that I will require manipulation surgery because I can not break thru the swelling to bend my knee to 90 degrees and I am still laying on my back 24/7 Can anyone comment?
I had a full knee replacement 5 days ago lots of pain but yesterday I noticed when ewaking with my crutches my knee is clicking have you had same
I had TKR 14 months ago. A few months after that I had MUA (manipulation under anaesthetic) as I wasnt getting the bend. My knee clicks all the time, I spose thats one of them things. I've been on high dosage of pain killers since my op. I go back again next week as Ive started getting more pain than usual. Keep doing the exercises and hopefully you will make that bend.
very very early days take each day as it comes like you I am 2 mnth I found doing exercises 2 mnth before the op very helpful and making sure before any attempt at exercise take the strogest pain relief possible 40min before starting and 20 min of ice at the end of work out it works believe me
Will b seeing the consultant on Saturday,I hope to be rid of these terrible tight stockings.Also have a lump on my knee where the metalwork was removed.But after reading all the coments I feel so much better,still have alot of problem bending my knee ,they have booked me in for heated pool next week so that may help.Still cannot walk more than 6 paces any comments.
I am having a TKR on Wednesday, and I am anxious and looking forward to hopefully being able to walk without so much pain on the other side of my recovery.
I am sure that the initial process will be painful, and it's good to know that if a few tears are shed, I won't be alone.
Mine TKR was 6 days ago. im frustrated because i still can't lift my leg. PT gave me excercises to do... I can do most but lift my leg with my thigh muscle.. how long does it take.... i also have to still take pain meds due to not be able to sleep at night
I will keep you all posted on my recovery and look forward to the Forum of Support.
Took me 11 days with the first knee and 8 with the second just keep persevering and it will come
My TKR was 13 days ago. I was very disappointed in my recovery progress. I placed too much pressure on myself to progress rapidly, as I had read others had. Today is the first day at PT that I felt good about my progress. I don't have issues with my thigh muscles now. However I don't think I had significant control until this past weekend (11 days). If you are like me once the inflammation goes down you will see significant progress. Please don't push yourself more than your body wants. I made the mistake of pushing myself real hard looking for success. All that did was to create a setback as my knee was aggravated by the excessive exercising. My knee became enraged, stiffened up and had significant swelling. Rest, take your medication as prescribed, try to do your exercises reasonably. If it hurts too much then listen to your body. Once your swelling goes down a good portion of the pain goes with it. My knee still cannot bend as much as I would like it to but that is my focus now. I can straighten it but to bend it back is difficult.
It is still somewhat difficult for me to sleep through the night. However it is much better now than just the past couple of days. I generally wake a couple of times with sharp or throbbing pain in my knee. If I take my medication before I go to sleep it helps significantly. When I awake, I ice and if the time is correct I take my pain medication again. Don't try to tuff it out! The medication was prescribed for a reason, use it. It will help you to get a better night sleep which makes everything seem a bit brighter.
Ahh Doman thanks for your response. .I think I am trying to push to much to soon, I will take your advice and listen to my body....I hate taking meds but like you said , I obviously nred them or he would not have prescribed. ....take care of yourself too and I will update.
I had the same problem! My left leg LITERALLY felt like a tree trunk filled with CEMENT!
My physical therapist who came to my home while I was homebound had me loop one of my husband's belts to make a kind of lasso which I would then slide my foot into like a stirrup on a horse. I could THEN use the long strap end to maneuver my leg wherever I wanted it to go.
This worked GREAT to get my leg onto the bed, onto the ottoman, and onto the couch once I had sat down on the couch and wanted to elevate my legs.
After awhile with exercises I could move my leg much better because I built up my quad muscle.
Try the belt loop thing! It really made a HUGE difference and built independence, too!
I'm almost 4 weeks post-op right now. You'll see great improvement in weeks 2-3.
I can stand alone on my surgical leg indefinitely now, walk without assistance (although I have ditched the walker and now use a cane), and most importantly can lift my leg!
Only 4 weeks post-op but have been very lucky. I was up and walking within 4 hours of surgery using a walker (rollator) . Went home on the 2nd day and switched to a cane for only outside walking. Walking unassisted now, can navigate stairs and have 119 degrees range already. My only problem now is swelling which at times seems excessive and very painful, but I'm totally off all pain medications.
I'm 64 years old, have Lupus and RA, Fibromyalgia too. But other than the degree of pain associated with TKR (right knee) I have been amazed at how quickly I'm getting around. Still not allowed to drive, 2 more weeks, but with proper pain medications, a constant range motion machine after surgery and the ice machine, I'm well on the way to a total recovery.
I had surgery 15days ago. I was also worried about the bending issue, my swelling was terrible and I was not able to get 90 degree until this week. My advice is ice it under knee and from upper thigh to just below knee area. I also take Allieve to help, that did bring my swelling down enough to work more on my bending still hurts like heck but power through it and you will get there.
I'm one week out and have exactly the same problem. I just can't make my leg do a lift, it's very frustrating. I feel like this should be easier...
I do have TKR in 2012 I have proplem with it since day one now is 20016 and my doctor say is gana be good before the surgery I think it's all a bout bussnis and making money but the true is not good for allot of pepole haven tkr reed hear haw many pepole on Paine I Canot walk up stiers I'm in Paine every day swaling and up normal click sound one day is bleding under the skine I m not going to see the same doctor and now a new doctor after he don exry he say you kneed anther TKR on same knee haw I will have 2 Surgry and I'm not Paine free from the first one knee replcement it's bad and make pepole go on despltiy I'm telling every one do search on your knee replcement part know the name it's on your surgery report and inventory report you will know that the name of the knee and the company make it have recal or not or the FDA recall allot of knee part from this company or not cos that's the proplem we haven and every one hear have its proplem and Paine cos this knee device and part not good for us ask do your serch before you end like me with bad leg and doctore they don't say the true all time it's bussnis
I'm in the UK just got home after total knee replacement God it hurts so bad. It's 3 am hear just been to bathroom took 15 mins to get out of bed the pain so bad I was crying . Well hot to try and get some sleep x
Don't get discouraged. I was finally able to lift my leg 15 days after surgery. Your body is trying to heal from very painful surgery. All of us are different and we are not in a contest. There needs to be a balance between pain meds, ice, rest, ice, exercise, ice, etc. I wish you the best.
I am now now 7 months post op. Both done at same time. I can now say that things are better. I have clicking and snapping when I walk. I think as my muscles tone up and get stronger that may lessen. I take 800 ibu. A day and that seems to help. Stiffness is a normal thing for me. Doc says i need to crael on the ground. He says i should be able to do everything as normally as possible. Just cant seem to bring myself to work diligently on that. Doing for on someone won't work well if I can't get on my knees! So need to work on that. It's gets better give it time.
I'm taking meds after 10 days and wondering if that's too long. But it helps me get up and moving.
I am now now 7 months post op. Both done at same time. I can now say that things are better. I have clicking and snapping when I walk. I think as my muscles tone up and get stronger that may lessen. I take 800 ibu. A day and that seems to help. Stiffness is a normal thing for me. Doc says i need to crael on the ground. He says i should be able to do everything as normally as possible. Just cant seem to bring myself to work diligently on that. Doing for on someone won't work well if I can't get on my knees! So need to work on that. It's gets better give it time.
how funny I am a retired registered nurse here in the US and I am used to being the giver as well. this having the tkr is driving me nuts ! it is great I have a wonderful guy , taking care of me ! but I feel like I am inhibiting him as well.
I am 13 days post op. I have no problem sleeping but swelling and the painful thigh muscle is not pleasant. I know it takes time , but I am type A and I want it over now. LOL .
Hi as a carer it's a lot harder I had mine done 3 days ago God the pain made me cry last nite first nite home . Feeling bit better today but scared about later as when been sleep last nite couple hours with leg straight it hurt so bad when I had to go to bathroom to stand up I was crying with the pain
I have a continual, deep pain/ache in practically the whole of my leg. I use ice on it (frozen peas!) a great deal of the time and I take my pain killers. At night I cannot sleep because there is nowhere New I can put my leg which does not become become equally painful within a few seconds. Anybody else have this problem? Also, I had to stop taking Diclofenac a few days before the op. How long before I can take it again?
wow thank s to both of you , in 5 weeks post opp and didn't attend the pre opp group because I was only given 4 days notice and only had time to get my pre med , I too have this same pain in the back of my knee I have worked hard at my physo and now have been discharged ,with an sos if I feel the need to have more in the next 6 weeks . I too have found sleeping hard not being comfortable on my side so have to sleep with a pillow , when I came out of hospital I didn't really have any information , thanks to you both I now feel the pain is normal .so ann it will get better ,it takes time and like you I thought after a short time I wouldn't have pain ,
I, too, only had four days to prepare. It really isn't the best thing to happen. We felt rushed and we never did see important reading materials. People kept asking me if I'd read this or that paper and I kept telling them I never received them...they went to the wrong address. It is all kind of a blur.
ast time I some to you I'd just had TNR and was in so much pain. Well so much has happened since then could not go to the toilet for 3 weeks woke up one morning with bad cramps thought I was going to die. After passing some I nearly passed out lost lots of blood. Layed in bed for 3 days. Doctor told me to stop pain meds .eat lost of firba which I did etc. Then no toilet again for a week cramps again enough is enough. I then took 8 movcol . O yes that worked the yesterday
I can now see that I was being very optimistic! I read all the stuff about what to expect but I still didn't expect this inability to sleep etc. I've spoken to the hospital and was told to take paracetamol and codeine 4 times a day and Diclofenac 3 times a day, and to put ice (not frozen peas!) on my leg for 20 min sessions. I've been doing that, more or less, anyway, but maybe an extra Diclofenac (I was only taking 2 per day) and ice instead of frozen peas, will do the trick!! Anyway, I now realise I was expecting far too much too soon. Thanks again, and it hope your pain disappears very soon.
I understand where you were coming from because I did the same , no one said any thing to me about not sleeping , or the pain in my knees while I stand in a que ,or when I move in bed , I thought I was going to be stiff not painful and stiff , I did physo for 3 weeks with a different person each time they all said slow down its early days , my gp said the same ,it wasn't till I read yours and margarets that I realised that what people told me was right , so now I take time to relax and chill
I had a unicompartmental medial knee replacement on 20th March. I am having real problems with the bending of my knee. They said at hospital that I had to have a 90degree bend before they would discharge me but I failed this target miserably and went home anyway on day 4. I have now been home a week and am still not quite reaching the 90 bend - it feels hot and like my knee will explode when I get to the limit of where it wants to bend to. On Thursday this week I have to have my staples removed and am really nervous about this - how did any of you find/cope with this? One of the really worst things I found in hospital was having the drain removed...did you find this??? Sorry to bombard with questions...
its one month since my TKR and finding this forum has been so welcome. I had a booklet but no one told me how painful my leg would be. I have had one physio session and told I was trying to do way too much, but I thought the more I pushed the knee the quicker it would recover! Sleep is also my biggest challenge and chronic tiredness doesn't help my mood, I have also been told the hip needs replacing soon but really worried about coping with this type/ level of pain again! My scar feels very tight and even with cream and massage it doesn't help!! Any hints would be most welcome.
I am 11 weeks post op from my TKR. I have my other knee replacement on Oct. 9th.
What helps me the most is taking naps when I get tired instead of fighting it. A half hour of REALLY good sleep when I am truly tired is better than TRYING to sleep at night when pain seems to be greater.
I like to move around a lot throughout the day to keep loose. This helps the PAIN and makes me less stiff. I find that stretching to increase my BEND helps to loosen my incision area and break up scar tissue. I ease gently into EVERY stretch then hold it for 30 seconds.
I stretch in bed before my feet ever touch the floor. This helps me balance as I get out of bed and makes those first few stiff minutes easier.
I haven't had a hip replacement, but people I have talked to that have had knees and HIPS REPLACED have ALL said HIPS are easier than knees.
I DO take my temperature often. I get high fevers if I DO get a fever and often don't realize I am already at 100° if I go without taking my temperature. One thing I DON'T ever want to do is ignore a possible infection. That could cause all kinds of trouble with a knee replacement or ANY replacement.
I would like to second what Cheryl has said. I am 32 days post tkr. It has been horrendous but is getting better. I go to pt 3x a week and do exercises at home. Maybe not as often as I should, but I make sure to do them. Massaging my knee with vitamin e oil a few times a day and keeping it iced. I am to go back to work in 7 days and am a bit anxious about it. I now use only a cane to get around and it does get easier every day.
I think the sleep problems and aching bother me the most.
I had a quick recovery in regard to movement, I was at 120 degrees by 6 weeks post surgery, however, I have a terrible problem with severe swelling. Went for an ultrasound and no blood clots thank goodness, just it looks twice the size of my other leg. It's also very stiff, but the more I walk and do my exercises the better it feels, until it swells again. Elevation and lots of ice for me. I thought by 14 weeks I would be as good as new, but I'm told I could have stiffness and swelling for 12 months! Glad I had it done, but if the other knee needs replacing, I'll really have to be in agony before doing this again.
I know where you are coming from. I can't bind my knee much. Almost 3 weeks out can't get swelling down feels like something is cutting off circulation. My foot gets cold and hurts.
hi im now 3 1/2 weeks after tkr and the pain in the inside of my knee when i try to bend it is unbearble , the pt got 70 degree bend today but when i try it on mu own iys hell, how are you doing now and is there a light at the end of the tunnel .
I'm at day 21, the more I walk the angrier my knee responds, doing stretches at 70 degree bend, sleeping fitfully, it's a long road to recovery but try not to do too much too soon. Be strong.
Hi Wendy, I had my staples removed a few days ago , 52 of them and some were sore but on the whole it was no problem, certainly no where near the pain I have experienced with my knee since the operation
I have had a total knee replacement!
Some people tend to have such a high pain threshold. I went to PT today and I felt like screaming and the exercises weren't all that drastic. I have wondered if some people, by nature, just take longer to recuperate and cope with the bending and stretching. I could not face this again and I am use to a lot of pain from migraines and arthritis for 45 years.
Yes everyone is different. Don't compare yourself to any one else. Everyone's healing time is different. I am 1 year out and have learned to just focus on my own recovery and do what I can. I rehabbed myself and wished I would've had rehab done. It is super painful but on this side of it, It's all worth it. Take your pain meds, bring your ice bag worked hard and ice it when your done. I did a lot of Jacuzzi therapy and bent my knee hard, I think that was the key to my success. I'm not pain free but I would definitely do it again. My heel doesn't touch my rear but Im close. I had both done and had complications with each one so I was a hard case. But today, no more throbbing or aching from arthritis. Just dealing with swelling a bit. This time will pass and you will be feeling better. Give yourself about 6 months and then each month gets better.
I can't help much about the 90deg bend as I wasn't required to do that before I left hospital after 3 days. My knee, however, was very hot and swollen for a long time. It still gets warm. Were you told to put ice bags on it? It's now gradually going down ( I had my op a week before you) but is by no means comfortable. I had stitches (allergic to most metals) and even tho I was concerned about what would happen, it was fine when they came out. My knee is gradually bending more and I'm sure yours will be fine after a while. Good luck